New Mexico, session 2026, HB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
Section 1. SHORT TITLE.--This act may be cited as the “General Appropriation Act of 2026".
Section 2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the General Appropriation Act of 2026:
A. “agency” means an office, department, agency, institution, board, bureau,
commission,
court, district attorney, council or committee of state government;
B. “efficiency” means the measure of the degree to which services are efficient and
productive and is often expressed in terms of dollars or time per unit of output;
C. “explanatory” means information that can help users to understand reported
performance measures and to evaluate the significance of underlying factors that may have affected the
reported information;
D. “federal funds” means any payments by the United States government to state
government or agencies except those payments made in accordance with the federal Mineral Leasing Act;
E. “full-time equivalent” means one or more authorized positions that alone or
together receives or receive compensation for not more than two thousand eighty-eight hours worked in
fiscal year 2027. The calculation of hours worked includes compensated absences but does not include
overtime, compensatory time or sick leave paid pursuant to Section 10-7-10 NMSA 1978;
F. “general fund” means that fund created by Section 6-4-2 NMSA 1978 and includes
federal Mineral Leasing Act receipts and those payments made in accordance with the federal block grant
and the federal Workforce Investment Act but excludes the general fund operating reserve, the
appropriation contingency fund, the tax stabilization reserve and any other fund, reserve or account
from which general appropriations are restricted by law;
G. “interagency transfers” means revenue, other than internal service funds, legally
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 1

transferred from one agency to another;
H. “internal service funds” means:
(1) revenue transferred to an agency for the financing of goods or services to another agency on a
cost-reimbursement basis; and
(2) balances in agency internal service fund accounts appropriated by the General Appropriation Act
of 2026;
I. “other state funds” means:
(1) nonreverting balances in agency accounts, other than in internal service funds accounts,
appropriated by the General Appropriation Act of 2026;
(2) all revenue available to agencies from sources other than the general fund, internal service
funds, interagency transfers and federal funds; and
(3) all revenue, the use of which is restricted by statute or agreement;
J. “outcome” means the measure of the actual impact or public benefit of a program;
K. “output” means the measure of the volume of work completed or the level of actual
services or products delivered by a program;
L. “performance measure” means a quantitative or qualitative indicator used to assess
a program;
M. “quality” means the measure of the quality of a good or service produced and is
often an indicator of the timeliness, reliability or safety of services or products produced by a
program;
N. “revenue” means all money received by an agency from sources external to that
agency, net of refunds and other correcting transactions, other than from issue of debt, liquidation of
investments or as agent or trustee for other governmental entities or private persons; and
O. “target” means the expected level of performance of a program’s performance
measures.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 2

Section 3. GENERAL PROVISIONS.--
A. Amounts set out under column headings are expressed in thousands of dollars.
B. Amounts set out under column headings are appropriated from the source indicated by
the column heading. All amounts set out under the column heading “Internal Service Funds/Interagency
Transfers” are intergovernmental transfers and do not represent a portion of total state government
appropriations. All information designated as “Total” or “Subtotal” is provided for information and
amounts are not appropriations.
C. Amounts set out in Section 4 of the General Appropriation Act of 2026, or so much
as may be necessary, are appropriated from the indicated source for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for
the objects expressed.
D. Unexpended balances in agency accounts remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026
shall revert to the general fund by October 1, 2026 unless otherwise indicated in the General
Appropriation Act of 2026 or otherwise provided by law.
E. Unexpended balances in agency accounts remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall revert to the general fund by October 1, 2027 unless otherwise indicated in the General
Appropriation Act of 2026 or otherwise provided by law.
F. The state budget division shall monitor revenue received by agencies from sources
other than the general fund and shall reduce the operating budget of any agency whose revenue from such
sources is not meeting projections. The state budget division shall notify the legislative finance
committee of any operating budget reduced pursuant to this subsection.
G. Except as otherwise specifically stated in the General Appropriation Act of 2026,
appropriations are made in this act for the expenditures of agencies and for other purposes as required
by existing law for fiscal year 2027. If any other act of the second session of the fifty-seventh
legislature changes existing law with regard to the name or responsibilities of an agency or the name or
purpose of a fund or distribution, the appropriation made in the General Appropriation Act of 2026 shall
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 3

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
be transferred from the agency, fund or distribution to which an appropriation has been made as required
by existing law to the appropriate agency, fund or distribution provided by the new law.
H. The department of finance and administration shall regularly consult with the
legislative finance committee staff to compare fiscal year 2027 revenue collections with the revenue
estimate. If the analyses indicate that revenues and transfers to the general fund are not expected to
meet appropriations, then the department shall present a plan to the legislative finance committee that
outlines the methods by which the administration proposes to address the deficit.
I. Pursuant to Sections 6-3-23 through 6-3-25 NMSA 1978, agencies whose revenue from
state board of finance loans, from revenue appropriated by other acts of the legislature, or from gifts,
grants, donations, bequests, insurance settlements, refunds or payments into revolving funds exceeds
specifically appropriated amounts may request budget increases from the state budget division. If
approved by the state budget division, such money is appropriated.
J. Except for gasoline credit cards used solely for operation of official vehicles,
telephone credit cards used solely for official business and procurement cards used as authorized by
Section 6-5-9.1 NMSA 1978, none of the appropriations contained in the General Appropriation Act of 2026
may be expended for payment of agency-issued credit card invoices.
K. For the purpose of administering the General Appropriation Act of 2026, the state
of New Mexico shall follow the modified accrual basis of accounting for governmental funds in accordance
with the manual of model accounting practices issued by the department of finance and administration.
L. Appropriations made in the General Appropriation Act of 2026 include sufficient
funds for all agencies to make payments of unused sick leave pursuant to the provisions of Section 10-7-
10 NMSA 1978 and Section 10-7-11 NMSA 1978 and in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to Subsection A
of Section 10-7-2 NMSA 1978.
Section 4. FISCAL YEAR 2027 APPROPRIATIONS.--
A. LEGISLATIVE
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 4

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SERVICE:
Legislative building services:
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,854.2 4,854.2
(b) Contractual services 130.9 130.9
(c) Other 1,574.3 1,574.3
Subtotal 6,559.4
TOTAL LEGISLATIVE 6,559.4 6,559.4
B. JUDICIAL
NEW MEXICO COMPILATION COMMISSION:
The purpose of the New Mexico compilation commission program is to publish in print and electronic
format, distribute and sell (1) laws enacted by the legislature, (2) opinions of the supreme court and
court of appeals, (3) rules approved by the supreme court, (4) attorney general opinions and (5) other
state and federal rules and opinions. The commission ensures the accuracy and reliability of its
publications.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 500.2 705.8 400.0 1,606.0
Subtotal 1,606.0
JUDICIAL STANDARDS COMMISSION:
The purpose of the judicial standards commission program is to provide a public review process
addressing complaints involving judicial misconduct to preserve the integrity and impartiality of the
judicial process.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 1,296.4 1,296.4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 5

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 1,296.4
COURT OF APPEALS:
The purpose of the court of appeals program is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and
timely and maintain accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to
independently protect the rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the
United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 10,913.2 10,913.2
Subtotal 10,913.2
SUPREME COURT:
The purpose of the supreme court program is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and
timely and maintain accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to
independently protect the rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the
United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 10,339.8 15.0 10,354.8
Subtotal 10,354.8
ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS:
(1) Administrative support:
The purpose of the administrative support program is to provide administrative support to the chief
justice, all judicial branch units and the administrative office of the courts so that they can
effectively administer the New Mexico court system.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,029.6 467.9 404.9 9,902.4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 6

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Contractual services 1,337.5 905.7 1,835.4 4,078.6
(c) Other 6,132.3 2,305.2 313.6 90.3 8,841.4
(2) Statewide judiciary automation:
The purpose of the statewide judiciary automation program is to provide development, enhancement,
maintenance and support for core court automation and usage skills for appellate, district, magistrate
and municipal courts and ancillary judicial agencies.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,447.1 943.8 8,390.9
(b) Contractual services 250.0 780.0 1,030.0
(c) Other 1,769.1 3,707.8 5,476.9
(3) Court operations:
The purpose of the court operations program is to provide support to courts statewide, including with
security, customer service, access to justice and magistrate court facilities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,282.1 225.5 4,507.6
(b) Contractual services 270.0 170.0 440.0
(c) Other 11,226.0 943.1 12,169.1
(4) Special court services:
The purpose of the special court services program is to provide court advocates, legal counsel and safe
exchanges for children and families; to provide judges pro tem; and to adjudicate water rights disputes
so the constitutional rights and safety of citizens, especially children and families, are protected.
Appropriations:
(a) Pre-trial services 11,365.2 11,365.2
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 7

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Court-appointed special
advocate 1,408.7 1,408.7
(c) Supervised visitation 1,228.6 1,228.6
(d) Water rights 2,501.0 394.2 2,895.2
(e) Court-appointed attorneys 1,344.2 1,344.2
(f) Children's mediation 308.5 308.5
(g) Judges pro tem 27.5 41.6 69.1
(h) Court education institute 2,709.7 2,000.0 4,709.7
(i) Access to justice 347.2 347.2
(j) Statewide alternative
dispute resolution 221.3 221.3
(k) Statewide treatment
programs 1,539.2 1,539.2
(l) Administrative office
of the courts treatment
programs 2,917.9 2,917.9
(m) Adult guardianship 405.3 405.3
(n) Behavioral health 563.0 563.0
Subtotal 84,160.0
DISTRICT COURTS:
(1) First judicial district:
The purpose of the first judicial district court program, statutorily created in Santa Fe, Rio Arriba
and Los Alamos counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and
maintain accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently
protect the rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 8

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 15,331.1 488.7 1,531.4 17,351.2
The general fund appropriation to the first judicial district court includes four hundred fifty-one
thousand four hundred dollars ($451,400) for an additional judgeship and associated costs, contingent on
enactment of Senate Bill 35 or similar legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh
legislature.
(2) Second judicial district:
The purpose of the second judicial district court program, statutorily created in Bernalillo county, is
to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate records of legal
proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and liberties
guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 40,105.3 5,822.1 2,777.9 48,705.3
The general fund appropriation to the second judicial district court includes four hundred fifty-one
thousand four hundred dollars ($451,400) for an additional judgeship and associated costs, contingent on
enactment of House Bill 95 or similar legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh
legislature.
(3) Third judicial district:
The purpose of the third judicial district court program, statutorily created in Dona Ana county, is to
provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate records of legal
proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and liberties
guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 15,499.3 416.0 1,794.9 17,710.2
(4) Fourth judicial district:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 9

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The purpose of the fourth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Mora, San Miguel and
Guadalupe counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain
accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the
rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 6,545.5 48.3 447.4 7,041.2
(5) Fifth judicial district:
The purpose of the fifth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Eddy, Chaves and Lea
counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate
records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and
liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 16,079.5 393.0 566.4 17,038.9
(6) Sixth judicial district:
The purpose of the sixth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Grant, Luna and Hidalgo
counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate
records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and
liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 8,358.5 111.6 602.6 9,072.7
(7) Seventh judicial district:
The purpose of the seventh judicial district court program, statutorily created in Torrance, Socorro,
Catron and Sierra counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and
maintain accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently
protect the rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 10

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 5,759.8 60.0 662.4 6,482.2
(8) Eighth judicial district:
The purpose of the eighth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Taos, Colfax and Union
counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate
records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and
liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 7,296.8 139.7 451.8 7,888.3
(9) Ninth judicial district:
The purpose of the ninth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Curry and Roosevelt
counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate
records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and
liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 7,967.0 138.0 398.3 8,503.3
(10) Tenth judicial district:
The purpose of the tenth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Quay, De Baca and
Harding counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain
accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the
rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 2,714.2 22.4 2,736.6
(11) Eleventh judicial district:
The purpose of the eleventh judicial district court program, statutorily created in San Juan and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 11

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
McKinley counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain
accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the
rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 15,537.4 433.0 2,140.9 18,111.3
(12) Twelfth judicial district:
The purpose of the twelfth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Otero and Lincoln
counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate
records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the rights and
liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 7,947.1 104.9 408.3 8,460.3
(13) Thirteenth judicial district:
The purpose of the thirteenth judicial district court program, statutorily created in Valencia, Sandoval
and Cibola counties, is to provide access to justice, resolve disputes justly and timely and maintain
accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and legal status to independently protect the
rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New Mexico and the United States.
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 16,188.1 510.0 1,150.2 17,848.3
Subtotal 186,949.8
BERNALILLO COUNTY METROPOLITAN COURT:
The purpose of the Bernalillo county metropolitan court program is to provide access to justice, resolve
disputes justly and timely and maintain accurate records of legal proceedings that affect rights and
legal status to independently protect the rights and liberties guaranteed by the constitutions of New
Mexico and the United States.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 12

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Operations 34,284.6 3,122.0 585.0 37,991.6
Subtotal 37,991.6
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS:
(1) First judicial district:
The purpose of the first judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Santa Fe,
Rio Arriba and Los Alamos counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 8,923.1 77.6 120.1 9,120.8
(b) Contractual services 140.0 140.0
(c) Other 646.4 646.4
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(2) Second judicial district:
The purpose of the second judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Bernalillo
county.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 34,835.8 609.6 534.9 908.5 36,888.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 13

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Contractual services 711.5 16.0 353.3 1,080.8
(c) Other 2,642.1 62.0 27.4 104.7 2,836.2
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(3) Third judicial district:
The purpose of the third judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Dona Ana
county.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,895.6 268.6 276.5 8,440.7
(b) Contractual services 45.7 45.7
(c) Other 482.2 482.2
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(4) Fourth judicial district:
The purpose of the fourth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Mora, San
Miguel and Guadalupe counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 14

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 4,918.6 4,918.6
(b) Contractual services 121.9 121.9
(c) Other 249.4 249.4
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(5) Fifth judicial district:
The purpose of the fifth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Eddy, Lea
and Chaves counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 8,326.0 287.7 8,613.7
(b) Contractual services 147.5 147.5
(c) Other 567.5 567.5
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(6) Sixth judicial district:
The purpose of the sixth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Grant,
Hidalgo and Luna counties.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 15

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,608.3 88.9 177.1 4,874.3
(b) Contractual services 14.2 14.2
(c) Other 229.4 229.4
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(7) Seventh judicial district:
The purpose of the seventh judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Catron,
Sierra, Socorro and Torrance counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,049.2 4,049.2
(b) Contractual services 20.3 20.3
(c) Other 198.1 198.1
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(8) Eighth judicial district:
The purpose of the eighth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Taos, Colfax
and Union counties.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 16

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,704.7 4,704.7
(b) Contractual services 148.1 148.1
(c) Other 308.9 308.9
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(9) Ninth judicial district:
The purpose of the ninth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Curry and
Roosevelt counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,649.3 4,649.3
(b) Contractual services 258.5 258.5
(c) Other 219.5 219.5
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(10) Tenth judicial district:
The purpose of the tenth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Quay,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 17

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Harding and De Baca counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,197.2 2,197.2
(b) Contractual services 40.0 40.0
(c) Other 172.5 172.5
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(11) Eleventh judicial district, division 1:
The purpose of the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 1, program is to provide litigation,
special programs and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the
district attorney and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens
within San Juan county.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,648.2 234.3 7,882.5
(b) Contractual services 2,285.5 2,285.5
(c) Other 2,374.9 2,374.9
The general fund appropriation to the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 1 in the contractual
services category includes one million six hundred ninety-six thousand dollars ($1,696,000) for district
attorney duties in McKinley county pursuant to Section 36-1-18 NMSA 1978.
The general fund appropriation to the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 1 in the other
category includes one million six hundred ninety-six thousand dollars ($1,696,000) for district attorney
duties in McKinley county pursuant to Section 36-1-18 NMSA 1978.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 18

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The remainder of the general fund appropriations to the eleventh judicial district attorney,
division 1 in the contractual services category and the other category for district attorney duties in
McKinley county shall be transferred to the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 2 no more than
two months after the supreme court issues a ruling in State of New Mexico v. Bernadine Martin, S-1-SC-
41063.
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(b) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(12) Eleventh judicial district, division 2:
The purpose of the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 2, program is to provide litigation,
special programs and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the
district attorney and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens
within McKinley county.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 283.0 283.0
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(13) Twelfth judicial district:
The purpose of the twelfth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special programs
and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district attorney
and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within Lincoln and
Otero counties.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 19

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,314.3 194.9 5,509.2
(b) Contractual services 98.3 98.3
(c) Other 294.7 294.7
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
(14) Thirteenth judicial district:
The purpose of the thirteenth judicial district attorney program is to provide litigation, special
programs and administrative support for the enforcement of state laws as they pertain to the district
attorney and to improve and ensure the protection, safety, welfare and health of the citizens within
Cibola, Sandoval and Valencia counties.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,324.1 250.0 9,574.1
(b) Contractual services 110.4 10.0 239.6 360.0
(c) Other 469.1 60.0 25.0 554.1
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of pretrial detention motions made
(b) Explanatory: Percent of pretrial detention motions granted
Subtotal 125,600.7
ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEYS:
(1) Administrative support:
The purpose of the administrative support program is to provide fiscal, human resource, staff
development, automation, victim program services and support to all district attorneys' offices in New
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 20

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Mexico and to members of the New Mexico children's safe house network so they may obtain and access the
necessary resources to effectively and efficiently carry out their prosecutorial, investigative and
programmatic functions.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,227.3 214.0 2,441.3
(b) Contractual services 655.2 30.0 80.0 765.2
(c) Other 1,013.3 60.0 11.0 1,084.3
Subtotal 4,290.8
PUBLIC DEFENDER DEPARTMENT:
(1) Criminal legal services:
The purpose of the criminal legal services program is to provide effective legal representation and
advocacy for eligible clients so their liberty and constitutional rights are protected and to serve the
community as a partner in assuring a fair and efficient criminal justice system that sustains New
Mexico’s statutory and constitutional mandate to adequately fund a statewide indigent defense system.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 57,409.7 57,409.7
(b) Contractual services 19,530.8 19,530.8
(c) Other 7,721.9 400.0 8,121.9
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Average cases assigned to attorneys yearly 330
Subtotal 85,062.4
TOTAL JUDICIAL 495,108.1 31,921.6 15,903.3 5,292.7 548,225.7
C. GENERAL CONTROL
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 21

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
ATTORNEY GENERAL:
(1) Legal services:
The purpose of the legal services program is to deliver quality legal services, including opinions,
counsel and representation to state government entities, and to enforce state law on behalf of the
public so New Mexicans have an open, honest, efficient government and enjoy the protection of state law.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 13,303.4 18,488.4 162.5 31,954.3
(b) Contractual services 421.2 806.9 9.0 1,237.1
(c) Other 2,025.3 200.0 3,762.0 247.1 6,234.4
The internal services/interagency transfers appropriations to the legal services program of the attorney
general include twenty-three million fifty-seven thousand three hundred dollars ($23,057,300) from the
consumer settlement fund of the office of the attorney general. One million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) of the internal services/interagency transfers appropriations from the consumer
settlement fund of the office of the attorney general shall be used exclusively for operational expenses
of the office of the child advocate.
(2) Medicaid fraud:
The purpose of the medicaid fraud program is to investigate and prosecute medicaid provider fraud,
recipient abuse and neglect in the medicaid program.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,042.5 3,067.1 4,109.6
(b) Contractual services 3.0 9.4 12.4
(c) Other 231.6 754.9 986.5
Subtotal 44,534.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 22

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
STATE AUDITOR:
The purpose of the state auditor program is to audit the financial affairs of every agency annually so
they can improve accountability and performance and to assure New Mexicans that funds are expended
properly.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,831.5 850.0 4,681.5
(b) Contractual services 221.3 221.3
(c) Other 642.1 642.1
(d) Other financing uses 850.0 850.0
Subtotal 6,394.9
TAXATION AND REVENUE DEPARTMENT:
(1) Tax administration:
The purpose of the tax administration program is to provide registration and licensure requirements for
and compliance with tax programs and to ensure the administration and collection of state taxes and fees
that provide funding for support services for the general public through appropriations.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 32,073.8 696.5 2,258.8 35,029.1
(b) Contractual services 1,329.3 8.4 1,337.7
(c) Other 6,860.2 516.6 159.0 7,535.8
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of collectible balances outstanding from the end of
the prior fiscal year that are collected 23%
(b) Outcome: Percent of collectible audit assessments generation in the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 23

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
prior fiscal year that are collected 50%
(2) Motor vehicle:
The purpose of the motor vehicle program is to register, title and license vehicles, boats and motor
vehicle dealers and to enforce operator compliance with the Motor Vehicle Code and federal regulations
by conducting tests, investigations and audits.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 18,474.4 6,907.6 239.3 25,621.3
(b) Contractual services 5,950.2 450.0 6,400.2
(c) Other 13,410.5 163.6 13,574.1
(d) Other financing uses 11,900.0 11,900.0
The other state funds appropriations to the motor vehicle program of the taxation and revenue department
include eleven million eight hundred five thousand five hundred dollars ($11,805,500) from the weight
distance tax identification permit fund for the modal program of the department of transportation and
ninety-four thousand five hundred dollars ($94,500) from the weight distance tax identification permit
fund for the law enforcement program of the department of public safety.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of registered vehicles with liability insurance 95%
(b) Efficiency: Average call center waiting time to reach an agent, in
minutes 6
(c) Efficiency: Average waiting time in offices equipped with a smart queue
management system, in minutes 7
(3) Property tax:
The purpose of the property tax program is to administer the Property Tax Code to ensure the fair
appraisal of property and to assess property taxes within the state.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 24

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,937.5 4,937.5
(b) Contractual services 1,317.3 1,317.3
(c) Other 1,690.4 1,690.4
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of total delinquent property taxes recovered 17%
(4) Compliance enforcement:
The purpose of the compliance enforcement program is to support the overall mission of the taxation and
revenue department by enforcing criminal statutes relative to the New Mexico Tax Administration Act and
other related financial crimes, as they impact New Mexico state taxes, to encourage and achieve
voluntary compliance with state tax laws.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,132.8 2,132.8
(b) Contractual services 17.4 17.4
(c) Other 313.9 313.9
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide information system resources, human resource services,
finance and accounting services, revenue forecasting and legal services to give agency personnel the
resources needed to meet departmental objectives. For the general public, the program conducts hearings
for resolving taxpayer protests and provides stakeholders with reliable information regarding the
state’s tax programs.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 25

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 18,863.7 951.0 19,814.7
(b) Contractual services 8,199.2 8,199.2
(c) Other 3,246.4 3,246.4
Subtotal 143,067.8
STATE INVESTMENT COUNCIL:
(1) State investment:
The purpose of the state investment program is to provide investment management of the state's permanent
funds for the residents of New Mexico to maximize distributions to the state's operating budget while
preserving the real value of the funds for future generations of New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 11,779.0 11,779.0
(b) Contractual services 83,544.8 83,544.8
(c) Other 1,254.6 1,254.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of basis points that five-year annualized investment
return differs from internal benchmarks 12.5
(b) Outcome: Five-year annualized percentile performance ranking in
endowment investment peer universe 49%
Subtotal 96,578.4
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS OFFICE:
(1) Administrative hearings:
The purpose of the administrative hearings program is to adjudicate tax-, property- and motor-vehicle-
related administrative hearings in a fair, efficient and impartial manner independent of the executive
agency that is party to the proceedings.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 26

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,411.6 210.0 128.8 2,750.4
(b) Contractual services 70.0 70.0
(c) Other 324.0 324.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the administrative hearings office
includes one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from the health care authority for the costs of
conducting administrative hearings under the Medicaid Provider and Managed Care Act.
The other state funds appropriation to the administrative hearings office includes two hundred ten
thousand dollars ($210,000) from the motor vehicle suspense fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of hearings for Implied Consent Act cases not held
within ninety days due to an administrative hearings office
error 0.2%
Subtotal 3,144.4
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION:
(1) Policy development, fiscal analysis, budget oversight, strategic planning and education
accountability:
The purpose of the policy development, fiscal analysis, budget oversight, strategic planning and
education accountability program is to provide coordinated fiscal leadership to the governor,
legislature and state agencies. Backed by statutory authority, the office of the secretary, state budget
division and board of finance ensure sound budgeting, data-driven decision-making and accountability to
support statewide policy goals and the responsible use of public funds.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 27

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 4,719.1 4,719.1
(b) Contractual services 956.1 956.1
(c) Other 1,082.5 1,082.5
On certification by the state board of finance pursuant to Section 6-1-2 NMSA 1978 that a critical
emergency exists that cannot be addressed by disaster declaration or other emergency or contingency
funds, the secretary of the department of finance and administration is authorized to transfer from the
general fund operating reserve to the state board of finance emergency fund the amount necessary to meet
the emergency. Such transfers shall not exceed an aggregate amount of six million dollars ($6,000,000)
in fiscal year 2027. Repayments of emergency loans made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in
the state board of finance emergency fund pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-1-5 NMSA 1978.
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: General fund reserves as a percent of recurring
appropriations
(b) Outcome: Error rate for the eighteen-month general fund revenue
forecast, excluding oil and gas revenue and corporate
income taxes 5%
(c) Outcome: Error rate for the eighteen-month general fund revenue
forecast, including oil and gas revenue and corporate
income taxes 5%
(2) Local government division:
The purpose of the local government division program is to strengthen the capacity of New Mexico's
counties, municipalities, special districts and tribal governments by promoting sound financial
practices, effective administration of public funds and programmatic accountability. The program ensures
compliance with statutory and regulatory requirements, facilitates transparent and efficient use of
state and federal resources and fosters sustainable local governance aligned with the priorities of New
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 28

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Mexico's residents.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,123.2 1,489.0 5,612.2
(b) Contractual services 48.8 307.6 356.4
(c) Other 102.5 46,723.8 46,826.3
(d) Other financing uses 525.0 525.0
The other state funds appropriations to the local government division program of the department of
finance and administration include twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars
($25,536,000) from the enhanced 911 fund and twenty-three million five hundred nine thousand four
hundred dollars ($23,509,400) from the local DWI grant fund.
(3) Financial control:
The purpose of the financial control program is to ensure fiscal integrity, transparency and
accountability across all state agencies by maintaining a unified and reliable system of financial
controls, developing and enforcing model accounting practices, operating statewide accounting and
payroll systems and safeguarding public funds through rigorous oversight, standardized reporting and
internal control frameworks. The program supports the responsible stewardship of public resources,
upholds compliance with state and federal laws and delivers accurate, timely financial information to
promote confidence in New Mexico’s public finances.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,298.3 2,451.8 9,750.1
(b) Contractual services 2,211.6 2,047.5 4,259.1
(c) Other 354.2 886.5 1,240.7
Performance measures:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 29

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Efficiency: Percent of correctly vouchered and approved vendor payments
processed within two working days 100%
(4) Infrastructure planning, funding navigation, grant management assistance and financial reporting:
The purpose of the infrastructure planning and development program is to serve as New Mexico's
comprehensive resource for capital project planning, funding and implementation, coordinate local, state
and federal funding opportunities and provide collaborative partnership support to ensure that all
capital outlay and infrastructure projects are strategically planned, fully funded and successfully
executed in alignment with the infrastructure capital improvements plan.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,718.8 609.3 3,328.1
(b) Contractual services 510.0 2.0 512.0
(c) Other 180.3 10,631.7 10,812.0
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide other department of finance and administration programs
with central direction to agency management processes to ensure consistency, legal compliance and
financial integrity, to provide human resources support and to administer the executive’s exempt salary
plan.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,704.6 2,704.6
(b) Contractual services 192.8 192.8
(c) Other 339.1 339.1
(6) Dues and membership fees/special appropriations:
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 30

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Other financing uses 30.0 67,429.0 42,907.8 110,366.8
(b) Emergency water
supply fund 109.9 109.9
(c) Fiscal agent contract 1,200.0 1,200.0
(d) State planning districts 693.0 693.0
(e) Statewide teen court 137.9 137.9
(f) Law enforcement
protection fund 20,000.0 20,000.0
(g) Leasehold community
assistance 286.0 286.0
(h) Acequia and community
ditch
education program 498.2 498.2
(i) New Mexico acequia
commission 188.1 188.1
(j) Land grant council 626.9 626.9
(k) County detention
of prisoners 4,970.0 4,970.0
(l) National association
of state budget
officers 24.0 24.0
(m) Western governors’
association 40.0 40.0
(n) National governors’
association 84.0 84.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 31

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(o) Intertribal Indian
ceremonial association 328.0 328.0
(p) Civil legal services 4,286.1 2,953.9 7,240.0
(q) Federal Taylor grazing 800.0 800.0
(r) Forest reserve 9,488.9 9,488.9
(s) Councils of governments for
capacity building 2,500.0 2,500.0
The other state funds appropriation to the dues and membership fees/special appropriations program of
the department of finance and administration in the other financing uses category includes sixty-five
million four hundred twenty-nine thousand dollars ($65,429,000) from the county-supported medicaid fund
and two million dollars ($2,000,000) from the law enforcement protection fund.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the dues and membership
fees/special appropriations program of the department of finance and administration in the other
financing uses category includes twenty-one million one hundred five thousand eight hundred dollars
($21,105,800) from the tobacco settlement program fund and twenty-one million eight hundred two thousand
dollars ($21,802,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund.
The department of finance and administration shall not distribute a general fund appropriation made
to the dues and membership fees/special appropriations program to a New Mexico agency or local public
body that is not current on its audit or financial reporting or otherwise not in compliance with the
Audit Act, except for the appropriations for civil legal services.
The general fund appropriation to the dues and membership fees/special appropriations program of
the department of finance and administration includes two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) for councils of governments for capacity building, contingent on no administrative fees
charged by a planning district for appropriations in Section 9 of the General Appropriations Act of
2026.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 32

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 252,797.8
PUBLIC SCHOOL INSURANCE AUTHORITY:
(1) Benefits:
The purpose of the benefits program is to provide an effective health insurance package to educational
employees and their eligible family members so they can be protected against catastrophic financial
losses due to medical problems, disability or death.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 522,746.8 522,746.8
(b) Other financing uses 950.9 950.9
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent change in per-member health claim costs 9%
(b) Outcome: Percent change in medical premium as compared with industry
average 4.5%
(2) Risk:
The purpose of the risk program is to provide economical and comprehensive property, liability and
workers’ compensation programs to educational entities so they are protected against injury and loss.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 173,882.2 173,882.2
(b) Other financing uses 950.9 950.9
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Dollar amount of excess insurance claims for property, in
thousands
(b) Explanatory: Dollar amount of excess insurance claims for liability, in
thousands
(c) Explanatory: Dollar amount of excess insurance claims for workers'
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 33

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
compensation, in thousands
(3) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide administrative support for the benefits and risk programs
and to assist the agency in delivering services to its constituents.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,589.7 1,589.7
(b) Contractual services 104.9 104.9
(c) Other 207.2 207.2
Any unexpended balances in program support of the public school insurance authority remaining at the end
of fiscal year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert in equal amounts to the benefits program and
risk program.
Subtotal 700,432.6
RETIREE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY:
(1) Healthcare benefits administration:
The purpose of the healthcare benefits administration program is to provide fiscally solvent core group
and optional healthcare benefits and life insurance to current and future eligible retirees and their
dependents so they may access covered and available core group and optional healthcare benefits and life
insurance benefits when they need them.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 418,236.7 418,236.7
(b) Other 45.0 45.0
(c) Other financing uses 4,656.6 4,656.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Minimum number of years of positive fund balance 30
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 34

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Explanatory: Annual loss ratio for the health benefits fund
(2) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide administrative support for the healthcare benefits
administration program to assist the agency in delivering its services to its constituents.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,243.0 3,243.0
(b) Contractual services 763.2 763.2
(c) Other 650.4 650.4
Any unexpended balances in program support of the retiree health care authority remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert to the healthcare benefits administration
program.
Subtotal 427,594.9
GENERAL SERVICES DEPARTMENT:
(1) Risk management:
The purpose of the risk management program is to protect the state’s assets against property, public
liability, workers’ compensation, state unemployment compensation, local public bodies unemployment
compensation and surety bond losses so agencies can perform their missions in an efficient and
responsive manner.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,538.8 6,538.8
(b) Contractual services 1,095.0 1,095.0
(c) Other 575.3 575.3
(d) Other financing uses 4,528.4 4,528.4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 35

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the risk management program of the
general services department in the contractual services category includes eight hundred forty-five
thousand dollars ($845,000) for modernization of the risk management division's information technology
systems using modern software best practices, including agile development methodologies and open-source
practices for the development and deployment of new and existing digital services.
Any unexpended balances in the risk management program of the general services department remaining
at the end of fiscal year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert to the public liability fund,
public property reserve fund, workers' compensation retention fund, state government unemployment
compensation reserve fund and local public body unemployment compensation reserve fund based on the
proportion of each individual fund's assessment for the risk management program.
(2) Risk management funds:
The purpose of the risk management funds program is to provide public liability, public property and
workers’ compensation coverage to state agencies and employees.
Appropriations:
(a) Public liability 112,000.0 112,000.0
(b) Surety bond 44.0 44.0
(c) Public property reserve 16,859.4 16,859.4
(d) Local public body
unemployment compensation reserve 1,590.0 1,590.0
(e) Workers' compensation retention 23,649.1 23,649.1
(f) State unemployment compensation 8,100.0 8,100.0
The other state funds appropriations to the public liability fund and the workers' compensation
retention fund include sufficient funding to pay the costs of providing liability and workers'
compensation insurance coverage to members of the New Mexico mounted patrol.
Performance measures:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 36

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Explanatory: Projected financial position of the public property fund
(b) Explanatory: Projected financial position of the workers' compensation
fund
(c) Explanatory: Projected financial position of the public liability fund
(3) State printing services:
The purpose of the state printing services program is to provide cost-effective printing and publishing
services for governmental agencies.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 635.5 635.5
(b) Contractual services 125.0 125.0
(c) Other 2,916.2 2,916.2
(d) Other financing uses 100.0 100.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent of state printing revenue exceeding expenditures 5%
(4) Facilities management:
The purpose of the facilities management program is to provide employees and the public with effective
property management so agencies can perform their missions in an efficient and responsive manner.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 14,865.9 750.0 363.6 15,979.5
(b) Contractual services 730.3 730.3
(c) Other 6,994.3 6,994.3
The other state funds appropriation to the facilities management program of the general services
department is from administrative fees collected pursuant to Section 15-3B-10 NMSA 1978 for the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 37

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
administration of capital outlay projects.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the facilities management program
of the general services department is from fees collected by the procurement services program for costs
related to procurement management.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of new office space leases achieving adopted space
standards 90%
(5) Transportation services:
The purpose of the transportation services program is to provide centralized and effective
administration of the state’s motor pool and aircraft transportation services so agencies can perform
their missions in an efficient and responsive manner.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 966.9 2,747.7 3,714.6
(b) Contractual services 189.5 189.5
(c) Other 381.4 10,938.1 11,319.5
(d) Other financing uses 500.0 500.0
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of leased vehicles used daily or seven hundred
fifty miles per month 85%
(6) Procurement services:
The purpose of the procurement services program is to provide a procurement process for tangible
property for government entities to ensure compliance with the Procurement Code so agencies can perform
their missions in an efficient and responsive manner.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 38

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,563.0 3,563.0
(b) Contractual services 20.5 20.5
(c) Other 408.0 408.0
(d) Other financing uses 2,307.0 2,307.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Average number of days for completion of contract review 5
(7) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide leadership and policy direction, establish department
procedures, manage program performance, oversee department human resources and finances and provide
information technology business solutions.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,669.8 5,669.8
(b) Contractual services 664.3 664.3
(c) Other 737.7 737.7
Any unexpended balances in program support of the general services department remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert to the procurement services, state printing,
risk management and transportation services programs based on the proportion of each individual
program's assessment for program support.
Subtotal 231,554.7
EDUCATIONAL RETIREMENT BOARD:
(1) Educational retirement:
The purpose of the educational retirement program is to provide secure retirement benefits to active and
retired members so they can have secure monthly benefits when their careers are finished.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 39

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 12,656.3 12,656.3
(b) Contractual services 18,000.0 18,000.0
(c) Other 2,367.8 2,367.8
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of years to eliminate unfunded actuarial accrued
liability 30
(b) Explanatory: Ten-year performance ranking in a national peer survey of
public plans
Subtotal 33,024.1
NEW MEXICO SENTENCING COMMISSION:
The purpose of the New Mexico sentencing commission program is to provide information, analysis,
recommendations and assistance from a coordinated cross-agency perspective to the three branches of
government and interested New Mexicans so they have the resources they need to make policy decisions
that benefit the criminal and juvenile justice systems.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 1,178.2 58.4 1,236.6
(b) Other 336.1 336.1
Subtotal 1,572.7
GOVERNOR:
(1) Executive management and leadership:
The purpose of the executive management and leadership program is to provide appropriate management and
leadership to the executive branch of government to allow for a more efficient and effective operation
of the agencies within that branch of government on behalf of the residents of the state.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 40

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,373.9 6,373.9
(b) Contractual services 236.0 236.0
(c) Other 526.0 526.0
Subtotal 7,135.9
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR:
(1) State ombudsman:
The purpose of the state ombudsman program is to facilitate and promote cooperation and understanding
between New Mexicans and the agencies of state government, refer any complaints or special problems
residents may have to the proper entities, keep records of activities and submit an annual report to the
governor.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 796.7 796.7
(b) Contractual services 38.7 38.7
(c) Other 97.6 97.6
Subtotal 933.0
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY:
(1) Compliance and project management:
The purpose of the compliance and project management program is to provide information technology
strategic planning, oversight and consulting services to New Mexico government agencies so they can
improve services provided to New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 41

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 1,459.9 1,459.9
(b) Contractual services 50.0 50.0
(c) Other 126.0 126.0
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of information technology professional service
contracts greater than one million dollars in value
reviewed within seven business days 95%
(b) Outcome: Percent of information technology professional service
contracts less than one million dollars in value reviewed
within five business days 98%
(2) Enterprise services:
The purpose of the enterprise services program is to provide reliable and secure infrastructure for
voice, radio, video and data communications through the state’s enterprise data center and
telecommunications network.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 14,146.9 14,146.9
(b) Contractual services 5,229.4 5,229.4
(c) Other 42,181.1 42,181.1
(d) Other financing uses 13,540.3 13,540.3
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of service desk incidents resolved within the
timeframe specified for their priority levels 95%
(b) Output: Number of independent vulnerability scans of information
technology assets identifying potential cyber risks 4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 42

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(3) Equipment replacement revolving funds:
Appropriations:
(a) Other 7,479.4 8,025.7 15,505.1
(4) Broadband access and expansion:
The purpose of the broadband access and expansion program is to achieve enterprising, affordable
broadband solutions for New Mexicans that honor the state’s rich heritage and elevate the quality of
life for all.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,257.8 650.0 1,907.8
(b) Contractual services 125.0 125.0
(c) Other 419.0 419.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the broadband access and expansion
program of the department of information technology includes six hundred fifty thousand dollars
($650,000) from the public school capital outlay fund.
(5) Cybersecurity:
The purpose of the cybersecurity program is to promote a safe and secure enterprise computing
environment and protect the privacy and security of individuals and their information through the
implementation of industry-accepted security policies, standards and procedures.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,397.1 2,397.1
(b) Contractual services 3,572.6 3,572.6
(c) Other 6,284.4 6,284.4
(d) Other financing uses 482.0 482.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 43

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(6) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide management and ensure cost recovery and allocation services
through leadership, policies, procedures and administrative support for the department.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,574.9 482.0 5,056.9
(b) Contractual services 58.6 58.6
(c) Other 472.5 472.5
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent difference between enterprise service revenues and
expenditures for cost recovery of service delivery 10%
Subtotal 113,014.6
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ASSOCIATION:
(1) Pension administration:
The purpose of the pension administration program is to provide information, retirement benefits and an
actuarially sound fund to association members so they can receive the defined benefit they are entitled
to when they retire from public service.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 52.4 12,225.9 12,278.3
(b) Contractual services 24,451.5 24,451.5
(c) Other 6.8 5,588.4 5,595.2
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of years to eliminate actuarial accrued liability 30
(b) Explanatory: Average rate of net return over the last five years
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 44

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 42,325.0
STATE COMMISSION OF PUBLIC RECORDS:
(1) Records, information and archival management:
The purpose of the records, information and archival management program is to develop, implement and
provide tools, methodologies and services for use by, and for the benefit of, government agencies,
historical record repositories and the public so the state can effectively create, preserve, protect and
properly dispose of records, facilitate their use and understanding and protect the interests of New
Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,250.1 3,250.1
(b) Contractual services 88.9 40.0 128.9
(c) Other 145.2 259.8 405.0
Subtotal 3,784.0
SECRETARY OF STATE:
(1) Administration and operations:
The purpose of the administration and operations program is to provide operational services to
commercial and business entities and individuals, including administration of notary public commissions,
uniform commercial code filings, trademark registrations and partnerships and to provide administrative
services needed to carry out elections.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,420.7 5,420.7
(b) Contractual services 598.1 598.1
(c) Other 885.5 90.0 975.5
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 45

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(2) Elections:
The purpose of the elections program is to provide voter education and information on election law and
government ethics to residents, public officials and candidates so they can comply with state law.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,436.8 2,436.8
(b) Contractual services 699.7 780.0 1,479.7
(c) Other 1,368.9 1,368.9
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of eligible voters registered to vote 85%
(b) Outcome: Percent of reporting individuals in compliance with
campaign finance reporting requirements 97%
Subtotal 12,279.7
PERSONNEL BOARD:
(1) Human resource management:
The purpose of the human resource management program is to provide a merit-based system in partnership
with state agencies, appropriate compensation, human resource accountability and employee development
that meets the evolving needs of the agencies, employees, applicants and the public so economy and
efficiency in the management of state affairs may be provided while protecting the interest of the
public.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,553.0 240.0 4,793.0
(b) Contractual services 103.0 103.0
(c) Other 296.6 296.6
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 46

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Average number of days to fill a position from the date of
posting
(b) Explanatory: Classified service vacancy rate
(c) Explanatory: Number of in-pay-band salary increases awarded
(d) Explanatory: Average total compensation of classified service employees
(e) Explanatory: Cost of overtime pay
Subtotal 5,192.6
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES LABOR RELATIONS BOARD:
The purpose of the public employee labor relations board program is to ensure all state and local public
body employees have the option to organize and bargain collectively with their employer.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 247.9 247.9
(b) Contractual services 27.5 27.5
(c) Other 49.4 49.4
Subtotal 324.8
STATE TREASURER:
The purpose of the state treasurer program is to provide a financial environment that maintains maximum
accountability for receipt, investment and disbursement of public funds to protect the financial
interests of New Mexico residents.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,242.2 1,197.2 3.1 4,442.5
(b) Contractual services 726.1 726.1
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 47

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 885.9 65.8 951.7
The other state funds appropriations to the state treasurer program include one million two hundred
sixty-three thousand dollars ($1,263,000) from the local government investment pool from fees,
administrative charges or similar revenues earned by the state treasurer from the operation of the local
government investment pool, established pursuant to Section 6-10-10.1 NMSA 1978. Any unexpended balances
in the state treasurer program remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from the other state funds
appropriations shall revert to the general fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of basis points that one-year annualized investment
return on general fund core portfolio differs from internal
benchmark 10%
Subtotal 6,120.3
TOTAL GENERAL CONTROL 234,363.1 1,662,463.8 205,095.5 29,884.1 2,131,806.5
D. COMMERCE AND INDUSTRY
BOARD OF EXAMINERS FOR ARCHITECTS:
(1) Architectural registration:
The purpose of the architectural registration program is to regulate, through enforcement and licensing,
the professional conduct of architects to protect the health, safety and welfare of the general public
of the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 472.1 472.1
(b) Contractual services 60.9 60.9
(c) Other 84.4 84.4
Subtotal 617.4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 48

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION:
The purpose of the state ethics commission program is to receive, investigate and adjudicate complaints
against public officials, public employees, candidates, those subject to the Campaign Reporting Act,
government contractors, lobbyists and lobbyists' employers and to ensure that public ethics laws are
clear, comprehensive and effective.
(1) Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,597.5 1,597.5
(b) Contractual services 120.0 120.0
(c) Other 185.6 5.0 190.6
Subtotal 1,908.1
BORDER AUTHORITY:
(1) Border development:
The purpose of the border development program is to encourage and foster trade development in the state
by developing port facilities and infrastructure at international ports of entry to attract new
industries and businesses to the New Mexico border and to assist industries, businesses and the
traveling public in their efficient and effective use of ports and related facilities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 492.4 492.4
(b) Contractual services 12.2 45.0 57.2
(c) Other 71.2 64.0 135.2
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Annual trade share of New Mexico ports within the west
Texas and New Mexico region 35%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 49

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Outcome: Number of commercial and noncommercial vehicles passing
through New Mexico ports 1,300,000
Subtotal 684.8
TOURISM DEPARTMENT:
(1) Marketing and promotion:
The purpose of the marketing and promotion program is to produce and provide collateral and editorial
products and special events for the consumer and trade industry so it may increase its awareness of New
Mexico as a premier tourist destination.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,477.8 1,477.8
(b) Contractual services 1,364.8 1,364.8
(c) Other 19,338.4 30.0 19,368.4
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent change in New Mexico leisure and hospitality
employment 2%
(b) Output: Percent change in year-over-year visitor spending 3%
(2) Tourism development:
The purpose of the tourism development program is to provide constituent services for communities,
regions and other entities so they may identify their needs and assistance can be provided to locate
resources to fill those needs, whether internal or external to the organization.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,325.0 184.3 1,509.3
(b) Contractual services 4.0 1.6 5.6
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 50

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 465.9 1,418.7 1,884.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of entities participating in collaborative
applications for the cooperative marketing grant program 75
(3) New Mexico magazine:
The purpose of the New Mexico magazine program is to produce a monthly magazine and ancillary products
for a state and global audience so the audience can learn about New Mexico from a cultural, historical
and educational perspective.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,291.5 1,291.5
(b) Contractual services 830.0 830.0
(c) Other 1,012.2 1,012.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Amount of true adventure guide advertising revenue $700,000
(b) Output: Amount of advertising revenue per issue, in thousands $130
(4) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide administrative assistance to support the department’s
programs and personnel so they may be successful in implementing and reaching their strategic
initiatives and maintaining full compliance with state rules and regulations.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,344.3 2,344.3
(b) Contractual services 54.9 54.9
(c) Other 154.8 154.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 51

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 31,298.2
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT:
(1) Economic development:
The purpose of the economic development program is to assist communities in preparing for their role in
the new economy, focusing on high-quality job creation and improved infrastructure, so New Mexicans can
increase their wealth and improve their quality of life.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,620.9 339.1 3,960.0
(b) Contractual services 2,101.0 2,101.0
(c) Other 8,457.2 8,457.2
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of workers trained by the job training incentive
program 2,000
(b) Outcome: Number of rural jobs created 1,320
(c) Output: Number of jobs created through the use of Local Economic
Development Act funds 3,000
(d) Outcome: Number of jobs created through business relocations
facilitated by the New Mexico economic development
partnership 2,250
(2) Film:
The purpose of the film program is to maintain the core business for the film location services and
stimulate growth in digital film media to maintain the economic vitality of New Mexico's film industry.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 52

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 1,175.8 1,175.8
(b) Contractual services 150.0 150.0
(c) Other 630.5 110.0 740.5
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Amount of direct spending by film industry productions, in
millions $600
(3) Outdoor recreation:
The purpose of the outdoor recreation program is to support economic and community development centered
on outdoor recreation, promote tourism and enhance access to New Mexico’s natural landscapes.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 568.8 568.8
(b) Contractual services 175.0 175.0
(c) Other 530.9 2,896.0 3,426.9
The other state funds appropriation to the outdoor recreation program of the economic development
department includes two million eight hundred ninety-six thousand dollars ($2,896,000) from the land of
enchantment legacy fund.
(4) Creative industries:
The purpose of the creative industries program is to strengthen and advance creative industry economic
development in New Mexico by supporting entrepreneurs, facilitating education and training and serving
as a resource and liaison for stakeholders.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 293.2 293.2
(b) Contractual services 50.0 50.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 53

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 151.8 151.8
(5) Technology and innovation:
The purpose of the technology and innovation program is to coordinate, promote and support New Mexico’s
target sectors and innovation ecosystem through collaboration, strategy and resource development.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,289.0 1,289.0
(b) Contractual services 1,000.0 1,000.0
(c) Other 4,000.0 4,000.0
(6) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide central direction to agency management processes and fiscal
support to agency programs to ensure consistency, continuity and legal compliance.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,106.8 3,106.8
(b) Contractual services 925.5 925.5
(c) Other 614.4 614.4
Subtotal 32,185.9
REGULATION AND LICENSING DEPARTMENT:
(1) Construction industries:
The purpose of the construction industries program is to provide code compliance oversight; issue
licenses, permits and citations; perform inspections; administer exams; process complaints; and enforce
laws, rules and regulations relating to general construction standards to industry professionals.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 54

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 11,846.6 11,846.6
(b) Contractual services 567.0 567.0
(c) Other 2,102.6 2,102.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of commercial plans reviewed within ten working days 90%
(b) Outcome: Percent of residential plans reviewed within five working
days 95%
(c) Output: Number of months to final civil action, referral or
dismissal of complaint 7
(2) Financial institutions:
The purpose of the financial institutions program is to issue charters and licenses; perform
examinations; investigate complaints; enforce laws, rules and regulations; and promote investor
protection and confidence so capital formation is maximized and a secure financial infrastructure is
available to support economic development.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 107.7 5,603.3 5,711.0
(b) Contractual services 269.1 269.1
(c) Other 743.7 743.7
(d) Other financing uses 481.4 481.4
The other state funds appropriations to the financial institutions program of the regulation and
licensing department include four million six hundred ninety-one thousand dollars ($4,691,000) from the
mortgage regulatory fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of completed applications processed within ninety
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 55

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
days by type of application 100%
(3) Alcohol beverage control:
The purpose of the alcohol beverage control program is to issue, deny, suspend or revoke licenses
allowed under the Liquor Control Act to protect the health, safety and welfare of the residents of and
visitors to New Mexico.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,173.9 630.6 1,804.5
(b) Contractual services 13.3 13.3
(c) Other 639.8 639.8
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Average number of days to resolve an administrative
citation that does not require a hearing 160
(b) Outcome: Average number of days to issue a restaurant beer and wine
liquor license 130
(4) Securities:
The purpose of the securities program is to protect the integrity of the capital markets in New Mexico
by setting standards for licensed professionals, investigating complaints, educating the public and
enforcing the law.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 382.1 1,303.7 77.0 1,762.8
(b) Contractual services 74.0 74.0
(c) Other 768.7 768.7
The internal services funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the securities program of the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 56

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
regulation and licensing department includes seventy-seven thousand dollars ($77,000) from the
securities enforcement and investor education fund.
(5) Boards and commissions:
The purpose of the boards and commissions program is to provide efficient licensing, compliance and
regulatory services to protect the public by ensuring licensing professionals are qualified to practice.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 8,953.6 8,953.6
(b) Contractual services 180.0 652.7 832.7
(c) Other 4,106.5 4,106.5
(d) Other financing uses 488.3 8,810.0 9,298.3
The general fund appropriations to the boards and commissions program of the regulation and licensing
department include four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) for the substitute care advisory
council.
The internal services funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the boards and commissions
program of the regulation and licensing department includes one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from
federal Title IV-E revenue for the substitute care advisory council. The regulation and licensing
department shall establish a memorandum of understanding with the children, youth and families
department to reimburse federal Title IV-E eligible expenses associated with the substitute care
advisory council.
(6) Cannabis control:
The purpose of the cannabis control program is to regulate and license cannabis producers,
manufacturers, retailers, couriers, testing facilities and research laboratories operating in the
medical and adult-use markets to ensure public health and safety.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 57

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 616.6 2,617.4 3,234.0
(b) Contractual services 1,023.1 432.1 1,455.2
(c) Other 2,089.3 2,089.3
The other state funds appropriations to the cannabis control program of the regulation and licensing
department include one million four hundred ninety-four thousand seven hundred dollars ($1,494,700) from
cannabis licensing fees for general operations of the cannabis control program.
(7) Manufactured housing:
The purpose of the manufactured housing program is to provide code compliance oversight; issue licenses,
permits and citations; perform inspections; administer exams; process complaints; and enforce laws,
rules and regulations relating to manufactured housing standards.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 635.2 867.4 1,502.6
(b) Contractual services 90.7 90.7
(c) Other 100.0 195.2 25.0 320.2
The other state funds appropriations to the manufactured housing program of the regulation and licensing
department include one million sixty-two thousand six hundred dollars ($1,062,600) from the mortgage
regulatory fund for the general operations of the manufactured housing program.
(8) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide leadership and centralized direction, financial management,
information systems support and human resources support for all agency organizations in compliance with
governing regulations, statutes and procedures so they can license qualified applicants, verify
compliance with statutes and resolve or mediate consumer complaints.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 58

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,220.2 2,016.6 4,236.8
(b) Contractual services 540.7 540.7
(c) Other 684.6 684.6
The internal services funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the program support program of the
regulation and licensing department include four hundred eighty-one thousand four hundred dollars
($481,400) from the mortgage regulatory fund, two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000) from the
securities education fund and two million five hundred forty thousand five hundred dollars ($2,540,500)
from the boards and commissions flow-through fund for the general operations of the program support
program.
Subtotal 64,129.7
PUBLIC REGULATION COMMISSION:
(1) Public regulation commission:
The purpose of the public regulation commission program is to fulfill the constitutional and legislative
mandates regarding regulated industries through rulemaking, adjudications and policy initiatives to
ensure the provision of adequate and reliable services at fair, just and reasonable rates so the
interests of the consumers and regulated industries are balanced to promote and protect the public
interest.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 13,678.1 2,138.2 1,421.5 17,237.8
(b) Contractual services 748.9 81.0 829.9
(c) Other 1,999.5 259.9 286.8 2,546.2
(2) Special revenues:
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 59

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Other financing uses 2,479.1 2,479.1
Subtotal 23,093.0
OFFICE OF SUPERINTENDENT OF INSURANCE:
(1) Insurance policy:
The purpose of the insurance policy program is to ensure easy public access to reliable insurance
products that meet consumers' needs and are underwritten by dependable, reputable, financially sound
companies that charge fair rates and are represented by trustworthy, qualified agents, while promoting a
positive competitive business climate.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 698.2 12,969.1 13,667.3
(b) Contractual services 1,011.6 3,004.1 610.0 4,625.7
(c) Other 183.3 1,856.3 4.3 2,043.9
(d) Other financing uses 205.6 205.6
(2) Insurance fraud and auto theft:
The purpose of the insurance fraud and auto theft program is to reduce the overall incidence of
insurance fraud, arson and auto theft related transactions through community outreach, training and
anti-fraud programs.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,405.2 2,405.2
(b) Contractual services 64.1 64.1
(c) Other 637.4 637.4
(d) Other financing uses 411.0 411.0
(3) Patient’s compensation fund:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 60

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The purpose of the patient’s compensation fund program is to ensure the availability and affordability
of medical liability insurance for healthcare providers in New Mexico.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 259.6 259.6
(b) Contractual services 2,292.7 2,292.7
(c) Other 102,309.9 102,309.9
(4) Special revenues:
Appropriations:
(a) Other financing uses 17,212.9 17,212.9
Subtotal 146,135.3
NEW MEXICO MEDICAL BOARD:
(1) Licensing and certification:
The purpose of the licensing and certification program is to provide regulation and licensure to
healthcare providers regulated by the New Mexico medical board and to ensure competent and ethical
medical care to consumers.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,016.5 2,016.5
(b) Contractual services 1,290.8 1,290.8
(c) Other 674.3 674.3
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of biennial physician assistant licenses issued or
renewed 715
(b) Outcome: Number of days to issue a physician license 30
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 61

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 3,981.6
BOARD OF NURSING:
(1) Licensing and certification:
The purpose of the licensing and certification program is to provide regulations to nurses, hemodialysis
technicians, medication aides and their education and training programs so they provide competent and
professional healthcare services to consumers.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,043.3 3,043.3
(b) Contractual services 155.0 155.0
(c) Other 782.7 2.2 784.9
(d) Other financing uses 45.0 200.0 245.0
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of certified registered nurse anesthetist licenses
active on June 30
(b) Output: Number of advanced practice nurses contacted regarding
high-risk prescribing and prescription monitoring program
compliance, based on the pharmacy board's prescription
monitoring program reports 250
Subtotal 4,228.2
NEW MEXICO STATE FAIR:
The purpose of the New Mexico state fair program is to promote the New Mexico state fair as a year-round
operation with venues, events and facilities that provide for greater use of the assets of the agency.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 62

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
employee benefits 100.0 8,714.5 8,814.5
(b) Contractual services 175.0 3,378.6 3,553.6
(c) Other 100.0 4,049.7 4,149.7
The general fund appropriations to the New Mexico state fair include three hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars ($375,000) for the African American performing arts center operations.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of paid attendees at annual state fair event 430,000
Subtotal 16,517.8
STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR PROFESSIONAL
ENGINEERS AND PROFESSIONAL SURVEYORS:
(1) Regulation and licensing:
The purpose of the regulation and licensing program is to regulate the practices of engineering and
surveying in the state as they relate to the welfare of the public in safeguarding life, health and
property and to provide consumers with licensed professional engineers and licensed professional
surveyors.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 982.2 982.2
(b) Contractual services 192.4 192.4
(c) Other 382.0 382.0
Subtotal 1,556.6
GAMING CONTROL BOARD:
(1) Gaming control:
The purpose of the gaming control program is to provide strictly regulated gaming activities and to
promote responsible gaming to New Mexicans so they can attain a strong level of confidence in the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 63

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
board's administration of gambling laws and assurance the state has competitive gaming free from
criminal and corruptive elements and influences.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,064.4 6,064.4
(b) Contractual services 820.7 820.7
(c) Other 1,110.2 1,110.2
Subtotal 7,995.3
STATE RACING COMMISSION:
(1) Horse racing regulation:
The purpose of the horse racing regulation program is to provide regulation in an equitable manner to
New Mexico’s pari-mutuel horse racing industry and to protect the interest of wagering patrons and the
state of New Mexico in a manner that promotes a climate of economic prosperity for horsemen, horse
owners and racetrack management.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,867.9 2,867.9
(b) Contractual services 341.6 2,800.0 3,141.6
(c) Other 439.0 1,500.0 1,939.0
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of equine samples testing positive for illegal
substances 1%
(b) Explanatory: Amount collected from pari-mutuel revenues and license fees
to the general fund, in millions
(c) Explanatory: Number of horse fatalities per one thousand starts
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 64

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 7,948.5
BOARD OF VETERINARY MEDICINE:
(1) Veterinary licensing and regulatory:
The purpose of the veterinary licensing and regulatory program is to regulate the profession of
veterinary medicine in accordance with the Veterinary Practice Act and to promote continuous improvement
in veterinary practices and management to protect the public.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 264.4 264.4
(b) Contractual services 118.1 118.1
(c) Other 1,903.5 1,903.5
Subtotal 2,286.0
CUMBRES AND TOLTEC SCENIC RAILROAD COMMISSION:
The purpose of the Cumbres and Toltec scenic railroad commission program is to provide railroad
excursions through, into and over the scenic San Juan mountains.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 122.3 122.3
(b) Contractual services 133.6 5,459.0 5,592.6
(c) Other 138.1 138.1
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of passengers 36,000
Subtotal 5,853.0
OFFICE OF MILITARY BASE PLANNING AND SUPPORT:
The purpose of the office of military base planning and support program is to provide advice to the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 65

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
governor and lieutenant governor on New Mexico's four military installations, to work with community
support groups, to ensure state initiatives are complementary of community actions and to identify and
address appropriate state-level issues that will contribute to the long-term viability of New Mexico
military installations.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 205.6 205.6
(b) Contractual services 129.2 129.2
(c) Other 80.2 80.2
Subtotal 415.0
SPACEPORT AUTHORITY:
The purpose of the spaceport authority program is to finance, design, develop, construct, equip and
safely operate spaceport America and thereby generate significant high technology economic development
throughout the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,257.8 4,257.8
(b) Contractual services 110.7 6,521.5 6,632.2
(c) Other 2,732.8 2,732.8
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of aerospace customers and tenants 50
Subtotal 13,622.8
TOTAL COMMERCE AND INDUSTRY 115,095.7 213,891.5 32,783.3 2,686.7 364,457.2
E. AGRICULTURE, ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 66

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(1) Museums and historic sites:
The purpose of the museums and historic sites program is to develop and enhance the quality of state
museums and monuments by providing the highest standards in exhibitions, performances and programs
showcasing the arts, history and science of New Mexico and cultural traditions worldwide.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 28,868.8 2,378.1 217.0 31,463.9
(b) Contractual services 556.6 416.9 973.5
(c) Other 5,862.5 2,131.5 50.5 8,044.5
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of people served through programs and services
offered by museums and historic sites 1,600,000
(b) Outcome: Amount of earned revenue from admissions, rentals and other
activity $4,250,000
(2) Preservation:
The purpose of the preservation program is to identify, study and protect New Mexico's unique cultural
resources, including its archaeological sites, architectural and engineering achievements, cultural
landscapes and diverse heritage.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,476.0 1,006.8 68.5 907.4 3,458.7
(b) Contractual services 2.0 160.7 11.0 45.0 218.7
(c) Other 148.6 1,727.5 110.5 253.6 2,240.2
The other state funds appropriations to the preservation program of the cultural affairs department
include one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the department of transportation for archaeological
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 67

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
studies as needed for highway projects.
The other state funds appropriations to the preservation program of cultural affairs department
include one million five hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($1,545,000) from the land of enchantment
legacy fund.
(3) Library services:
The purpose of the library services program is to empower libraries to support the educational, economic
and health goals of their communities and to deliver direct library and information services to those
who need them.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,921.6 936.0 3,857.6
(b) Contractual services 268.9 268.9
(c) Other 1,884.4 75.0 1,787.1 862.0 4,608.5
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of library transactions using electronic resources
funded by the New Mexico state library 3,500,000
(4) Arts:
The purpose of the arts program is to preserve, enhance and develop the arts in New Mexico through
partnerships, public awareness and education.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 953.1 305.0 1,258.1
(b) Contractual services 65.0 40.0 105.0
(c) Other 772.3 15.0 505.0 1,292.3
(5) Music commission:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 68

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The purpose of the music commission program is to protect, promote and preserve the musical traditions
of New Mexico, to foster appreciation of the value of music and to encourage the educational, creative
and professional musical activities of the residents of New Mexico.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 51.5 51.5
(b) Other 145.0 145.0
(6) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to deliver effective, efficient, high-quality services in concert with
the core agenda of the governor.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,871.8 4,871.8
(b) Contractual services 416.0 38.4 454.4
(c) Other 361.4 361.4
Subtotal 63,674.0
NEW MEXICO LIVESTOCK BOARD:
(1) Livestock inspection:
The purpose of the livestock inspection program is to protect the livestock industry from loss of
livestock by theft or straying and to help control the spread of dangerous livestock diseases.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,660.0 3,001.4 8,661.4
(b) Contractual services 346.5 346.5
(c) Other 3.2 2,492.3 2,495.5
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 69

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(2) Meat inspection:
The purpose of the meat inspection program is to ensure the safety, quality and integrity of meat
products for human consumption by enforcing rigorous inspection standards that meet or exceed federal
requirements and, through thorough inspections, protect public health, promote consumer confidence and
support the state's livestock industry.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,493.3 1,493.3
(b) Contractual services 40.0 40.0
(c) Other 242.6 242.6
Subtotal 13,279.3
DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE:
(1) Field operations:
The purpose of the field operations program is to promote and assist the implementation of law
enforcement, habitat and public outreach programs throughout the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 10,006.7 331.1 10,337.8
(b) Contractual services 98.7 98.7
(c) Other 2,807.3 2,807.3
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of conservation officer hours spent in the field
checking for compliance 58,000
(2) Conservation services:
The purpose of the conservation services program is to provide information and technical guidance to any
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 70

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
person wishing to conserve and enhance wildlife habitat and recover indigenous species of threatened and
endangered wildlife.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,994.4 696.2 8,670.9 16,361.5
(b) Contractual services 1,128.6 1,238.9 2,204.1 4,571.6
(c) Other 6,661.3 2,313.2 5,596.4 14,570.9
(d) Other financing uses 182.3 182.3
The other state funds appropriations to the conservation services program of the department of wildlife
in the other financing uses category includes one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from the game
protection fund for Ute Dam operations and eighty-two thousand three hundred dollars ($82,300) from the
game protection fund for Eagle Nest dam operations for the interstate stream compact compliance and
water development program of the state engineer. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert to the game protection fund.
The other state funds appropriations to the conservation services program of the department of
wildlife include four million three hundred forty-eight thousand three hundred forty dollars
($4,348,340) from the land of enchantment legacy fund.
The other state funds appropriations from the land of enchantment legacy fund to the conservation
services program of the department of wildlife include nine hundred thirty-two thousand four hundred
dollars ($932,400) for capital improvements to the department's Red River fishery.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of elk licenses offered on an annual basis in New
Mexico 35,000
(b) Outcome: Percent of public hunting licenses drawn by New Mexico
resident hunters 90%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 71

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Output: Number of pounds of annual output of fish from the
department's hatchery system 600,000
(3) Wildlife depredation and nuisance abatement:
The purpose of the wildlife depredation and nuisance abatement program is to provide complaint
administration and intervention processes to private landowners, leaseholders and other New Mexicans so
they may be relieved of, and precluded from, property damage and annoyances or risks to public safety
caused by protected wildlife.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 458.7 458.7
(b) Contractual services 226.7 226.7
(c) Other 612.1 612.1
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of depredation complaints resolved within the
mandated one-year timeframe 96%
(4) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide an adequate and flexible system of direction, oversight,
accountability and support to all divisions so they may successfully attain planned outcomes for all
department programs.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,004.4 318.4 6,322.8
(b) Contractual services 384.9 27.1 412.0
(c) Other 3,784.3 155.4 3,939.7
Subtotal 60,902.1
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 72

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL RESOURCES DEPARTMENT:
(1) Energy conservation and management:
The purpose of the energy conservation and management program is to develop and implement clean energy
programs to decrease per capita energy consumption; use New Mexico's substantial renewable energy
resources; minimize local, regional and global air emissions; lessen dependence on foreign oil and
reduce in-state water demands associated with fossil-fueled electrical generation.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,814.3 465.2 4,133.8 7,413.3
(b) Contractual services 420.3 1,891.6 30,000.0 32,311.9
(c) Other 271.1 35.0 1,684.1 1,990.2
(2) Healthy forests:
The purpose of the healthy forests program is to promote the health of New Mexico's forest lands by
managing wildfires, mitigating urban-interface fire threats and providing stewardship of private and
state forest lands and associated watersheds.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,287.8 8,117.0 17,404.8
(b) Contractual services 344.3 2,400.0 4,606.0 17,713.5 25,063.8
(c) Other 1,877.4 4,246.3 1,738.0 19,839.4 27,701.1
(d) Other financing uses 256.2 256.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of nonfederal wildland firefighters provided
professional and technical incident command system training 2,500
(b) Output: Number of acres treated in New Mexico's forests and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 73

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
watersheds 20,000
The other state funds appropriations to the state forestry program of the energy, minerals and natural
resources department include four million three hundred forty-four thousand eight hundred eighty dollars
($4,344,880) from the land of enchantment legacy fund.
(3) State parks:
The purpose of the state parks program is to create the best recreational opportunities possible in
state parks by preserving cultural and natural resources, continuously improving facilities and
providing quality, fun activities and to do it all efficiently.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 11,842.3 7,901.1 732.7 20,476.1
(b) Contractual services 89.7 1,930.0 2,321.1 4,340.8
(c) Other 3,500.2 4,343.5 500.0 14,872.8 23,216.5
(d) Other financing uses 611.1 611.1
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Number of visitors to state parks
(b) Explanatory: Amount of self-generated revenue per visitor, in dollars
(4) Mine reclamation:
The purpose of the mine reclamation program is to implement the state laws that regulate the operation
and reclamation of hard rock and coal mining facilities and to reclaim abandoned mine sites.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,049.1 463.7 79.2 2,714.8 5,306.8
(b) Contractual services 91.4 31.4 410.0 13,536.8 14,069.6
(c) Other 148.4 116.1 17.9 841.2 1,123.6
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 74

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(d) Other financing uses 48.2 48.2
(5) Oil and gas conservation:
The purpose of the oil and gas conservation program is to assure the conservation and responsible
development of oil and gas resources through professional, dynamic regulation.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,988.9 226.6 1,398.8 11,614.3
(b) Contractual services 362.7 21,389.4 30,476.5 52,228.6
(c) Other 879.0 2,525.4 266.0 3,670.4
(d) Other financing uses 299.7 299.7
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of inspections of oil and gas wells and associated
facilities 35,000
(b) Output: Number of abandoned wells properly plugged 70
(6) Program leadership and support:
The purpose of the program leadership and support program is to provide leadership, set policy and
provide support for every division in achieving their goals.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,746.1 1,145.8 1,127.8 7,019.7
(b) Contractual services 203.0 25.6 12.0 240.6
(c) Other 132.7 168.8 169.3 470.8
Subtotal 256,878.1
YOUTH CONSERVATION CORPS:
The purpose of the youth conservation corps program is to provide funding for the employment of New
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 75

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Mexicans between the ages of fourteen and twenty-five to work on projects that will improve New Mexico's
natural, cultural, historical and agricultural resources.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 376.5 376.5
(b) Contractual services 5,700.0 5,700.0
(c) Other 157.5 157.5
(d) Other financing uses 125.0 125.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of youth employed annually 840
Subtotal 6,359.0
STATE LAND OFFICE:
(1) Land trust stewardship:
The purpose of the land trust stewardship program is to generate sustainable revenue from state trust
lands to support public education and other beneficiary institutions and to build partnerships with all
New Mexicans to conserve, protect and maintain the highest level of stewardship for these lands so that
they may be a significant legacy for generations to come.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 25,871.5 25,871.5
(b) Contractual services 3,105.2 3,105.2
(c) Other 3,393.1 3,393.1
The state land office is authorized to hold in suspense amounts eligible, because of the sale of state
royalty interests, for tax credits under Section 29 of the Internal Revenue Code above those amounts
required by law to be transferred to the land grant permanent fund. The state land office may expend as
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 76

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
much of the money so held in suspense, as well as additional money held in escrow accounts resulting
from the sales and money held in fund balances, as is necessary to repurchase the royalty interests
pursuant to the agreements.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Amount of trust revenue generated, in millions $2,200
(b) Outcome: Amount of revenue generated through oil and natural gas
audit activities, in millions $5
(c) Output: Average amount of income per acre from oil, natural gas and
mining activities, in dollars $1,200
(d) Output: Number of acres treated to achieve desired conditions for
future sustainability 22,000
Subtotal 32,369.8
STATE ENGINEER:
(1) Water resource allocation:
The purpose of the water resource allocation program is to provide for the efficient use of the
available surface and underground waters of the state so any person can maintain their quality of life
and to provide safety inspections of all nonfederal dams within the state so owners and operators of
such dams can operate the dams safely.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 20,771.5 856.0 256.3 21,883.8
(b) Contractual services 220.5 406.0 626.5
(c) Other 1,588.8 146.2 317.9 2,052.9
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the water resource allocation program
of the state engineer include seven hundred twenty-three thousand nine hundred dollars ($723,900) from
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 77

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the improvement of Rio Grande income fund and two hundred fifty-six thousand three hundred dollars
($256,300) from the irrigation works construction fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Average number of unprotested new and pending applications
processed per month 35
(b) Outcome: Number of transactions abstracted annually into the water
administration technical engineering resource system
database 25,000
(2) Interstate stream compact compliance and water development:
The purpose of the interstate stream compact compliance and water development program is to provide
resolution of federal and interstate water issues and to develop water resources and stream systems for
the people of New Mexico so they can have maximum sustained beneficial use of available water resources.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,374.4 120.0 3,323.9 8,818.3
(b) Contractual services 500.0 35.0 4,728.7 5,263.7
(c) Other 811.1 763.8 1,215.7 2,790.6
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the interstate stream compact
compliance and water development program of the state engineer include seven million seven hundred
twenty thousand six hundred dollars ($7,720,600) from the New Mexico irrigation works construction fund,
seven hundred thirteen thousand two hundred dollars ($713,200) from the improvement of Rio Grande income
fund, six hundred fifty-two thousand two hundred dollars ($652,200) from the New Mexico unit fund, one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from the game protection fund for Ute dam operations and eighty-two
thousand three hundred dollars ($82,300) from the game protection fund for Eagle Nest dam operations.
Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from these appropriations shall revert
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 78

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
to the appropriate fund.
Revenue from the sale of water to United States government agencies by New Mexico for the emergency
drought water agreement and from contractual reimbursements associated with the interstate stream
compact compliance and water development program is appropriated to the interstate stream compact
compliance and water development program to be used per the agreement with the United States bureau of
reclamation.
The interstate stream commission's authority to make loans for irrigation improvements includes
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for loans to irrigation districts, conservancy districts and
soil and water conservation districts for re-loan to farmers for implementation of water conservation
improvements.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of acre-feet of cumulative state-line delivery
credit per the Pecos river compact and amended decree at
the end of the calendar year 161,000
(b) Outcome: Number of acre-feet of cumulative state-line delivery
credit per the Rio Grande compact at the end of the
calendar year -150,000
(3) Litigation and adjudication:
The purpose of the litigation and adjudication program is to obtain a judicial determination and
definition of water rights within each stream system and underground basin to effectively perform water
rights administration and meet interstate stream obligations.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,790.2 2,669.1 1,661.7 8,121.0
(b) Contractual services 568.3 1,067.5 1,635.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 79

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 466.1 120.0 586.1
(d) Other financing uses 80.0 80.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the litigation and adjudication
program of the state engineer include one million six hundred sixty-one thousand seven hundred dollars
($1,661,700) from the irrigation works construction fund and one million sixty-seven thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,067,500) from the improvement of Rio Grande income fund.
The other state funds appropriations to the litigation and adjudication program of the state
engineer include two million eight hundred sixty-nine thousand one hundred dollars ($2,869,100) from the
water project fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of offers to defendants in adjudications 330
(b) Outcome: Percent of all water rights claims with judicial
determinations 76%
(4) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide necessary administrative support to the agency programs so
they may be successful in reaching their goals and objectives.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,583.5 5,583.5
(b) Contractual services 219.7 219.7
(c) Other 817.4 817.4

Subtotal 58,479.3
TOTAL AGRICULTURE, ENERGY AND
NATURAL RESOURCES 146,824.8 145,824.9 27,909.4 171,382.5 491,941.6
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 80

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
F. HEALTH, HOSPITALS AND HUMAN SERVICES
COMMISSION ON STATUS OF WOMEN:
(1) Status of women:
The purpose of the status of women program is to provide information, public events, leadership, support
services and career development to individuals, agencies and women's organizations so they can improve
the economic, health and social status of women in New Mexico.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 285.3 285.3
(b) Contractual services 92.7 92.7
(c) Other 111.0 111.0
Subtotal 489.0
OFFICE OF AFRICAN AMERICAN AFFAIRS:
(1) Public awareness:
The purpose of the public awareness program is to provide information and advocacy services to all New
Mexicans and to empower African Americans of New Mexico to improve their quality of life.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 954.6 954.6
(b) Contractual services 268.6 268.6
(c) Other 151.4 151.4
Subtotal 1,374.6
COMMISSION FOR DEAF AND HARD-OF-HEARING PERSONS:
(1) Deaf and hard-of-hearing:
The purpose of the deaf and hard-of-hearing program is to serve as a dynamic resource that will enhance
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 81

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the quality of life for deaf and hard-of-hearing residents of New Mexico by being the recognized
advocate on important issues impacting the deaf and hard-of-hearing community, the proactive provider of
innovative programs and services and the statewide umbrella and information clearinghouse for interested
individuals, organizations, agencies and institutions.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 887.3 706.2 1,593.5
(b) Contractual services 910.1 461.0 250.6 1,621.7
(c) Other 198.7 36.6 44.8 280.1
(d) Other financing uses 116.5 116.5
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the deaf and hard-of-hearing program
of the commission for deaf and hard-of-hearing persons in the other financing uses category includes
ninety-one thousand five hundred dollars ($91,500) to transfer to the rehabilitation services program of
the vocational rehabilitation division to match with federal funds to provide deaf and hard-of-hearing
rehabilitation services and twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to transfer to the signed language
interpreting practices board of the regulation and licensing department for interpreter licensure
services.
The general fund appropriation to the deaf and hard-of-hearing program of the commission for deaf
and hard-of-hearing persons in the contractual services category includes four hundred fifty-six
thousand four hundred dollars ($456,400) for deaf and deaf-and-blind support service provider programs.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of accessible technology equipment distributions 1,350
Subtotal 3,611.8
MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR. COMMISSION:
The purpose of the Martin Luther King, Jr. commission program is to promote Martin Luther King, Jr.'s
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 82

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
nonviolent principles and philosophy to the people of New Mexico through remembrance, celebration and
action so that everyone gets involved in making a difference toward the improvement of interracial
cooperation and reduction of youth violence in our communities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 263.8 263.8
(b) Contractual services 148.0 148.0
(c) Other 203.3 203.3
Subtotal 615.1
COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND:
(1) Blind services:
The purpose of the blind services program is to assist blind or visually impaired New Mexicans to
achieve economic and social equality so they can have independence based on their personal interests and
abilities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,319.0 157.6 209.6 3,964.3 6,650.5
(b) Contractual services 87.7 167.3 255.0
(c) Other 757.8 10,107.1 2,433.4 13,298.3
(d) Other financing uses 101.1 101.1
The general fund appropriation to the blind services program of the commission for the blind in the
other financing uses category includes up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to transfer to the
rehabilitation services program of the vocational rehabilitation division to match with federal funds to
provide rehabilitation services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans.
The general fund appropriation to the blind services program of the commission for the blind in the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 83

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
other financing uses category includes one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) to transfer to the
independent living services program of the vocational rehabilitation division to match with federal
funds to provide independent living services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans, contingent on
the amendment of the state plan for independent living.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the blind services program of the
commission for the blind includes two hundred nine thousand six hundred dollars ($209,600) from the
vocational rehabilitation division to provide services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans.
Any unexpended balances in the commission for the blind remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
from appropriations made from the general fund shall not revert.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Amount of average hourly wage for the blind or visually
impaired person $22.50
(b) Outcome: Number of people who avoided or delayed moving into a
nursing home or assisted living facility as a result of
receiving independent living services 135
Subtotal 20,304.9
INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT:
(1) Indian affairs:
The purpose of the Indian affairs program is to coordinate intergovernmental and interagency programs
concerning tribal governments and the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,997.3 2,997.3
(b) Contractual services 630.1 630.1
(c) Other 1,247.7 249.3 1,497.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 84

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the Indian affairs program of the
Indian affairs department includes two hundred forty-nine thousand three hundred dollars ($249,300) from
the tobacco settlement program fund for tobacco cessation and prevention programs for Native American
communities throughout the state.
Subtotal 5,124.4
EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND CARE DEPARTMENT:
(1) Family support and early intervention:
The purpose of the family support and early intervention program is to provide a culturally sensitive
early childhood comprehensive system of supports for families and young children, including home
visiting, early intervention services and perinatal case management services.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,850.1 661.5 3,772.4 1,065.0 8,349.0
(b) Contractual services 34,468.5 281.2 13,609.8 6,314.0 54,673.5
(c) Other 21,786.3 262.0 11,147.9 774.6 33,970.8
(d) Other financing uses 11,901.6 5,000.0 16,901.6
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the family support and early
intervention program of the early childhood education and care department include seven hundred seventy-
seven thousand two hundred dollars ($777,200) from the early childhood education and care program fund
for employee benefits and other administrative rate increases.
The general fund appropriations to the family support and early intervention program of the early
childhood education and care department shall be reduced by nine million four hundred thousand dollars
($9,400,000) and an equal amount transferred from the permanent school fund to the common school current
fund authorized by the 2022 amendment in Paragraph (2) of Subsection H of Section 7 of Article 12 of the
constitution of New Mexico for early childhood education is appropriated in lieu thereof including six
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 85

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
million four hundred thousand dollars ($6,400,000) for expanded home visiting services and three million
dollars ($3,000,000) to the family, infant, toddler program for rate increases and services and state
medicaid matching rates.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Average annual number of home visits per family 23
(2) Early care and education:
The purpose of the early care and education program is to ensure New Mexicans have access to high-
quality, healthy, safe and supportive early childhood education environments for children and their
families, as well as access to healthy meals.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,848.2 2,127.9 10,728.0 14,704.1
(b) Contractual services 524.4 3,075.0 3,599.4
(c) Other 2,747.4 1,100.0 519,081.7 147,470.3 670,399.4
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the early care and education program
of the early childhood education and care department include thirty-one million five hundred twenty-
seven thousand five hundred dollars ($31,527,500) from the federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant for childcare for children or families eligible for or at risk of needing federal
temporary assistance for needy families block grant services.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the early care and education
program of the early childhood education and care department include seven million three hundred ninety-
five thousand one hundred dollars ($7,395,100) of which five million dollars ($5,000,000) is for
childcare and two million three hundred ninety-five thousand one hundred dollars ($2,395,100) is for
employee benefits and other administrative rate increases from the early childhood care and education
program fund.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 86

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the early care and education
program of the early childhood education and care department include one hundred fifty-five million
dollars ($155,000,000) from the early childhood care and education program fund for childcare
assistance, contingent on enactment of Senate Bill 241 or similar legislation of the second session of
the fifty-seventh legislature increasing the distribution from the early childhood education and care
fund.
The early childhood education and care department shall prioritize childcare assistance awards to
families who are receiving temporary assistance for needy families, have incomes below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level or are at risk of federal temporary assistance for needy families
block grant services as approved by the early childhood education and care department, including
families involved with, or children in the custody of, the children, youth and families department child
protective services program, families experiencing homelessness, participants with a plan of safe care
pursuant to Section 32A-3A NMSA 1978 or children in kinship care with legal custody or kinship
guardianship.
The appropriations in the internal service funds/interagency transfers from the early childhood
education and care program fund and the general fund appropriations to the early care and education
program of the early childhood education and care department include sixty million dollars ($60,000,000)
for a wage and career ladder to support wage increases for educators established through the childcare
assistance rates and the wage and career ladder.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of infants and toddlers participating in the
childcare assistance program enrolled in childcare programs
with four or five stars 80%
(3) Policy, research and quality initiatives:
The purpose of the policy, research and quality initiatives program is to oversee the early childhood
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 87

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
education and care department's quality initiatives, including workforce development, coaching and
consultation, infant early childhood mental health consultation and data analysis and reporting and
performance. The program also conducts internal audits to ensure program integrity for the childcare
assistance program.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,160.1 346.3 776.1 5,282.5
(b) Contractual services 15,168.8 250.0 20,014.7 1,630.2 37,063.7
(c) Other 349.4 116.7 21.6 487.7
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the policy, research and quality
initiatives program of the early childhood education and care department include four hundred seventy-
four thousand two hundred dollars ($474,200) for employee benefits and other administrative rate
increases from the early childhood care and education program fund.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the policy, research and quality
initiatives program of the early childhood education and care department include one million dollars
($1,000,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund for infant mental health.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent of early childhood professionals, including tribal
educators, with degrees or credentials 77%
(4) Prekindergarten:
The purpose of the prekindergarten program is to ensure New Mexicans have access to a high-quality
mixed-delivery early childhood education system.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,317.3 308.4 2,625.7
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 88

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Contractual services 7,550.1 760.0 8,310.1
(c) Other 207,183.1 71,764.5 278,947.6
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the prekindergarten program of the
early childhood education and care department include two hundred eighty-six thousand three hundred
dollars ($286,300) for employee benefits and other administrative rate increases from the early
childhood care and education program fund.
The general fund appropriations to the prekindergarten program of the early childhood education and
care department shall be reduced by fourteen million five hundred thousand dollars ($14,500,000) and an
equal amount transferred from the permanent school fund to the common school current fund authorized by
the 2022 amendment in Paragraph (2) of Subsection H of Section 7 of Article 12 of the constitution of
New Mexico for early childhood education is appropriated in lieu thereof in the prekindergarten program
for expansion of early prekindergarten and quality support and coaching.
The general fund appropriations to the prekindergarten program of the early childhood education and
care department include thirteen million five hundred thousand dollars ($13,500,000) for expansion of
early prekindergarten in communities who do not have more than 80 percent capacity in fiscal year 2026.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of children enrolled for at least six months in the
state-funded New Mexico prekindergarten program who are on
track for kindergarten utilizing the iStation screening tool 80%
(b) Outcome: Percent of children who participated in a New Mexico
prekindergarten program for at least nine months who were
screened with the iStation assessment tool and were found
to be on track in math in kindergarten 80%
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide leadership and support for the early childhood education
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 89

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
and care department through strategic planning, legal services, information and technology services,
financial services and budget, human resources and background checks.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,864.7 2,183.4 2,477.1 11,525.2
(b) Contractual services 3,791.5 8,590.2 1,739.2 14,120.9
(c) Other 2,087.6 1,900.0 3,987.6
(d) Other financing uses 40,000.0 40,000.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to program support of the early
childhood education and care department include three hundred seventeen thousand six hundred dollars
($317,600) for employee benefits and other administrative rate increases from the early childhood care
and education program fund.
Subtotal 1,204,948.8
AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES DEPARTMENT:
(1) Consumer and elder rights:
The purpose of the consumer and elder rights program is to provide current information, assistance,
counseling, education and support to older individuals and people with disabilities, residents of long-
term care facilities and their families and caregivers that allow them to protect their rights and make
informed choices about quality services.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,031.9 900.0 1,150.4 5,082.3
(b) Contractual services 310.0 590.3 900.3
(c) Other 261.1 270.2 531.3
Performance measures:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 90

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Quality: Number of calls received by the call center 90
(b) Outcome: Percent of residents who remained in the community six
months following a nursing home care transition 98%
(2) Aging network:
The purpose of the aging network program is to provide supportive social and nutrition services for
older individuals and persons with disabilities so they can remain independent and involved in their
communities and to provide training, education and work experience to older individuals so they can
enter or reenter the workforce and receive appropriate income and benefits.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,652.3 34.5 455.3 2,142.1
(b) Contractual services 939.9 10.0 119.2 1,069.1
(c) Other 45,343.3 71.3 11,450.1 56,864.7
Any unexpended balances remaining in the aging network program of the aging and long-term services
department from the conference on aging at the end of fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from
other state funds for the conference on aging shall not revert to the general fund.
Any unexpended balances remaining in the aging network from the tax refund contribution senior
fund, which provides for the provision of the supplemental senior services throughout the state, at the
end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert to the general fund.
The general fund appropriation to the aging network program of the aging and long-term services
department in the other category shall allow for an additional twelve and one-half percent distribution
from the department of finance and administration for initial payments to aging network providers at the
beginning of fiscal year 2027.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of caregiver hours 300,000
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 91

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Output: Number of hours of service provided by senior volunteers,
statewide 745,000
(3) Adult protective services:
The purpose of the adult protective services program is to investigate allegations of abuse, neglect and
exploitation of seniors and adults with disabilities and provide in-home support services to adults at
high risk of repeat neglect.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,244.9 2,557.5 11,802.4
(b) Contractual services 1,092.3 1,926.3 3,018.6
(c) Other 782.9 250.0 1,032.9
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of emergency or priority one investigations in
which a caseworker makes initial face-to-face contact with
the alleged victim within prescribed timeframes 100%
(4) Long-term care:
The purpose of the long-term care program is to provide long-term care and caregiver-based programming
and support for older individuals not otherwise provided or administered by the health care authority.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,272.0 400.0 55.7 1,727.7
(b) Contractual services 5,605.3 442.8 6,048.1
(c) Other 230.6 5.0 235.6
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide clerical, record-keeping and administrative support in the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 92

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
areas of personnel, budget, procurement and contracting to agency staff, outside contractors and
external control agencies to implement and manage programs.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,459.7 121.9 5,581.6
(b) Contractual services 226.4 2,275.6 2,502.0
(c) Other 1,955.8 1,955.8
Subtotal 100,494.5
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY:
(1) Medical assistance:
The purpose of the medical assistance program is to provide the necessary resources and information to
enable low-income individuals to obtain either free or low-cost healthcare.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,718.8 467.3 13,093.0 23,279.1
(b) Contractual services 38,714.7 10,750.8 759.9 160,525.2 210,750.6
(c) Other 1,185,723.4 226,657.5 872,186.5 7,572,685.4 9,857,252.8
The appropriations to the medical assistance program of the health care authority assume the state will
receive an enhanced federal medical assistance percentage rate for those enrolled in the expansion adult
category through fiscal year 2027 as provided for in the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010. Should the federal
government reduce or rescind the federal medical assistance percentage rates established by the federal
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, the health care authority shall reduce or rescind
eligibility for the expansion adult category.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the medical assistance program of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 93

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the health care authority in the other category includes one million three hundred forty thousand seven
hundred dollars ($1,340,700) from the tobacco settlement program fund for the breast and cervical cancer
treatment program and fourteen million eighty thousand six hundred dollars ($14,080,600) from the
tobacco settlement program fund for medicaid programs.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the medical assistance program
of the health care authority include sixty-one million nine hundred twenty-nine thousand dollars
($61,929,000) from the county-supported medicaid fund.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the medical assistance program
of the health care authority include eighty-four million two hundred twenty-five thousand one hundred
dollars ($84,225,100) from safety net care pool proceeds.
The other state funds appropriations to the medical assistance program of the health care authority
include up to thirty-five million four hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($35,465,000) from the health
care facility fund.
The general fund appropriation to the medical assistance program of the health care authority in
the other category includes nine million dollars ($9,000,000) for the second and final phase of rebasing
rates for nursing facilities.
The other state funds appropriations to the medical assistance program of the health care authority
include thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) from the health care affordability fund for medicaid
expansion population coverage.
Medicaid managed care organization contractors may negotiate different reimbursement amounts for
different specialties or for different practitioners in the same specialty but shall not negotiate less
than the medicaid fee-for-service rate. The health care authority will monitor implementation of the
rate increases and share any reports or monitoring information quarterly with the legislative finance
committee. The health care authority shall ensure rate parity between hospitals and free-standing
birthing centers. The health care authority shall not expand medicaid eligibility without prior approval
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 94

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
of the legislature.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the medical assistance program
of the health care authority include two million dollars ($2,000,000) to provide salary adjustments to
graduate medical education residents and fellows at the university of New Mexico health sciences center
through medicaid directed payments to the university of New Mexico health sciences center.
The other state funds appropriations to the medical assistance program of the health care authority
in the other category include ten million dollars ($10,000,000) from drug rebate revenue to provide an
annual rate increase for personal care consumer-directed, personal care consumer-delegated and personal
care self-directed services.
The general fund appropriation to the medical assistance program of the health care authority in
the other category includes three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000) for occupational
therapist rate parity.
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Percent of infants and children in medicaid managed care
who had six or more well-child visits in the first fifteen
months of life
(b) Outcome: Percent of members eighteen to eighty-five years with type
one or type two diabetes who received a kidney health
evaluation 50%
(c) Outcome: Percent of adults in medicaid managed care age eighteen and
over readmitted to a hospital within thirty days of
discharge 8%
(d) Outcome: Percent of medicaid managed care member deliveries who
received a prenatal care visit in the first trimester or
within forty-two days of eligibility 80%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 95

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(2) Medicaid behavioral health:
The purpose of the medicaid behavioral health program is to provide the necessary resources and
information to enable low-income individuals to obtain either free or low-cost behavioral healthcare.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 3,941.0 235.4 4,176.4 8,352.8
(b) Other 198,682.7 6,978.6 876,445.6 1,082,106.9
The general fund appropriations to the medicaid behavioral health program of the health care authority
include one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for transfer to the administrative hearings office to
support medicaid hearing officers.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the medicaid behavioral health
program of the health care authority in the other category includes one million seven hundred fourteen
thousand dollars ($1,714,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund for plans of safe care navigators as
outlined in Section 32A-3A-13 NMSA 1978 and five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000) from
the opioid crisis recovery fund for the ongoing costs of the opioid epidemic.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of readmissions to same level of care or higher for
children or youth discharged from residential treatment
centers and inpatient care 5%
(b) Output: Number of individuals served annually in substance use or
mental health programs administered through the medicaid
and non-medicaid programs administered by the health care
authority 210,000
(3) Income support:
The purpose of the income support program is to provide cash assistance and supportive services to
eligible low-income families so they can achieve self-sufficiency.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 96

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 42,479.7 53,028.1 95,507.8
(b) Contractual services 23,418.1 84,130.9 107,549.0
(c) Other 66,579.2 60.8 1,299,767.4 1,366,407.4
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
eleven million five hundred seven thousand seven hundred dollars ($11,507,700) from the federal
temporary assistance for needy families block grant for administration of the New Mexico Works Act.
The appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include one million
nine hundred seventy-two thousand two hundred dollars ($1,972,200) from the general fund and fifty-seven
million nine hundred fifty-two thousand two hundred dollars ($57,952,200) from the federal temporary
assistance for needy families block grant to provide cash assistance grants to participants as defined
in the New Mexico Works Act, including wage subsidies for participants, transitions, two clothing
allowances per year, diversion payments and state-funded payments to undocumented workers.
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
sixteen million six hundred forty-eight thousand three hundred dollars ($16,648,300) from the federal
temporary assistance for needy families block grant for job training and placement and job-related
transportation services, employment-related costs and a transitional employment program. The funds for
the transitional employment program and the wage subsidy program may be used interchangeably.
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
thirty-one million five hundred twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($31,527,500) from the
federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant for transfer to the early childhood
education and care department for childcare programs.
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
twenty-two million seven hundred ninety-eight thousand six hundred dollars ($22,798,600) from the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 97

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant for transfer to the children, youth and
families department for supportive housing, adoption services, foster care services, multilevel response
system implementation as outlined in Section 32A-4-4.1 NMSA 1978, services for youth aging out of foster
care, family support services, family preservation services, evidence-based prevention and intervention
services and fostering connections.
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
four million dollars ($4,000,000) from the federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant
for transfer to the higher education department for adult basic education and one million dollars
($1,000,000) for integrated education and training programs, including integrated basic education and
skills training programs.
The federal funds appropriations to the income support program of the health care authority include
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the federal temporary assistance for needy families block
grant for transfer to the public education department for the graduation, reality and dual-role skills
program to expand services and implement mentorship programs for teenage fathers. Any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from the other state funds appropriation to the income
support program of the health care authority derived from reimbursements received from the social
security administration for the general assistance program shall not revert.
The general fund appropriation to the income support program of the health care authority in the
other category includes six million six hundred twenty-nine thousand one hundred dollars ($6,629,100)
for the supplemental nutrition assistance program state supplement for the elderly and disabled, the
supplemental nutrition assistance program state supplement for the elderly and disabled shall not exceed
one hundred dollars ($100) monthly.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of all parent participants who meet temporary
assistance for needy families federal work participation
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 98

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
requirements 45%
(b) Outcome: Percent of temporary assistance for needy families
two-parent recipients meeting federal work participation
requirements 60%
(4) Behavioral health services:
The purpose of the behavioral health services program is to lead and oversee the provision of an
integrated and comprehensive behavioral health prevention and treatment system so the program fosters
recovery and supports the health and resilience of all New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,511.6 766.6 7,278.2
(b) Contractual services 62,279.4 169.5 11,888.0 32,350.0 106,686.9
(c) Other 1,388.9 4.0 1,067.5 2,460.4
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the behavioral health services program
of the health care authority includes two million two hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars ($2,288,000)
from the opioid crisis recovery fund for housing assistance for people affected by opioid use disorder,
one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund for behavioral health telehealth
services and five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund for the linkages
program.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of individuals discharged from inpatient facilities
who receive follow-up services at thirty days 60%
(b) Outcome: Percent of adults diagnosed with major depression who
remained on an antidepressant medication for at least one
hundred eighty days 42%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 99

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Outcome: Percent of medicaid managed care members released from
inpatient psychiatric hospitalization stays of four or more
days who receive seven-day follow-up visits into
community-based behavioral health 51%
(5) Child support enforcement:
The purpose of the child support enforcement program is to provide location, establishment and
collection services for custodial parents and their children; to ensure that all court orders for
support payments are being met to maximize child support collections; and to reduce public assistance
rolls.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 10,384.9 23,357.2 33,742.1
(b) Contractual services 2,969.9 597.4 7,055.9 10,623.2
(c) Other 1,764.5 3,425.7 5,190.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Amount of child support collected, in millions $120
(b) Outcome: Percent of current support owed that is collected 65%
(c) Outcome: Percent of cases with support orders 85%
(d) Explanatory: Percent of noncustodial parents paying support to total
cases with support orders
(6) State health benefits:
The purpose of the health benefits program is to effectively administer comprehensive health-benefit
plans to state and local government employees.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 38,475.7 38,475.7
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 100

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Other 621,732.4 621,732.4
(7) Health improvement:
The purpose of the health improvement program is to provide health facility licensing and certification
surveys, community-based oversight and contract compliance surveys and a statewide incident management
system so that people in New Mexico have access to quality healthcare and that vulnerable populations
are safe from abuse, neglect and exploitation.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 12,524.0 2,528.6 11,411.1 26,463.7
(b) Contractual services 705.0 1,092.0 1,797.0
(c) Other 1,878.3 175.1 1,592.1 3,645.5
(8) Developmental disabilities support:
The purpose of the developmental disabilities support program is to administer a statewide system of
community-based services and support to improve the quality of life and increase the independence and
interdependence of individuals with developmental disabilities and children with or at risk for
developmental delay or disability and their families.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,950.0 10,176.2 20,126.2
(b) Contractual services 6,325.0 6,324.0 12,649.0
(c) Other 7,001.8 332.0 2,663.7 9,997.5
(d) Other financing uses 313,512.5 313,512.5
The general fund appropriation to the developmental disabilities support program of the health care
authority in the other financing uses category includes six million three hundred thousand dollars
($6,300,000) to raise rates for residential services providers and fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000)
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 101

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
for increased enrollee service utilization.
(9) Health care affordability fund:
The purpose of the health care affordability fund program is to improve access to healthcare by helping
New Mexicans pay for healthcare insurance and supporting the planning, design and implementation of
healthcare coverage initiatives for uninsured New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,028.5 1,028.5
(b) Contractual services 1,000.0 1,000.0
(c) Other 159,286.6 159,286.6
(d) Other financing uses 30,000.0 30,000.0
The other state funds appropriation to the health care affordability fund program of the health care
authority in the other financing uses category includes thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) from the
health care affordability fund for medicaid expansion population coverage.
The other state funds appropriations to the health care affordability fund program of the health
care authority include thirteen million five hundred nine thousand dollars ($13,509,000) from the health
care affordability fund to subsidize state employees under two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level and for national guard members on TRICARE health plans.
(10) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide overall leadership, direction and administrative support to
each agency program and to assist it in achieving its programmatic goals.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 14,218.4 3,275.5 19,377.4 36,871.3
(b) Contractual services 29,187.6 404.6 2,300.0 29,498.6 61,390.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 102

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 10,226.0 319.9 12,661.8 23,207.7
Subtotal 14,278,371.8
WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT:
(1) Unemployment insurance:
The purpose of the unemployment insurance program is to administer an array of demand-driven workforce
development services to prepare New Mexicans to meet the needs of business.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,294.0 1,200.0 9,181.9 11,675.9
(b) Contractual services 40.0 28.9 294.0 362.9
(c) Other 55.0 709.0 1,394.8 2,158.8
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent of eligible unemployment insurance claims issued a
determination within twenty-one days from the date of claim 80%
(b) Output: Average amount of waiting time to speak to a customer
service agent in the unemployment insurance operation
center to file a new unemployment insurance claim, in
minutes 14:0
(c) Output: Average amount of waiting time to speak to a customer
service agent in the unemployment insurance operation
center to file a weekly certification, in minutes 14:0
(2) Labor relations:
The purpose of the labor relations program is to provide employment rights information and other work-
site-based assistance to employers and employees.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 103

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,237.4 456.2 101.9 5,795.5
(b) Contractual services 68.0 70.0 10.1 148.1
(c) Other 227.0 189.5 48.0 464.5
(3) Workforce technology:
The purpose of the workforce technology program is to provide and maintain customer-focused, effective
and innovative information technology services for the department and its service providers.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,080.8 4,673.1 5,753.9
(b) Contractual services 2,086.0 2,909.5 4,604.5 9,600.0
(c) Other 2,744.5 732.5 4,892.2 8,369.2
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of time the unemployment framework for automated
claims and tax services are available during scheduled
uptime 99%
(4) Employment services:
The purpose of the employment services program is to provide standardized business solution strategies
and labor market information through the New Mexico public workforce system that is responsive to the
needs of New Mexico businesses.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,498.4 13,269.9 15,509.2 30,277.5
(b) Contractual services 76.3 143.0 2,069.0 2,288.3
(c) Other 252.8 7,370.2 8,952.3 16,575.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 104

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the employment services program of
the workforce solutions department include two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from the
workers' compensation administration fund of the workers' compensation administration.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of unemployed individuals employed after receiving
employment services in an America's job center New Mexico
location 63%
(b) Outcome: Average six-month earnings of individuals entering
employment after receiving employment services in an
America's job center New Mexico location $19,000
(c) Output: Percent of audited apprenticeship programs deemed compliant 75%
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide overall leadership, direction and administrative support to
each agency program to achieve organizational goals and objectives.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 470.4 375.1 11,342.3 12,187.8
(b) Contractual services 50.8 91.4 621.1 763.3
(c) Other 53.2 84.8 33,796.4 33,934.4
Subtotal 140,355.4
WORKERS’ COMPENSATION ADMINISTRATION:
(1) Workers’ compensation administration:
The purpose of the workers' compensation administration program is to assure the quick and efficient
delivery of indemnity and medical benefits to injured and disabled workers at a reasonable cost to
employers.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 105

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 12,458.5 12,458.5
(b) Contractual services 377.5 377.5
(c) Other 1,422.7 1,422.7
(d) Other financing uses 250.0 250.0
The other state funds appropriation to the workers’ compensation administration program in the other
financing uses category includes two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from the workers’
compensation administration fund for the employment services program of the workforce solutions
department.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of serious injuries and illnesses caused by
workplace conditions per one hundred workers 0.4
(b) Outcome: Percent of employers determined to be in compliance with
insurance requirements of the Workers' Compensation Act
after initial investigations 97%
(2) Uninsured employers’ fund:
The purpose of the uninsured employers’ fund program is to provide workers’ compensation benefits for
injured workers whose employers do not carry workers’ compensation insurance but are legally required to
do so.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 632.0 632.0
(b) Contractual services 70.0 70.0
(c) Other 501.5 501.5
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 106

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 15,712.2
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION DIVISION:
(1) Rehabilitation services:
The purpose of the rehabilitation services program is to promote opportunities for people with
disabilities to become more independent and productive by empowering individuals with disabilities so
they may maximize their employment, economic self-sufficiency, independence and inclusion and
integration into society.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 17,704.2 17,704.2
(b) Contractual services 2,200.3 2,200.3
(c) Other 6,404.6 191.5 10,136.1 16,732.2
(d) Other financing uses 200.0 200.0
The general fund appropriation to the rehabilitation services program of the vocational rehabilitation
division in the other category includes five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to provide adult
vocational rehabilitation services.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the rehabilitation services
program of the vocational rehabilitation division in the other category includes one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) from the blind services program of the commission for the blind to match with federal
funds to provide rehabilitation services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the rehabilitation services
program of the vocational rehabilitation division in the other category includes ninety-one thousand
five hundred dollars ($91,500) from the deaf and hard-of-hearing program of the commission for deaf and
hard-of-hearing persons to match with federal funds to support and enhance deaf and hard-of-hearing
rehabilitation services.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 107

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The federal funds appropriation to the rehabilitation services program of the vocational
rehabilitation division in the other financing uses category includes two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) for the blind services program of the commission for the blind to provide services to blind
or visually impaired New Mexicans.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of clients achieving suitable employment for a
minimum of ninety days 650
(b) Outcome: Percent of clients achieving suitable employment outcomes
of all cases closed after receiving planned services 60%
(2) Independent living services:
The purpose of the independent living services program is to increase access for individuals with
disabilities to technologies and services needed for various applications in learning, working and home
management.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 95.0 95.0
(b) Other 662.7 8.6 1,315.8 1,987.1
(c) Other financing uses 9.6 9.6
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the independent living services
program of the vocational rehabilitation division in the other category includes one thousand one
hundred dollars ($1,100) from the blind services program of the commission for the blind to match with
federal funds to provide independent living services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans.
The federal funds appropriation to the independent living services program of the vocational
rehabilitation division in the other financing uses category includes nine thousand six hundred dollars
($9,600) for the blind services program of the commission for the blind to provide independent living
services to blind or visually impaired New Mexicans contingent on the amendment of the state plan for
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 108

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
independent living.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of independent living plans developed 1,600
(b) Output: Number of individuals served for independent living 1,700
(3) Disability determination:
The purpose of the disability determination program is to produce accurate and timely eligibility
determinations to social security disability applicants so they may receive benefits.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 11,685.2 11,685.2
(b) Contractual services 4,203.0 4,203.0
(c) Other 4,526.1 4,526.1
Performance measures:
(a) Efficiency: Average number of days to complete an initial disability
claim 210
(4) Administrative services:
The purpose of the administrative services program is to provide leadership, policy development,
financial analysis, budgetary control, information technology services, administrative support and legal
services to the vocational rehabilitation division. The administration services program function is to
ensure the vocational rehabilitation division achieves a high level of accountability and excellence in
services provided to the people of New Mexico.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 951.2 4,617.1 5,568.3
(b) Contractual services 256.9 256.9
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 109

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 1,288.6 1,288.6
Any unexpended balances in the vocational rehabilitation division remaining at the end of fiscal year
2027 from appropriations made from the general fund shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year
2028.
Subtotal 66,456.5
GOVERNOR’S COMMISSION ON DISABILITY:
(1) Governor’s commission on disability:
The purpose of the governor's commission on disability program is to promote policies and programs that
focus on common issues faced by New Mexicans with disabilities, regardless of type of disability, age or
other factors. The commission educates state administrators, legislators and the general public on the
issues facing New Mexicans with disabilities, especially as they relate to federal Americans with
Disabilities Act directives, building codes, disability technologies and disability culture so they can
improve the quality of life of New Mexicans with disabilities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 944.0 391.0 1,335.0
(b) Contractual services 61.3 75.7 137.0
(c) Other 435.3 200.0 83.3 718.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of requested architectural plan reviews and site
inspections completed 99%
(2) Brain injury advisory council:
The purpose of the brain injury advisory council program is to provide guidance on the use and
implementation of programs provided through the health care authority's brain injury services fund so
the department may align service delivery with needs identified by the brain injury community.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 110

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 103.1 103.1
(b) Contractual services 58.7 58.7
(c) Other 80.9 80.9
Subtotal 2,433.3
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL:
(1) Developmental disabilities council:
The purpose of the developmental disabilities council program is to provide and produce opportunities
for people with disabilities so they may realize their dreams and potential and become integrated
members of society.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,208.1 195.4 1,403.5
(b) Contractual services 119.5 119.5
(c) Other 261.2 75.0 354.6 690.8
(2) Office of guardianship:
The purpose of the office of guardianship program is to enter into, monitor and enforce guardianship
contracts for income-eligible persons and to help file, investigate and resolve complaints about
guardianship services provided by contractors to maintain the dignity, safety and security of the
indigent and incapacitated adults of the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,583.0 1,583.0
(b) Contractual services 7,142.3 550.0 7,692.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 111

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 193.7 193.7
The general fund and internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the office of
guardianship program of the developmental disabilities council in the contractual services category
includes seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) to provide legal services and
professional guardianship services for clients.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Average amount of time spent on waiting list, in months 7:5
Subtotal 11,682.8
MINERS’ HOSPITAL OF NEW MEXICO:
(1) Healthcare:
The purpose of the healthcare program is to provide quality acute care, long-term care and related
health services to the beneficiaries of the miners' trust fund of New Mexico and the people of the
region so they can maintain optimal health and quality of life.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 11,582.0 7,379.0 6,030.0 24,991.0
(b) Contractual services 4,880.0 3,110.0 2,539.0 10,529.0
(c) Other 3,713.0 2,363.0 1,932.0 8,008.0
(d) Other financing uses 336.0 214.0 175.0 725.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the healthcare program of miners’
hospital of New Mexico include seven hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($725,000) from other state
funds to transfer to the health care authority to leverage additional federal medicaid revenue.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of occupancy at nursing home based on licensed beds 55%
(b) Quality: Percent of patients readmitted to the hospital within
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 112

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
thirty days with the same or similar diagnosis 1%
Subtotal 44,253.0
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH:
(1) Public health:
The purpose of the public health program is to provide a coordinated system of community-based public
health services focusing on disease prevention and health promotion to improve health status, reduce
disparities and ensure timely access to quality, culturally competent healthcare.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 37,163.7 4,625.1 14,058.1 31,352.7 87,199.6
(b) Contractual services 26,434.2 5,733.7 18,821.9 26,923.4 77,913.2
(c) Other 20,008.1 40,107.7 3,942.6 65,303.3 129,361.7
(d) Other financing uses 462.3 462.3
Performance measures:
(a) Quality: Percent of female clients of the department of health's
public health office family planning ages fifteen to
nineteen, who were provided most- or moderately effective
contraceptives 88%
(b) Outcome: Percent of preschoolers ages nineteen to thirty-five months
indicated as being fully immunized 75%
(2) Epidemiology and response:
The purpose of the epidemiology and response program is to monitor health, provide health information,
prevent disease and injury, promote health and healthy behaviors, respond to public health events,
prepare for health emergencies and provide emergency medical and vital registration services to New
Mexicans.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 113

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,982.9 216.3 1,004.1 17,374.0 25,577.3
(b) Contractual services 5,989.4 226.9 1,755.5 24,434.9 32,406.7
(c) Other 6,020.3 243.8 10,467.8 16,053.8 32,785.7
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Drug overdose death rate per one hundred thousand population
(b) Explanatory: Alcohol-related death rate per one hundred thousand
population
(c) Outcome: Percent of opioid patients also prescribed benzodiazepines 5%
(3) Laboratory services:
The purpose of the laboratory services program is to provide laboratory analysis and scientific
expertise for policy development for tax-supported public health, environment and toxicology programs in
New Mexico and to provide timely identification of threats to the health of New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,059.6 1,256.4 2,887.8 13,203.8
(b) Contractual services 584.1 550.0 665.4 1,799.5
(c) Other 3,316.7 303.7 1,802.2 3,438.7 8,861.3
(4) Facilities management:
The purpose of the facilities management program is to provide oversight for department of health
facilities that provide health and behavioral healthcare services, including mental health, substance
abuse, nursing home and rehabilitation programs in both facility- and community-based settings, and
serve as the safety net for New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 114

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 80,496.2 61,227.0 5,172.3 10,519.2 157,414.7
(b) Contractual services 4,986.3 29,802.7 7,376.6 5,840.2 48,005.8
(c) Other 16,596.5 17,273.1 3,385.6 4,430.7 41,685.9
The department of health shall use existing appropriations to reimburse hospitals that provide care to
individuals who are civilly committed to state facilities when those facilities are unable to admit the
individuals.
Performance measures:
(a) Efficiency: Percent of eligible third-party revenue collected at all
agency facilities 94%
(5) Medical cannabis:
The purpose of the medical cannabis program is to provide qualified patients with the means to legally
and beneficially consume medical cannabis in a regulated system for alleviating symptoms caused by
debilitating medical conditions and their medical treatments and to regulate a system of production and
distribution of medical cannabis to ensure an adequate supply.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,184.8 2,184.8
(b) Contractual services 262.2 262.2
(c) Other 186.5 186.5
(6) Administration:
The purpose of the administration program is to provide leadership, policy development, information
technology, administrative and legal support to the department of health so it achieves a high level of
accountability and excellence in services provided to the people of New Mexico.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 115

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 10,712.5 12,418.6 23,131.1
(b) Contractual services 380.0 58.2 2,840.5 3,278.7
(c) Other 428.3 901.7 2,919.8 4,249.8
Subtotal 689,970.6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT:
(1) Resource protection:
The purpose of the resource protection program is to monitor and provide regulatory oversight of the
generation, storage, transportation and disposal of wastes in New Mexico. The program also oversees the
investigation and cleanup of environmental contamination covered by the Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,346.2 8,971.2 3,777.3 15,094.7
(b) Contractual services 350.3 5,153.8 2,543.3 8,047.4
(c) Other 84.8 10,720.4 719.7 11,524.9
(d) Other financing uses 3,257.5 3,257.5
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of hazardous waste facilities in compliance 90%
(b) Outcome: Percent of solid and infectious waste management facilities
in compliance 90%
(2) Water protection:
The purpose of the water protection program is to protect and preserve the ground-, surface- and
drinking-water resources of the state for present and future generations. The program also helps New
Mexico communities develop sustainable and secure water, wastewater and solid waste infrastructure
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 116

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
through funding, technical assistance and project oversight.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,003.4 5,223.6 350.0 12,096.1 24,673.1
(b) Contractual services 1,812.9 4,813.3 1,581.0 27,685.5 35,892.7
(c) Other 342.9 6,990.4 21,444.0 28,777.3
(d) Other financing uses 1,025.5 1,025.5
The other state funds appropriations to the water protection program of the environment department
include one million seven hundred eight thousand one hundred dollars ($1,708,100) from the land of
enchantment legacy fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of nonpoint source impaired waterbodies restored by
the department relative to the number of impaired water
bodies 1/4
(b) Outcome: Percent of groundwater permittees in compliance 99%
(3) Environmental protection:
The purpose of the environmental protection program is to ensure New Mexicans breathe healthy air, to
prevent and mitigate the impacts of climate change on the state’s population and industries and to
protect the public from radiation-related risks. The program implements rules and initiatives that
reduce greenhouse gas emissions, protect the public from environmental contaminants and limit exposure
to radon and radioactive materials.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,994.7 11,879.8 166.5 1,664.0 16,705.0
(b) Contractual services 147.5 8,501.1 10.0 415.2 9,073.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 117

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 383.8 3,436.4 2,246.0 6,066.2
(d) Other financing uses 4,457.4 4,457.4
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of the population breathing air meeting federal
health standards 99%
(4) Resource management:
The purpose of the resource management program is to provide overall leadership, administrative, legal
and information management support to all programs within the department. This support allows the
department to operate in the most responsible, efficient and effective manner so the public can receive
the information it needs to hold the department accountable.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,549.9 5,943.7 5,943.8 17,437.4
(b) Contractual services 554.2 207.6 1,340.0 613.4 2,715.2
(c) Other 3,251.1 103.8 3,995.9 1,154.2 8,505.0
(5) Environmental health:
The purpose of the environmental health program is to protect the public from environmental health
hazards by providing regulatory oversight of food service and food processing facilities, hemp-finished
products, adult use and medical edible cannabis products, public swimming pools and spas and liquid
waste systems. The program also ensures every employee has safe working conditions, enforcing
occupational health and safety standards to prevent workplace illnesses, injuries and fatalities.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 8,193.6 2,691.9 10,885.5
(b) Contractual services 33.5 1,011.6 1,045.1
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 118

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 335.0 1,085.1 25.0 1,445.1
(d) Other financing uses 538.5 538.5
(6) Compliance and enforcement:
The purpose of the compliance and enforcement program is to protect the public health and the
environment by ensuring business, industry and federal facility compliance with federal and state rules
and permit and license requirements. This program also oversees and manages the department’s emergency
operations and response efforts, enabling the department to respond to emergencies while maintaining its
commitment to ongoing regulatory functions.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 3,648.2 6,785.9 3,185.7 13,619.8
(b) Contractual services 35.0 607.5 61.0 703.5
(c) Other 131.2 1,020.2 183.8 1,335.2
(d) Other financing uses 2,000.7 2,000.7
Subtotal 224,826.5
OFFICE OF NATURAL RESOURCES TRUSTEE:
(1) Natural resource damage assessment and restoration:
The purpose of the natural resource damage assessment and restoration program is to restore or replace
natural resources injured or lost due to releases of hazardous substances or oil into the environment.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 778.3 778.3
(b) Contractual services 9,500.0 9,500.0
(c) Other 66.0 66.0
Subtotal 10,344.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 119

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
VETERANS’ SERVICES DEPARTMENT:
(1) Veterans’ services:
The purpose of the veterans' services program is to carry out the mandates of the New Mexico legislature
and the governor to provide information and assistance to veterans and their eligible dependents to
obtain the benefits to which they are entitled to improve their quality of life.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,720.2 221.8 442.5 8,384.5
(b) Contractual services 1,393.0 60.0 589.0 2,042.0
(c) Other 1,273.7 111.5 225.9 1,611.1
Performance measures:
(a) Quality: Percent of veterans surveyed who rate the services provided
by the agency as satisfactory or above 95%
(b) Explanatory: Number of veterans and families of veterans served by the
veterans' services department
Subtotal 12,037.6
OFFICE OF FAMILY REPRESENTATION AND ADVOCACY:
(1) Office of family representation and advocacy:
The purpose of the office of family representation and advocacy program is to provide high-quality legal
representation for children, youth and respondents involved in child welfare cases.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 4,182.5 1,381.8 5,564.3
(b) Contractual services 4,933.6 1,531.1 6,464.7
(c) Other 696.6 226.7 923.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 120

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subtotal 12,952.3
CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES DEPARTMENT:
(1) Juvenile justice facilities:
The purpose of the juvenile justice facilities program is to provide rehabilitative services to youth
committed to the department, including medical, educational, mental health and other services that will
support their rehabilitation.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 57,907.6 4,417.3 4,346.0 67.9 66,738.8
(b) Contractual services 11,543.4 4,919.3 350.0 1,965.0 18,777.7
(c) Other 7,730.9 189.2 50.0 7,970.1
The general fund appropriations to the juvenile justice facilities program of the children, youth and
families department include seven thousand six hundred dollars ($7,600) for juvenile public safety
advisory board operations.
(2) Protective services:
The purpose of the protective services program is to receive and investigate referrals of child abuse
and neglect and provide family preservation and treatment and legal services to vulnerable children and
their families to ensure their safety and well-being.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 79,194.4 15,935.1 17,020.3 112,149.8
(b) Contractual services 19,228.4 370.8 9,533.3 20,867.5 50,000.0
(c) Other 40,752.2 59.3 38,544.5 79,356.0
The general fund appropriations to the protective services program of the children, youth and families
department include seven million six hundred sixty-two thousand dollars ($7,662,000) to match with
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 121

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
federal revenue for well-supported, supported or promising programming as included on the clearinghouse
website for the federal Family First Prevention Services Act or on the website for the California
evidence-based clearinghouse for child welfare.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the protective services program
of the children, youth and families department include twenty-two million seven hundred ninety-eight
thousand six hundred dollars ($22,798,600) from the federal temporary assistance for needy families
block grant to New Mexico for supportive housing, adoption services, foster care services, multilevel
response system implementation as outlined in Section 32A-4-4.1 NMSA 1978, services for youth aging out
of foster care, family support services, family preservation services, evidence-based prevention and
intervention services and fostering connections.
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Turnover rate for protective service workers 25%
(b) Outcome: Percent of children in foster care for twelve to
twenty-three months at the start of a twelve-month period
who achieve permanency within that twelve months 43%
(3) Behavioral health services:
The purpose of the behavioral health services program is to provide coordination and management of
behavioral health policy, programs and services for children.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 11,535.4 2,186.1 63.3 13,784.8
(b) Contractual services 36,556.1 31.7 1,059.5 37,647.3
(c) Other 1,287.0 1,287.0
(4) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide the direct services divisions with functional and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 122

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
administrative support so they may provide client services consistent with the department's mission and
to support the development and professionalism of employees.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 18,223.3 18,223.3
(b) Contractual services 2,936.6 2,936.6
(c) Other 1,000.0 1,943.4 2,943.4
Subtotal 411,814.8
TOTAL HEALTH, HOSPITALS AND
HUMAN SERVICES 3,082,023.3 1,424,272.0 1,763,469.0 10,988,409.9 17,258,174.2
G. PUBLIC SAFETY
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS:
(1) National guard support:
The purpose of the national guard support program is to provide administrative, fiscal, personnel,
facility construction and maintenance support to the New Mexico national guard so it may maintain a high
degree of readiness to respond to state and federal missions and to supply an experienced force to
protect the public, provide direction for youth and improve the quality of life for New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,802.9 11,310.4 17,113.3
(b) Contractual services 470.6 10.9 232.5 3,361.4 4,075.4
(c) Other 4,060.9 124.3 11,099.8 15,285.0
The general fund appropriation to the national guard support program of the department of military
affairs in the personal services and employee benefits category includes funding for the adjutant
general position not to exceed the 2026 amount prescribed by federal law and regulations for members of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 123

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the active military in the grade of major general and for the deputy adjutant general position not to
exceed the 2026 amount prescribed by federal law and regulations for members of the active military in
the grade of brigadier general.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent strength of the New Mexico national guard 90%
(b) Outcome: Percent of New Mexico national guard youth challenge
academy graduates who earn a high school equivalency
credential 72%
(2) Crisis response program:
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 206.2 206.2
(b) Contractual services 0.9 0.9
(c) Other 99.1 99.1
Subtotal 36,779.9
PAROLE BOARD:
(1) Adult parole:
The purpose of the adult parole program is to provide and establish parole conditions and guidelines for
inmates and parolees so they may reintegrate back into the community as law-abiding residents.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 692.3 692.3
(b) Contractual services 15.7 15.7
(c) Other 150.1 150.1
Performance measures:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 124

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Efficiency: Percent of revocation hearings held within thirty days of a
parolee's return to the corrections department 70%
Subtotal 858.1
CORRECTIONS DEPARTMENT:
(1) Inmate management and control:
The purpose of the inmate management and control program is to incarcerate in a humane, professionally
sound manner offenders sentenced to prison and to provide safe and secure prison operations.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 123,112.9 3,522.5 18,896.0 17.5 145,548.9
(b) Contractual services 79,293.8 79,293.8
(c) Other 79,217.2 50.0 79,267.2
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Average number of female inmates on in-house parole 10
(b) Outcome: Average number of male inmates on in-house parole 65
(c) Outcome: Vacancy rate of correctional officers in public facilities 25%
(d) Outcome: Vacancy rate of correctional officers in private facilities 25%
(e) Output: Number of inmate-on-inmate assaults resulting in injury
requiring off-site medical treatment 10
(f) Output: Number of inmate-on-staff assaults resulting in injury
requiring off-site medical treatment 4
(2) Corrections industries:
The purpose of the corrections industries program is to provide training and work experience
opportunities for inmates to instill a quality work ethic and to prepare them to perform effectively in
an employment position and to reduce idle time of inmates while in prison.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 125

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,725.7 2,725.7
(b) Contractual services 86.4 86.4
(c) Other 8,102.4 8,102.4
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent of inmates receiving vocational or educational
training assigned to corrections industries 30%
(3) Community offender management:
The purpose of the community offender management program is to provide programming and supervision to
offenders on probation and parole, with emphasis on high-risk offenders, to better ensure the
probability of them becoming law-abiding residents, to protect the public from undue risk and to provide
intermediate sanctions and post-incarceration support services as a cost-effective alternative to
incarceration.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 33,014.7 2,910.1 35,924.8
(b) Contractual services 3,384.2 3,384.2
(c) Other 7,097.3 7,097.3
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of contacts per month made with high-risk offenders
in the community 92%
(b) Quality: Average standard caseload per probation and parole officer 88
(c) Outcome: Vacancy rate of probation and parole officers 18%
(4) Reentry:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 126

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The purpose of the reentry program is to build educational, cognitive, life skills and vocational
programs and pre- and post-release services around sound research into best correctional practices and
with the input of community stakeholders to remove or reduce barriers to incarcerated individuals living
productively in society, thereby reducing recidivism and furthering public safety.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 9,303.5 604.4 256.0 10,163.9
(b) Contractual services 11,353.4 2,930.4 14,283.8
(c) Other 620.5 112.2 732.7
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of prisoners reincarcerated within thirty-six
months due to technical parole violations 9%
(b) Output: Percent of eligible students who earn a high school
equivalency credential 75%
(c) Output: Percent of graduates from the men's recovery center who are
reincarcerated within thirty-six months 23%
(d) Explanatory: Percent of participating students who have completed adult
education
(e) Output: Percent of graduates from the women's recovery center
reincarcerated within thirty-six months 23%
(f) Outcome: Percent of prisoners reincarcerated within thirty-six
months due to new charges or pending charges 18%
(g) Explanatory: Percent of residential drug abuse program graduates
reincarcerated within thirty-six months of release
(h) Outcome: Percent of sex offenders reincarcerated on a new sex
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 127

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
offense conviction within thirty-six months of release on
the previous sex offense conviction 5%
(i) Outcome: Percent of prisoners reincarcerated within thirty-six months 40%
(j) Outcome: Percent of eligible inmates enrolled in educational,
cognitive, vocational and college programs 60%
(k) Output: Number of students who earn a high school equivalency
credential 205
(5) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide quality administrative support and oversight to the
department operating units to ensure a clean audit, effective budget, personnel management and cost-
effective management information system services.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 14,363.4 65.0 14,428.4
(b) Contractual services 468.2 468.2
(c) Other 3,878.0 3,878.0
Subtotal 405,385.7
CRIME VICTIMS REPARATION COMMISSION:
(1) Victim compensation:
The purpose of the victim compensation program is to provide financial assistance and information to
victims of violent crime in New Mexico so they can receive services to restore their lives.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 1,966.3 76.9 2,043.2
(b) Contractual services 63.5 3.7 67.2
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 128

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Other 1,944.5 576.0 1,226.4 3,746.9
(2) Grant administration:
The purpose of the grant administration program is to provide funding and training to nonprofit
providers and public agencies so they can provide services to victims of crime.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 378.4 489.3 867.7
(b) Contractual services 11,176.8 18.4 11,195.2
(c) Other 179.8 12,285.0 12,464.8
The general fund appropriations to the grant administration program of the crime victims reparation
commission include one million dollars ($1,000,000) for services for victims of sexual assault.
Performance measures:
(a) Efficiency: Percent of state-funded subgrantees that received site
visits 30%
(b) Explanatory: Number of sexual assault survivors who received
services through state-funded victim services provider programs
statewide.
Subtotal 30,385.0
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY:
(1) Law enforcement:
The purpose of the law enforcement program is to provide the highest quality of law enforcement services
to the public and ensure a safer state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 140,232.0 1,819.6 7,067.4 7,500.0 156,619.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 129

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Contractual services 1,423.4 100.0 597.1 2,120.5
(c) Other 33,462.6 2,552.0 2,878.6 6,025.6 44,918.8
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the law enforcement program of the
department of public safety include ninety-four thousand five hundred dollars ($94,500) from the weight
distance tax identification permit fund. Any unexpended balances in the law enforcement program of the
department of public safety remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from the
weight distance tax identification permit fund shall revert to the weight distance tax identification
permit fund.
The department of public safety shall not be required to pay monthly access, service or
administrative fees assessed by the department of information technology for cellular voice or data
service plans used for public safety or first responder operations. This provision applies only to
cellular service plans assigned to commissioned officers, emergency response personnel, public safety
telecommunicators or other employees whose primary duties directly support public safety operations.
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Graduation rate of the New Mexico state police recruit
school
(b) Output: Number of driving-while-intoxicated saturation patrols
conducted 3,000
(c) Explanatory: Turnover rate of commissioned state police officers
(d) Explanatory: Number of drug-related investigations conducted by
narcotics agents
(e) Explanatory: Vacancy rate of commissioned state police officers
(f) Output: Number of commercial motor vehicle safety inspections
conducted 100,000
(g) Explanatory: Number of proactive special investigations unit operations
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 130

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
to reduce driving while intoxicated and alcohol-related crimes
(2) Statewide law enforcement support:
The purpose of the statewide law enforcement support program is to promote a safe and secure environment
for New Mexicans through intelligently led policing practices, vital scientific and technical support,
current and relevant training and innovative leadership for the law enforcement community.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 22,653.8 2,930.1 372.1 414.1 26,370.1
(b) Contractual services 675.7 887.0 375.0 218.1 2,155.8
(c) Other 6,029.9 2,729.9 291.0 499.7 9,550.5
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of forensic evidence cases completed 100%
(b) Explanatory: Number of expungements processed
(c) Outcome: Number of sexual assault examination kits not completed
within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the kits
by the forensic laboratory 0
(3) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to manage the agency's financial resources, assist in attracting and
retaining a quality workforce and provide sound legal advice and a clean, pleasant working environment.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,174.7 202.9 392.0 7,769.6
(b) Contractual services 246.9 5.0 23.3 275.2
(c) Other 400.4 3,985.1 5.0 3,804.4 8,194.9
Subtotal 257,974.4
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 131

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DEPARTMENT:
(1) Homeland security and emergency management program:
The purpose of the homeland security and emergency management program is to provide for and coordinate
an integrated, statewide, comprehensive emergency management system for New Mexicans, including all
agencies, branches and levels of government.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 2,723.7 55.0 6,890.9 9,669.6
(b) Contractual services 537.6 1,025.2 1,562.8
(c) Other 1,220.0 25,216.6 26,436.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of recommendations from federal grant monitoring
visits older than six months unresolved at the close of the
fiscal year 2
(2) State fire marshal’s office:
The purpose of the state fire marshal's office program is to provide services and resources to the
appropriate entities to enhance their ability to protect the public from fire hazards.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 7,298.1 7,298.1
(b) Contractual services 705.1 705.1
(c) Other 162,608.1 162,608.1
The other state funds appropriations to the state fire marshal's office program of the homeland security
and emergency management department include eleven million six hundred seventeen thousand one hundred
dollars ($11,617,100) from the fire protection fund. Any unexpended balances in the state fire marshal's
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 132

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
office program of the homeland security and emergency management department remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from the fire protection fund shall revert to the general
fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of local government recipients that receive their
fire protection fund distributions on schedule 100%
(b) Outcome: Average statewide fire district insurance service office
rating 4
Subtotal 208,280.3
TOTAL PUBLIC SAFETY 609,095.8 207,278.1 30,793.7 92,495.8 939,663.4
H. TRANSPORTATION
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION:
(1) Project design and construction:
The purpose of the project design and construction program is to provide improvements and additions to
the state's highway infrastructure to serve the interest of the general public. These improvements
include those activities directly related to highway planning, design and construction necessary for a
complete system of highways in the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 38,717.0 1,873.3 40,590.3
(b) Contractual services 2,663.1 2,663.1
(c) Other 2,142.6 2,142.6
(d) Plan, study, design and right-of-way
acquisition, road construction
and rehabilitation 92,907.2 462,563.3 555,470.5
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 133

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(e) Transportation project fund 56,790.0 56,790.0
(f) Local government road fund 54,058.0 54,058.0
(g) Debt service 82,385.3 69,703.4 152,088.7
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of projects in production let to bid as scheduled 75%
(b) Quality: Percent of final cost-over-bid amount, less gross receipts
tax, on highway construction projects 3%
(c) Outcome: Percent of projects completed according to schedule 88%
(2) Highway operations:
The purpose of the highway operations program is to maintain and improve New Mexico’s highway
infrastructure in service of the general public through activities that include preserving roadway
integrity and ensuring open access throughout the state system.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 175,043.6 3,000.0 178,043.6
(b) Contractual services 1,637.4 1,637.4
(c) Other 42,013.9 42,013.9
(d) Roadway maintenance contracts 103,762.3 103,762.3
(e) Roadway maintenance
supplies and materials 58,284.2 58,284.2
(f) Equipment purchases 16,043.3 16,043.3
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of statewide pavement lane miles preserved 3,500
(b) Outcome: Percent of interstate lane miles rated fair or better 90%
(c) Outcome: Number of combined systemwide lane miles in poor condition 4,000
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 134

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(d) Outcome: Percent of bridges in fair, or better, condition based on
deck area 95%
(3) Program support:
The purpose of program support is to provide management and administration of financial and human
resources, custody and maintenance of information and property and the management of construction and
maintenance projects.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 41,759.1 41,759.1
(b) Contractual services 3,485.1 3,485.1
(c) Other 21,555.0 21,555.0
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Vacancy rate of all programs
(4) Modal:
The purpose of the modal program is to provide federal grants management and oversight of programs with
dedicated revenues, including transit and rail, traffic safety and aviation.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,604.2 7,380.0 1,963.3 15,947.5
(b) Contractual services 29,188.4 4,200.0 12,712.9 46,101.3
(c) Other 3,565.7 525.5 5,108.5 9,199.7
(d) Air service assistance program 3,854.6 3,854.6
(e) Transit grants 33,226.3 33,226.3
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the modal program of the New Mexico
department of transportation include eleven million eight hundred five thousand five hundred dollars
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 135

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
($11,805,500) from the weight distance tax identification permit fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of traffic fatalities 400
(b) Outcome: Number of alcohol-related traffic fatalities 140
Subtotal 1,438,716.5
TOTAL TRANSPORTATION 836,460.0 12,105.5 590,151.0 1,438,716.5
I. OTHER EDUCATION
PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT:
The purpose of the public education department program is to provide a public education to all students,
including administering and enforcing the laws with which the department is charged, through a focus on
leadership and support, productivity, accountability, communication and fiscal responsibility.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 22,139.0 5,213.5 91.8 11,973.4 39,417.7
(b) Contractual services 2,612.5 2,227.2 20,257.1 25,096.8
(c) Other 2,280.9 1,300.0 3,572.1 7,153.0
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Number of local education agencies and charter schools
audited for program compliance and funding formula
components, including at-risk, English learner, special
education and gifted education funding 15
Subtotal 71,667.5
REGIONAL EDUCATION COOPERATIVES:
Appropriations:
(a) Northwest 150.0 150.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 136

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Northeast 150.0 150.0
(c) Lea county 150.0 150.0
(d) Pecos valley 150.0 150.0
(e) Southwest 150.0 150.0
(f) Central 150.0 150.0
(g) High plains 150.0 150.0
(h) Clovis 150.0 150.0
(i) Ruidoso 150.0 150.0
(j) Four corners 150.0 150.0
Subtotal 1,500.0
PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS:
Appropriations:
(a) Early literacy and
reading support 14,000.0 14,000.0
(b) School leader
professional development 5,000.0 5,000.0
(c) Graduation, reality and
dual-role skills program 750.0 500.0 1,250.0
(d) National board
certification assistance 500.0 500.0
(e) Advanced placement,
international baccalaureate
and PSAT 11th grade
test assistance 1,250.0 1,250.0
(f) Student nutrition
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 137

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
and wellness 42,201.0 42,201.0
(g) School safety 1,500.0 1,500.0
(h) Literacy coaches 2,000.0 2,000.0
The public education department shall not make an award to a school district or charter school that does
not submit an approved educational plan pursuant to Section 22-8-6 NMSA 1978 or an approved teacher
mentorship program pursuant to Section 22-10A-9 NMSA 1978.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the graduation, reality and dual-
role skills program of the public education department is from the federal temporary assistance for
needy families block grant to New Mexico.
The other state funds appropriation to the public education department for national board
certification assistance is from the national board certification scholarship fund.
The public education department may distribute awards from the advanced placement, international
baccalaureate and PSAT 11th grade test assistance appropriation to public schools and secondary schools
funded by the bureau of Indian education of the United States department of the interior that offer
international baccalaureate programs to provide the international baccalaureate program tests at a
reduced rate to New Mexico students.
The general fund appropriation to the public education department special appropriations for school
safety is for school safety interoperable alert systems.
Any unexpended balances in special appropriations to the public education department remaining at
the end of fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from the general fund shall revert to the general
fund.
Subtotal 67,701.0
PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY:
The purpose of the public school facilities authority program is to oversee public school facilities in
all eighty-nine school districts, ensuring correct and prudent planning, building and maintenance using
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 138

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
state funds and ensuring adequacy of all facilities in accordance with public education department-
approved educational programs.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 6,860.4 6,860.4
(b) Contractual services 200.0 200.0
(c) Other 1,670.0 1,670.0
Performance measures:
(a) Explanatory: Statewide public school facility condition index measured
on December 31 of prior calendar year
(b) Explanatory: Statewide public school facility maintenance assessment
report score measured on December 31 of prior calendar year
Subtotal 8,730.4
TOTAL OTHER EDUCATION 95,233.4 9,240.7 9,322.2 35,802.6 149,598.9
J. HIGHER EDUCATION
On approval of the higher education department, the state budget division of the department of finance
and administration may approve increases in budgets of agencies in this subsection whose other state
funds exceed amounts specified, with the exception of the policy development and institutional financial
oversight program of the higher education department. In approving budget increases, the director of the
state budget division shall advise the legislature through its officers and appropriate committees, in
writing, of the justification for the approval.
On approval of the higher education department and in consultation with the legislative finance
committee, the state budget division of the department of finance and administration may reduce general
fund appropriations, up to three percent, to institutions whose lower-level common courses are not
completely transferable or accepted among public colleges and universities in New Mexico.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 139

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The department of finance and administration shall, as directed by the secretary of higher
education, withhold from an educational institution or program that the higher education department
places under an enhanced fiscal oversight program a portion, up to ten percent, of the institution’s or
program’s general fund allotments. On written notice by the secretary of higher education that the
institution or program has made sufficient progress toward satisfying the requirements imposed by the
higher education department under the enhanced fiscal oversight program, the department of finance and
administration shall release the withheld allotments. Money withheld in accordance with this provision
and not released at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. The secretary of the
department of finance and administration shall advise the legislature through its officers and
appropriate committees, in writing, of the status of all withheld allotments.
The department shall not distribute lottery or opportunity scholarship reimbursement to higher
education institutions for tuition and fees over the rates charged in the fall semester 2025.
Except as otherwise provided, any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert to the general fund.
HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT:
(1) Policy development and institutional financial oversight:
The purpose of the policy development and institutional financial oversight program is to provide a
continuous process of statewide planning and oversight within the department's statutory authority for
the state higher education system and to ensure both the efficient use of state resources and progress
in implementing a statewide agenda.
Appropriations:
(a) Personal services and
employee benefits 5,483.2 436.9 43.3 1,040.0 7,003.4
(b) Contractual services 660.0 30.0 810.0 1,000.0 2,500.0
(c) Other 11,746.3 60.0 4,190.0 9,660.0 25,656.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 140

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the policy development and
institutional financial oversight program of the higher education department include four million
dollars ($4,000,000) from the temporary assistance for needy families block grant for adult education
and one million dollars ($1,000,000) for integrated education and training programs, including
integrated basic education and skills training programs.
The general fund appropriation to the policy development and institutional financial oversight
program of the higher education department in the other category includes seven million eight hundred
twenty-eight thousand dollars ($7,828,000) to provide adults with education services and materials and
access to high school equivalency tests, one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) for
an adult literacy program, one million dollars ($1,000,000) for literacy coordinators within colleges of
education statewide, six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to the tribal college dual-credit program
fund, two hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($216,000) for the Navajo technical university nursing
program, one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for the western interstate commission on higher
education dues, eighty-four thousand five hundred dollars ($84,500) for English-learner teacher
preparation and forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for state higher education executive officers
association annual dues.
Any unexpended balances in the policy development and institutional financial oversight program of
the higher education department remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from
the general fund shall revert to the general fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of unemployed adult education students obtaining
employment two quarters after exit 45%
(b) Outcome: Percent of adult education high school equivalency
test-takers who earn a high school equivalency credential 32%
(c) Outcome: Percent of high school equivalency graduates entering
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 141

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
postsecondary degree or certificate programs 25%
(2) Student financial aid:
The purpose of the student financial aid program is to provide access, affordability and opportunities
for success in higher education to students and their families so all New Mexicans may benefit from
postsecondary education and training beyond high school.
Appropriations:
(a) Contractual services 70.0 70.0
(b) Other 24,828.8 7,500.0 50,040.0 400.0 82,768.8
The other state funds appropriation to the student financial aid program of the higher education
department in the other category includes two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) from
the teacher preparation affordability scholarship fund and five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the
teacher loan repayment fund.
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation to the student financial aid program
of the higher education department in the other category includes fifty million dollars ($50,000,000)
from the lottery tuition fund.
The general fund appropriation to the student financial aid program of the higher education
department in the other category includes two million four hundred twenty thousand dollars ($2,420,000)
for the western interstate commission for higher education loan-for-service program.
(3) Opportunity scholarship:
The purpose of the opportunity scholarship program is to provide tuition and fee assistance for New
Mexico higher education to students so New Mexicans may benefit from postsecondary education and
training beyond high school.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 146,000.0 40,000.0 186,000.0
The internal services fund/interagency transfers appropriation to the opportunity scholarship program of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 142

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the higher education department is from the higher education program fund. The higher education
department shall provide a written report summarizing the opportunity scholarship's finances, student
participation and sustainability to the department of finance and administration and the legislative
finance committee by November 1, 2026. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
from appropriations made from the general fund shall revert to the general fund.
Subtotal 303,998.5
UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 299,573.0 182,517.3 482,090.3
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 299,760.2 225,940.4 2,757.0 528,457.6
(c) Athletics 8,657.8 33,362.5 30.6 42,050.9
(d) Educational television 1,352.5 6,358.1 1,594.5 9,305.1
(e) Tribal education
initiatives 1,291.4 1,291.4
(f) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 101.2 101.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 28,000
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 143

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
New Mexico high school, by headcount 3,200
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 570,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated degree awards in the most recent
academic year 5,000
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 60%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 80%
(2) Gallup branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 2,169.0 988.0 3,157.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 13,016.7 5,401.2 34.5 18,452.4
(c) Tribal education
initiatives 103.7 103.7
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 4,000
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 250
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 50,000
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 144

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 350
(e) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(f) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(3) Los Alamos branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 305.7 1,129.0 1,434.7
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 2,617.8 2,933.8 15.0 5,566.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 2,105
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 169
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 9,587
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 91
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 145

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(4) Valencia branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 427.1 1,945.3 2,372.4
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 8,342.9 5,860.3 125.0 14,328.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 4,550
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 310
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 26,465
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 160
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 146

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(5) Taos branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 1,397.4 3,588.0 4,985.4
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 6,311.7 4,633.4 108.5 11,053.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 2,200
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 150
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 15,500
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 220
(e) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(f) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(6) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Judicial selection 176.7 176.7
(b) Southwest research center 858.0 858.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 147

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Resource geographic
information system 71.6 71.6
(d) Southwest Indian law clinic 220.3 220.3
(e) Geospatial and population
studies/bureau of business
and economic research 417.2 417.2
(f) Manufacturing engineering
program 568.2 568.2
(g) Wildlife law education 101.8 101.8
(h) Community-based education 582.8 582.8
(i) Corrine Wolfe children's
law center 173.6 173.6
(j) Mock trial program and
high school forensics 411.6 411.6
(k) Utton transboundary
resources center 461.7 461.7
(l) University of New Mexico
press 482.5 482.5
(m) New Mexico bioscience
authority 335.5 335.5
(n) Natural heritage New Mexico
database 53.3 53.3
(o) Border justice initiative 196.5 196.5
(p) Wild friends program 79.9 79.9
(q) School of public
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 148

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
administration 103.7 103.7
(r) Teacher education
at branch colleges 62.8 62.8
(7) Health sciences center:
The purpose of the institution and general program of the university of New Mexico health sciences
center is to provide educational, clinical and research support for the advancement of the health of all
New Mexicans.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 621,660.0 175,824.8 797,484.8
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 126,381.3 78,122.7 7,178.3 211,682.3
The general fund appropriation to the health sciences center of the university of New Mexico in the
instruction and general purposes category includes twenty one million five hundred thousand dollars
($21,500,000) to provide compensation increases for clinical medical faculty and two million dollars
($2,000,000) to provide compensation increases for graduate medical education residents and fellows.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Percent of nursing graduates passing the requisite
licensure exam on first attempt 85%
(b) Output: Percent of university of New Mexico-trained primary care
residents practicing in New Mexico three years after
completing residency 50%
(c) Output: First-time pass rate on the American nurses credentialing
center family nurse practitioner certification exam 85%
(d) Output: First-time pass rate on the North American pharmacist
licensure examination by doctor of pharmacy graduates 80%
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 149

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(8) Health sciences center research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) ENLACE 980.7 980.7
(b) Graduate medical
education/residencies 2,549.0 2,549.0
(c) Office of medical
investigator 13,811.2 9,159.4 22,970.6
(d) Native American
suicide prevention 100.5 100.5
(e) Children's psychiatric
hospital 12,613.3 39,804.8 1,000.0 53,418.1
(f) Carrie Tingley hospital 9,871.9 16,501.4 26,373.3
(g) Newborn intensive care 3,673.0 14.8 245.6 3,933.4
(h) Pediatric oncology 1,677.7 1,677.7
(i) Poison and drug
information center 2,781.7 3.7 167.4 2,952.8
(j) Cancer center 8,461.4 3,607.3 14,620.5 26,689.2
(k) Genomics, biocomputing and
environmental health research 945.7 1,244.4 16,784.9 18,975.0
(l) Trauma specialty education 250.0 250.0
(m) Pediatrics specialty
education 250.0 250.0
(n) Native American health
center 336.0 336.0
(o) Graduate nurse education 4,824.2 4,824.2
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 150

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(p) Child abuse evaluation
center 166.1 166.1
(q) Hepatitis community health
outcomes 10,240.9 800.0 11,040.9
(r) Comprehensive movement
disorders clinic 436.5 436.5
(s) Office of the medical
investigator
grief services 341.7 341.7
(t) Physician assistant program 653.0 653.0
(u) Special needs dental clinic 500.0 500.0
(v) Undergraduate nursing
education 1,500.0 1,500.0
The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations to the health sciences center research
and public service projects for the university of New Mexico include one million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000) from the opioid crisis recovery fund from monies from settlements, judgments,
verdicts and other court orders relating to claims regarding the manufacturing, marketing, distribution
or sale of opioids.
The general fund appropriation to the hepatitis community health outcomes research and public
service project of the university of New Mexico health sciences center includes one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to facilitate training for behavioral health providers and provide
behavioral health services to patients in accordance with the Behavioral Health Reform and Investment
Act.
Subtotal 2,320,194.0
NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 151

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 142,700.0 144,600.0 287,300.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 190,699.6 172,600.0 15,000.0 378,299.6
(c) Athletics 8,022.9 15,700.0 100.0 23,822.9
(d) Educational television 1,524.6 3,400.0 4,924.6
(e) Tribal education
initiatives 300.0 300.0
(f) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 250.0 250.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 17,500
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 1,500
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 380,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated degree awards in the most recent
academic year 3,250
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 152

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
graduation time 60%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 80%
(2) Alamogordo branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 1,300.0 3,600.0 4,900.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 9,828.4 3,800.0 500.0 14,128.4
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,900
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 120
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 18,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 100
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(3) Dona Ana branch:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 153

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 10,100.0 19,700.0 29,800.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 34,371.5 24,200.0 5,300.0 63,871.5
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 9,712
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 1,019
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 128,223
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 1,185
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(4) Grants branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 154

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Other 900.0 2,100.0 3,000.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 4,746.0 2,300.0 1,000.0 8,046.0
(c) Tribal education
initiatives 100.0 100.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,300
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 100
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 10,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 80
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35.00%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(5) Department of agriculture:
Appropriations:
(a) Department of agriculture 19,228.3 7,255.0 13,200.0 39,683.3
The other state funds appropriation to the New Mexico department of agriculture of the New Mexico state
university includes four million three hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($4,345,000) from the land of
enchantment legacy fund. The New Mexico department of agriculture is responsible for administering this
funding and determining awardees.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 155

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(6) Agricultural experiment station:
Appropriations:
(a) Agricultural experiment
station 23,513.6 5,000.0 26,700.0 55,213.6
(7) Cooperative extension service:
Appropriations:
(a) Cooperative extension
service 19,630.0 9,700.0 11,700.0 41,030.0
(8) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Autism program 1,184.4 1,184.4
(b) Sunspot solar observatory
consortium 418.4 400.0 818.4
(c) STEM alliance for
minority participation 398.3 100.0 1,500.0 1,998.3
(d) Mental health nurse
practitioner 1,315.0 1,315.0
(e) Water resource research
institute 1,300.2 700.0 3,000.0 5,000.2
(f) Indian resources
development 291.4 25.0 200.0 516.4
(g) Manufacturing sector
development program 706.8 706.8
(h) Arrowhead center for
business development 418.3 1,400.0 3,200.0 5,018.3
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 156

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(i) Alliance teaching and
learning advancement 228.5 228.5
(j) College assistance migrant
program 311.4 100.0 600.0 1,011.4
(k) Dona Ana branch -
dental hygiene program 557.5 557.5
(l) Sustainable agriculture
center of excellence 527.3 527.3
(m) Anna age eight institute 2,160.4 2,160.4
(n) New Mexico produced
water consortium 2,259.6 300.0 2,559.6
(o) Nurse anesthesiology 500.0 500.0
Subtotal 978,772.4
NEW MEXICO HIGHLANDS UNIVERSITY:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 15,000.0 26,800.0 41,800.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 43,114.1 300.0 300.0 43,714.1
(c) Athletics 3,316.5 50.0 50.0 3,416.5
(d) Tribal education
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 157

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
initiatives 201.9 201.9
(e) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 252.6 252.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 6,901
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 180
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 61,800
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated degree awards in the most recent
academic year 800
(e) Output: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 50%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 70%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Advanced placement,
international baccalaureate
and PSAT 11th grade
test assistance 204.1 204.1
(b) Native American social
work institute 243.1 243.1
(c) Forest and watershed
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 158

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
institute 555.9 555.9
(d) Acequia and land grant
education 46.9 46.9
(e) Doctor of nurse
practitioner expansion 158.8 158.8
(f) Center for excellence
in social work 512.2 512.2
Subtotal 91,106.1
WESTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 3,455.0 6,300.0 9,755.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 33,851.7 14,912.8 670.0 49,434.5
(c) Athletics 3,208.8 1,250.0 4,458.8
(d) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 250.0 250.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 4,300
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 200
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 159

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 67,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated degree awards in the most recent
academic year 800
(e) Output: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 50%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 70%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Web-based teacher licensure 117.8 117.8
(b) Early childhood center 710.1 710.1
(c) Early childhood
center of excellence 500.0 500.0
Subtotal 65,226.2
EASTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 13,000.0 25,000.0 38,000.0
(b) Instruction and general
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 160

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
purposes 50,049.7 21,500.0 5,000.0 76,549.7
(c) Athletics 3,466.7 3,000.0 23.0 6,489.7
(d) Educational television 1,320.3 500.0 850.0 2,670.3
(e) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 250.0 250.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 7,550
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 450
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 109,500
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated degree awards in the most recent
academic year 1,350
(e) Output: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 50%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 70%
(2) Roswell branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 1,643.0 4,500.0 6,143.0
(b) Instruction and general
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 161

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
purposes 17,072.8 5,000.0 5,500.0 27,572.8
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 2,900
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 350
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 37,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 500
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(3) Ruidoso branch:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 300.0 200.0 500.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 3,118.5 2,000.0 3,500.0 8,618.5
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,300
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 162

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
New Mexico high school, by headcount 125
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 12,500
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 250
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(4) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Blackwater draw site and museum 96.4 61.0 157.4
(b) Teacher education
preparation program 182.4 182.4
(c) Greyhound promise 91.2 91.2
(d) ENMU-Ruidoso tribal
education initiatives 100.0 100.0
Subtotal 167,325.0
NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF MINING AND TECHNOLOGY:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 163

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Other 10,000.0 19,000.0 29,000.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 42,573.8 5,000.0 7,000.0 54,573.8
(c) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 50.0 50.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 2,000
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 165
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 34,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 300
(e) Output: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 60%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 80%
(2) Bureau of mine safety:
Appropriations:
(a) Bureau of mine safety 390.7 350.0 740.7
(3) Bureau of geology and mineral resources:
Appropriations:
(a) Bureau of geology and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 164

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
mineral resources 8,149.3 1,000.0 3,500.0 12,649.3
(4) Petroleum recovery research center:
Appropriations:
(a) Petroleum recovery research
center 2,211.9 1,500.0 7,500.0 11,211.9
(5) Geophysical research center:
Appropriations:
(a) Geophysical research
center 1,568.6 500.0 4,500.0 6,568.6
(6) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Energetic materials
research center 1,068.4 8,500.0 30,000.0 39,568.4
(b) Science and engineering
fair 219.8 219.8
(c) Institute for complex additive
systems analysis 1,261.1 2,000.0 18,000.0 21,261.1
(d) Cave and karst research 429.1 62.0 1,000.0 1,491.1
(e) Homeland security center 662.1 100.0 4,500.0 5,262.1
(f) Cybersecurity center
of excellence 550.3 310.0 600.0 1,460.3
(g) Rural economic development 32.8 32.8
(h) Chemical engineering
student assistanceships 199.3 199.3
(i) New Mexico mathematics,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 165

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
engineering and science
achievement 1,182.9 1,182.9
Subtotal 185,472.1
NORTHERN NEW MEXICO COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program is to provide education services designed to meet the
intellectual, educational and quality of life goals associated with the ability to enter the workforce,
compete and advance in the new economy and contribute to social advancement through informed
citizenship.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 5,405.3 4,851.0 10,256.3
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 15,729.7 8,318.2 4,718.1 28,766.0
(c) Athletics 582.7 297.2 879.9
(d) Teacher pipeline
initiatives 250.0 250.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,800
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 231
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 25,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 225
(e) Output: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking freshmen who complete a baccalaureate
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 166

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
program within one hundred fifty percent of standard
graduation time 50%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 70%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Science, technology, engineering,
arts and math initiative 125.2 125.2
(b) Demonstration farm 50.0 50.0
(c) Arts, cultural engagement
and sustainable agriculture 50.0 50.0
Subtotal 40,377.4
SANTA FE COMMUNITY COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 26,473.0 3,300.0 29,773.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 15,895.2 1,374.0 15,477.0 32,746.2
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 6,300
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 169
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 167

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 53,400
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 525
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) First born, home visiting
and technical assistance 461.8 461.8
(b) Teacher education expansion 175.7 175.7
(c) Small business development
centers 4,853.0 1,646.0 6,499.0
Subtotal 69,655.7
CENTRAL NEW MEXICO COMMUNITY COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 10,600.0 22,100.0 32,700.0
(b) Instruction and general
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 168

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
purposes 89,629.1 120,800.0 7,750.0 218,179.1
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 30,378
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 1,459
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 320,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 5,065
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time, full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Workforce development 70.0 70.0
Subtotal 250,949.1
LUNA COMMUNITY COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 898.2 1,245.0 2,143.2
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 169

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 10,077.4 2,366.2 1,774.3 14,217.9
(c) Athletics 521.9 521.9
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,208
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 96
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 14,549
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 146
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time, full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
Subtotal 16,883.0
MESALANDS COMMUNITY COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 242.2 842.9 1,085.1
(b) Instruction and general
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 170

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
purposes 5,729.0 366.4 87.9 6,183.3
(c) Athletics 218.1 218.1
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 1,100
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 200
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 9,500
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 75
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time, full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Wind training center 116.9 116.9
Subtotal 7,603.4
NEW MEXICO JUNIOR COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 171

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Other 3,600.0 3,000.0 6,600.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 9,096.9 29,000.0 450.0 38,546.9
(c) Athletics 722.6 722.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 3,250
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 650
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 46,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 400
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
Subtotal 45,869.5
SOUTHEAST NEW MEXICO COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 1,000.0 1,500.0 2,500.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 172

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 6,008.8 14,000.0 2,000.0 22,008.8
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 2,200
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 100
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 17,500
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 125
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
Subtotal 24,508.8
SAN JUAN COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 14,000.0 22,000.0 36,000.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 35,737.8 34,000.0 6,000.0 75,737.8
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 173

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(c) Tribal education
initiatives 100.0 100.0
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 9,000
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 400
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 110,000
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 1,300
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Dental hygiene program 235.0 235.0
(b) Renewable energy
center of excellence 750.0 750.0
Subtotal 112,822.8
CLOVIS COMMUNITY COLLEGE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the instruction and general program at New Mexico's community colleges is to provide
credit and noncredit postsecondary education and training opportunities to New Mexicans so they have the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 174

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
skills to be competitive in the new economy and are able to participate in lifelong learning activities.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 500.0 5,900.0 6,400.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 14,296.7 5,500.0 1,200.0 20,996.7
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of students enrolled, by headcount 3,700
(b) Output: Number of first-time freshmen enrolled who graduated from a
New Mexico high school, by headcount 130
(c) Output: Number of credit hours completed 35,850
(d) Output: Number of unduplicated awards conferred in the most recent
academic year 550
(e) Outcome: Percent of a cohort of first-time, full-time, degree- or
certificate-seeking community college students who complete
an academic program within one hundred fifty percent of
standard graduation time 35%
(f) Outcome: Percent of first-time full-time freshmen retained to the
third semester 60%
Subtotal 27,396.7
NEW MEXICO MILITARY INSTITUTE:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the New Mexico military institute program is to provide college-preparatory instruction
for students in a residential, military environment culminating in a high school diploma or associates
degree.
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 175

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Other 9,835.0 840.0 10,675.0
(b) Instruction and general
purposes 4,992.3 40,911.0 322.0 46,225.3
(c) Athletics 352.6 352.6
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Percent of third Friday high school seniors and junior
college sophomore students graduating with a high school
diploma or associate degree 77.5%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Knowles legislative
scholarship program 1,353.7 1,353.7
Subtotal 58,606.6
NEW MEXICO SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the New Mexico school for the blind and visually impaired program is to provide the
training, support and resources necessary to prepare blind and visually impaired children of New Mexico
to participate fully in their families, communities and workforce and to lead independent, productive
lives.
Appropriations:
(a) Instruction and general
purposes 4,172.4 19,510.3 435.0 24,117.7
Performance measures:
(a) Output: Number of New Mexico teachers who complete a personnel
preparation program to become a teacher of the visually
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 176

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
impaired 12
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
(a) Low vision clinic programs 111.1 111.1
Subtotal 24,228.8
NEW MEXICO SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF:
(1) Main campus:
The purpose of the New Mexico school for the deaf program is to provide a school-based comprehensive,
fully accessible and language-rich learning environment for its students who are deaf and hard-of-
hearing and to work collaboratively with families, agencies and communities throughout the state to meet
the unique communication, language and learning needs of children and youth who are deaf and hard-of-
hearing.
Appropriations:
(a) Instruction and general
purposes 7,662.7 25,136.9 32,799.6
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Rate of transition to postsecondary education,
vocational-technical training school, junior colleges, work
training or employment for graduates based on a three-year
rolling average 100%
(b) Outcome: Percent of first-year signers who demonstrate improvement
in American sign language based on fall or spring
assessments 100%
(2) Research and public service projects:
Appropriations:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 177

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(a) Statewide outreach services 300.0 300.0
(b) Teleaudiology screening 140.0 140.0
Subtotal 33,239.6
TOTAL HIGHER EDUCATION 1,517,951.0 2,253,165.0 96,883.3 956,236.4 4,824,235.7
K. PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT
Except as otherwise provided, unexpended balances of appropriations made in this subsection shall not
revert at the end of fiscal year 2027.
PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT:
(1) State equalization guarantee distribution:
The purpose of public school support is to carry out the mandate to establish and maintain a uniform
system of free public schools sufficient for the education of, and open to, all the children of school
age in the state.
Appropriations:
(a) Other 4,574,365.5 1,500.0 4,575,865.5
The rate of distribution of the state equalization guarantee distribution shall be based on a program
unit value determined by the secretary of public education. The secretary of public education shall
establish a preliminary unit value to establish budgets for the 2026-2027 school year and then, on
verification of the number of units statewide for fiscal year 2027 but no later than January 31, 2027,
the secretary of public education may adjust the program unit value. In setting the preliminary unit
value and the final unit value in January, the public education department shall consult with the
department of finance and administration, legislative finance committee and legislative education study
committee.
The general fund appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes sufficient
funding to provide all affected employees an hourly salary of at least fifteen dollars ($15.00).
The general fund appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes seventy-
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 178

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
three million one hundred fifty-three thousand nine hundred dollars ($73,153,900) contingent on
enactment of House Bill 47 or similar legislation in the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature
amending the Public School Insurance Authority Act to raise group insurance contributions for school
districts and charter schools in the public school insurance authority to at least eighty percent of the
cost of the insurance of an employee.
For fiscal year 2027, no school district may reorganize to create a school, a school district or
school program in which the majority of students attend school off campus during instructional days and
no new charter school may be authorized in which the majority of students attend school off campus
during instructional days.
For fiscal year 2027, a school district or charter school shall not be eligible for enrollment
growth program units pursuant to Section 22-8-23.1 NMSA 1978 for any student who participates in an
instructional program that does not require on-campus attendance during instructional days, except for
students who participated in such a program in the same school district or charter school during fiscal
year 2026, students whose individualized education program provides for remote instruction or for
students who enroll, or are enrolled, in a charter school that includes remote instruction as part of
its charter.
For fiscal year 2027, if the program cost made available is insufficient to meet the level of state
support required by the special education maintenance of effort requirements of Part B of the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, the public education department shall reduce the program
cost and state equalization guarantee distribution appropriation in an amount sufficient to cover the
projected shortfall and distribute that amount to school districts and charter schools in proportion to
each school district's and charter school's share of the total statewide program cost to meet the level
of support required by Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act for fiscal year
2027. The public education department shall reset the final unit value and recalculate each school
district's and charter school's program cost for fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 179

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The general fund appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes fifty-five
million dollars ($55,000,000) for school districts and charter schools to purchase culturally and
linguistically appropriate instructional materials for eligible students, including dual-credit
instructional materials and educational technology.
The general fund appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes fifty-nine
million dollars ($59,000,000) for school districts and charter schools to meet teacher mentorship
requirements pursuant to Section 22-10A-9 NMSA 1978, create an educational plan pursuant to Section 22-
8-6 NMSA 1978, provide scientifically based literacy programs pursuant to Section 22-13-29 NMSA 1978 and
Section 22-13-32 NMSA 1978, provide career technical education programs pursuant to Section 22-1-12 NMSA
1978 and implement the community school framework pursuant to Section 22-32-6 NMSA 1978.
The general fund appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes sufficient
funding to provide all persons holding and requesting a Native American language and culture certificate
and working in an instructional capacity a salary in accordance with Section 22-10A-13 NMSA 1978.
The public education department shall monitor and review the operating budgets of school districts
and charter schools to ensure the school district or charter school is prioritizing available funds to
those functions most likely to close the gap in student outcomes for students with disabilities, English
language learners, Native American students, and economically disadvantaged students, including outcomes
pursuant to Section 22-23 NMSA 1978, Section 22-23A NMSA 1978, Section 22-23B NMSA 1978 and Section 22-
23C NMSA 1978. If a school district or charter school submits a fiscal year 2027 operating budget that,
in the opinion of the secretary of public education, fails to prioritize funds as described in this
paragraph, the secretary of public education shall, prior to approving the school district's or charter
school's fiscal year 2027 budget, direct the school district or charter school to revise its submitted
budget or shall make such revisions as required to meet the requirements of this paragraph.
The general fund appropriation to the public school fund shall be reduced by the amounts
transferred to the public school fund from the current school fund and from federal Mineral Leasing Act
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 180

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
receipts otherwise unappropriated.
The other state funds appropriation to the state equalization guarantee distribution includes
balances received by the public education department pursuant to Section 66-5-44 NMSA 1978.
Any unexpended balances in the authorized distributions remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
from appropriations made from the general fund shall revert to the general fund.
Performance measures:
(a) Outcome: Eighth-grade math achievement gap between economically
disadvantaged students and all other students, in
percentage points 5%
(b) Outcome: Fourth-grade reading achievement gap between economically
disadvantaged students and all other students, in
percentage points 5%
(c) Outcome: Percent of fourth-grade students who achieve proficiency or
above on the standards-based assessment in reading 50%
(d) Outcome: Percent of fourth-grade students who achieve proficiency or
above on the standards-based assessment in mathematics 39%
(e) Outcome: Percent of eighth-grade students who achieve proficiency or
above on the standards-based assessment in reading 50%
(f) Outcome: Percent of eighth-grade students who achieve proficiency or
above on the standards-based assessment in mathematics 39%
(g) Quality: Graduation rate of current four-year cohort using shared
accountability 81%
(h) Explanatory: Percent of dollars budgeted by districts with fewer than
seven hundred fifty members for instructional support in
the budget categories for instruction, student support
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 181

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
services and instruction support services
(i) Explanatory: Percent of dollars budgeted by districts with seven hundred
fifty members or greater for instructional support in the
budget categories for instruction, student support services
and instruction support services
(j) Explanatory: Percent of dollars budgeted by charter schools for
instructional support in the budget categories for
instruction, student support services and instruction
support services
(k) Outcome: Percent of economically disadvantaged eighth-grade students
who achieve proficiency or above on the standards-based
assessment in mathematics 39%
(l) Outcome: Percent of economically disadvantaged eighth-grade students
who achieve proficiency or above on the standards-based
assessment in reading 40%
(m) Outcome: Percent of economically disadvantaged fourth-grade students
who achieve proficiency or above on the standards-based
assessment in reading 41%
(n) Outcome: Percent of economically disadvantaged fourth-grade students
who achieve proficiency or above on the standards-based
assessment in mathematics 39%
(o) Outcome: Percent of recent New Mexico high school graduates who take
remedial courses in higher education at two-year schools 29%
(p) Explanatory: Percent of funds generated by the at-risk index associated
with at-risk services
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 182

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(q) Outcome: Rate of chronic absenteeism among students in middle school 10%
(r) Outcome: Rate of chronic absenteeism among students in high school 10%
(s) Outcome: Rate of chronic absenteeism among students in elementary
school 10%
(2) Transportation distribution:
Appropriations:
(a) Other 143,318.9 143,318.9
The general fund appropriation to the transportation distribution includes one million three hundred
forty-three thousand six hundred dollars ($1,343,600), contingent on enactment of House Bill 47 or
similar legislation in the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature amending the Public School
Insurance Authority Act to raise group insurance contributions for school districts and charter schools
in the public school insurance authority to at least eighty percent of the cost of the insurance of an
employee.
(3) Supplemental distribution:
Appropriations:
(a) Out-of-state tuition 393.0 393.0
(b) Emergency supplemental 1,000.0 1,000.0
The secretary of public education shall not distribute any emergency supplemental funds to a school
district or charter school that is not in compliance with the Audit Act or that has cash and invested
reserves, other resources or any combination thereof equaling five percent or more of their operating
budget.
Any unexpended balances in the supplemental distribution of the public education department
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 from appropriations made from the general fund shall revert to
the general fund.
(4) Federal flow through:
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 183

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Appropriations:
(a) Other 579,500.0 579,500.0
(5) Indian education fund:
Appropriations:
(a) Other 20,000.0 20,000.0
(6) Standards-based assessments:
Appropriations:
(a) Other 12,770.0 12,770.0
Any unexpended balances in the standards-based assessments appropriation remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 from appropriations made from the general fund shall revert to the general fund.
Subtotal 5,332,847.4
TOTAL PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT 4,751,847.4 1,500.0 579,500.0 5,332,847.4
GRAND TOTAL FISCAL YEAR 2027
APPROPRIATIONS 11,054,102.0 6,786,017.6 2,194,265.2 13,451,841.7 33,486,226.5
Section 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS. -- The following amounts are appropriated from the general fund
or other funds as indicated for the purposes specified. Unless otherwise indicated, the appropriation
may be expended in fiscal year 2027. Unless otherwise indicated, any unexpended balances of the
appropriations remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the appropriate fund.
(1) LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SERVICE 2,000.0 2,000.0
For a legislative subcommittee in fiscal year 2026 and 2027, contingent on passage of House Resolution 1
of the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature. The internal services funds/interagency
transfers appropriation is from settlement funds received by the attorney general.
(2) LEGISLATIVE FINANCE COMMITTEE
Legislative Finance Committee evaluation
(3) LEGISLATIVE FINANCE COMMITTEE 2,000.0 2,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 184

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To contract for a higher education performance-based funding formula. Any unexpended balances remaining
at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2028.
(4) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS
The period of time for expending the four million ($4,000,000) appropriated from the general fund in
Subsection 14 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 to pilot universal needs and risk screening,
including for treatment court placement at courts, pilot professional peer support for pretrial services
and at courts, provide grants for other pilot programs to improve pretrial services and behavioral
health services and evaluate the effectiveness of all funded programs is extended through fiscal year
2027.
(5) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS
The period of time for expending the five million dollars ($5,000,000) appropriated in Subsection 12 of
Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to purchase hardware, software, equipment and project management
services to upgrade remote and hybrid judicial proceedings across the state is extended through fiscal
year 2027.
(6) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE COURTS 1,200.0 1,200.0
For improvements, repairs and security infrastructure at court facilities statewide.
(7) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE COURTS 750.0 750.0
For information technology hardware and software for courts statewide, including conversion to
electronic records.
(8) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS
The period of time for expending six million dollars ($6,000,000) appropriated from the general fund in
Subsection 15 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the Santa Fe magistrate court is extended
through fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 185

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(9) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE COURTS 900.0 900.0
For cybersecurity upgrades.
(10) FIRST JUDICIAL DISTRICT COURT 200.0 200.0
To lease space for a new judgeship, contingent on enactment of Senate Bill 35 or House Bill 95 or
similar legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature creating an additional
judgeship. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be
expended in fiscal year 2028.
(11) FIRST JUDICIAL
DISTRICT ATTORNEY 4,200.0 4,200.0
For a pilot program to support implementation of the case management order to include evaluation and
metrics of the pilot. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert
and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(12) FIRST JUDICIAL DISTRICT ATTORNEY
The period of time for expending the one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) appropriated from the
general fund in Subsection 17 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to create and evaluate a
diversion program for juveniles and young adults designed to reduce recidivism is extended through
fiscal year 2027.
(13) SECOND JUDICIAL DISTRICT ATTORNEY 2,500.0 2,500.0
For the organized crime commission. The internal services funds/interagency transfers appropriation is
from the consumer settlement fund.
(14) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEYS
Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 from revenues received in fiscal year
2026 and prior years by a district attorney from any Native American tribe, pueblo or political
subdivision pursuant to a contract, memorandum of understanding, joint powers agreement or grant shall
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 186

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
not revert and shall remain with the recipient district attorney's office for expenditure in fiscal year
2027. Prior to November 1, 2026, the administrative office of the district attorneys shall provide the
department of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee a detailed report
documenting the amount of all funds received from Native American tribes, pueblos and political
subdivisions pursuant to a contract, memorandum of understanding, joint powers agreement or grant that
do not revert at the end of fiscal year 2026 for each of the district attorneys and the administrative
office of the district attorneys.
(15) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS 429.0 429.0
For information technology software for district attorney offices statewide.
(16) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEYS
Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 from revenues received in fiscal year
2026 and prior years by a district attorney or the administrative office of the district attorneys from
the United States department of justice pursuant to the southwest border prosecution initiative shall
not revert and shall remain with the recipient district attorney's office for expenditure in fiscal year
2027. Prior to November 1, 2026, the administrative office of the district attorneys shall provide to
the department of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee a detailed report
documenting the amount of all southwest border prosecution initiative funds that do not revert at the
end of fiscal year 2026 for each of the district attorneys and the administrative office of the district
attorneys.
(17) PUBLIC DEFENDER DEPARTMENT 240.0 240.0
For externship and internship initiatives.
(18) ATTORNEY GENERAL 350.0 350.0
For cybersecurity. The other state funds appropriation is from the consumer settlement fund.
(19) ATTORNEY GENERAL 600.0 600.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 187

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
For litigation of the tobacco master settlement agreement.
(20) ATTORNEY GENERAL
The period of time for expending the eight million dollars ($8,000,000) appropriated from the consumer
settlement fund in Subsection 28 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 24
of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as further extended in Subsection 25 of Section 5 of Chapter 160
of Laws 2025 to address the harms to the state and its communities resulting from the Gold King mine
release is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(21) ATTORNEY GENERAL
The period of time for expending the six million four hundred thousand dollars ($6,400,000) appropriated
from the consumer settlement fund in Subsection 23 of Section 5 of Chapter 137 of Laws 2021 as extended
in Subsection 31 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 for interstate water litigation costs is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
(22) ATTORNEY GENERAL 6,500.0 6,500.0
For extraordinary litigation expenses related to consumer protection and changes in federal funding
policies for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2029. The other state funds appropriation is from
the consumer settlement fund.
(23) ATTORNEY GENERAL
The period of time for expending the two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) appropriated from the
government results and opportunity program fund in Paragraph 7 of Subsection D of Section 9 of Chapter
69 of Laws 2024 for missing and murdered indigenous women and relatives taskforce is extended through
fiscal year 2027.
(24) ATTORNEY GENERAL
The period of time for expending the six hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) appropriated from
the general fund in Subsection 7 of Section 9 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the office of the child
advocate is extended through fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 188

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(25) ATTORNEY GENERAL 500.0 500.0
For personal services and employee benefits in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The other state funds
appropriation is from the consumer settlement fund.
(26) STATE AUDITOR
The period of time for expending the five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) appropriated from the
general fund in Subsection 32 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to develop a plan for migration
to a single financial audit for the state of New Mexico is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(27) STATE AUDITOR
The period of time for expending the one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated from the general fund
in Subsection 31 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to assist small local public bodies in
attaining financial compliance is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(28) STATE AUDITOR 500.0 500.0
For technical assistance for the small local public bodies compliance program.
(29) TAXATION AND REVENUE
DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For information technology needs, including one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for costs related to
sharing tax information with legislative oversight bodies.
(30) TAXATION AND REVENUE
DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
To purchase and install replacement equipment for processing taxpayer and motor vehicle mailings.
(31) TAXATION AND REVENUE DEPARTMENT
Subject to approval of an expenditure plan by the state board of finance, the taxation and revenue
department may request up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the appropriation contingency fund
to implement tax and Motor Vehicle Code changes.
(32) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 189

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
AND ADMINISTRATION 250.0 250.0
For civil legal services.
(33) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 2,750.0 2,750.0
For educational television and public radio, including one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for KANW
educational radio station. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not
revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(34) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,200.0 1,200.0
For fire station improvements in Grants.
(35) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,500.0 1,500.0
For horse racing.
(36) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 4,000.0 4,000.0
To Grant county for the purchase and installation of medical equipment related to cancer treatment,
including computer hardware and software, and to plan, design, renovate, furnish and equip medical
facilities in Grant county.
(37) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) appropriated from the
general fund in Subsection 42 of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 55 of
Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for statewide and local law enforcement, correctional and
detention agencies for recruitment grants for law enforcement, probation, correctional and detention
officers is extended through fiscal year 2027. Local law enforcement agencies shall submit monthly crime
incident and ballistic information to the department of public safety as prescribed by the secretary of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 190

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the department of public safety. Contingent on enactment of House Bill 255 or similar legislation of the
second session of the fifty-seventh legislature creating the public safety workforce building program,
any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert to the general fund
but shall revert to the public safety workforce capacity building fund.
(38) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 2,000.0 2,000.0
For local public safety infrastructure and capacity building, legal services, legal training, case
workers and other public safety supports for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and fiscal year 2028 in
Luna county, Hidalgo county and Dona Ana county, including four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for
dedicated law enforcement in Luna county.
(39) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 20,000.0 20,000.0
To the New Mexico match fund.
(40) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,500.0 1,500.0
From the rural county cancer treatment fund at the New Mexico finance authority to Grant county for the
purchase and installation of medical equipment related to cancer treatment, including computer hardware
and software, and to plan, design, renovate, furnish and equip medical facilities in Grant county.
(41) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 50,000.0 50,000.0
For distribution to the New Mexico mortgage finance authority, to fund affordable housing, transitional
housing, homelessness initiatives and the expansion of housing services statewide, including to fund
downpayment assistance and interest rate buydown for for-sale housing and five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) for administration of the Affordable Housing Act. Any unexpended balances remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in subsequent fiscal years.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 191

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(42) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 10.0 10.0
To purchase computers and equipment to support the New Mexico acequia commission.
(43) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 150.0 150.0
For the New Mexico infrastructure conference.
(44) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For medications for opioid use disorder programming for incarcerated individuals in Bernalillo county,
including funds for additional nursing capacity and an injectable monthly extended release buprenorphine
pilot project. The other state funds appropriation is from the opioid settlement fund.
(45) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 20,000.0 20,000.0
For the housing development revolving fund of the New Mexico finance authority to continue funding
affordable and attainable housing throughout the state, including five million dollars ($5,000,000) for
tribal housing infrastructure in consultation with the Indian affairs department.
(46) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 3,200.0 3,200.0
To a police station in Grants.
(47) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 12,000.0 12,000.0
For a building for primary healthcare in Taos.
(48) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 3,500.0 3,500.0
For a public safety complex in Guadalupe county to create a senior health, wellness and public safety
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 192

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
pilot.
(49) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For public safety grants to entities that facilitate community gatherings, including for public safety
personnel, security equipment and safety infrastructure.
(50) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) appropriated from the
general fund and six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) appropriated from the law
enforcement workforce capacity building fund in Subsection 48 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws of
2023 for law enforcement programs is extended through fiscal year 2027. The general fund appropriation
includes thirty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($32,500,000) for the law enforcement
workforce capacity building fund through fiscal year 2028, contingent on enactment of House Bill 357 or
similar legislation of the first session of the fifty-sixth legislature creating the fund. The general
fund appropriation also includes fifty-seven million dollars ($57,000,000) for state and local law
enforcement agencies for commissioned law enforcement officers and civilian personnel whose positions
directly support commissioned law enforcement officers and crime reduction efforts, ten million dollars
($10,000,000) for felony warrant enforcement statewide and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for
the department of public safety for enforcement projects related to fentanyl, heroin and illegal
cannabis through fiscal year 2027, provided that three million dollars ($3,000,000) appropriated from
the general fund shall not be expended for the original purpose but is reappropriated from the general
fund for in ear active electronic hearing protection for New Mexico law enforcement officers and first
responders. Contingent on enactment of House Bill 255 or similar legislation of the second session of
the fifty-seventh legislature creating the public safety workforce building program, any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert to the general fund but shall revert
to the public safety workforce capacity building fund.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 193

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(51) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 46 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for local public safety infrastructure
and capacity building, legal services, legal training, case workers and other legal and public safety
supports and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for administrative support at the department of
finance and administration is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(52) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 47 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for regional recreation centers and
quality of life grants statewide is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(53) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 5,000.0 5,000.0
For Red Rock park.
(54) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 3,000.0 3,000.0
For a senior center in Gallup.
(55) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 670.0 670.0
For technical training and assistance to support soil and water conservation districts.
(56) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For a sports hall of fame. The other state funds appropriation is from the art in public places fund.
(57) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 150.0 150.0
For the transition to the new executive administration.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 194

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(58) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 52 of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 58 of Section 5
of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for transitional housing and shelter facilities for victims of domestic
violence, including up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) for facilities in northwest New Mexico, is
extended through fiscal year 2027 and up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) may be used for fire and
public safety facilities in Grants.
(59) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 5,000.0 5,000.0
For distribution to the New Mexico mortgage finance authority for tribal housing projects and
infrastructure, in consultation with the Indian affairs department.
(60) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 100.0 100.0
For the commission on the status of women.
(61) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 500.0 500.0
For the north central New Mexico economic development district to study and develop a plan for the
implementation of the cambiar model of juvenile justice in the northeastern quadrant of New Mexico,
including an economic analysis of implementation costs, workforce and service impacts, potential fiscal
effects and public outreach and stakeholder engagement with affected communities, service providers,
local governments and tribal entities.
(62) GENERAL SERVICES DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
To purchase vehicles for the motor pool fleet.
(63) GENERAL SERVICES DEPARTMENT 100,000.0 100,000.0
For state fair redevelopment, including thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for housing.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 195

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(64) GENERAL SERVICES DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
To the public building repair fund.
(65) NEW MEXICO SENTENCING
COMMISSION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For a data integration project to facilitate criminal justice data in the state. Any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year
2028.
(66) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 398.8 398.8
For employee liability insurance premiums.
(67) DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY 21,000.0 21,000.0
To support cybersecurity initiatives for executive branch agencies, public education institutions,
institutions of higher education, municipalities, counties and other public entities.
(68) DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY 5,000.0 5,000.0
For digital trunk radio systems for emergency responders statewide, contingent on the department
implementing a local match requirement.
(69) DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
The period of time for expending the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 65 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for cybersecurity initiatives, including
initiatives for public schools and institutions of higher education to govern, identify, protect,
detect, respond and recover, and cybersecurity insurance coverage and subscriptions for the state,
including up to seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) for the consortium of higher
education institutions statewide that shall not be used for administrative overhead expenses, is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 196

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(70) DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
The period of time for expending the twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) appropriated from the
general fund and the ninety-nine million dollars ($99,000,000) appropriated from the connect New Mexico
fund in Subsection 68 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 to fund grant programs established under
department rules and administered by the office of broadband access and expansion to support
implementation of the statewide broadband plan, including twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for
public school projects and five million dollars ($5,000,000) for tribal projects, as extended in
Subsection 63 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 is extended through fiscal year 2027. Up to five
percent of the general fund appropriation and the other state funds appropriation may be used for
administration and operational expenses for the office of broadband access and expansion and related
grant programs.
(71) SECRETARY OF STATE 200.0 200.0
For website improvements and to comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.
(72) SECRETARY OF STATE 15,000.0 15,000.0
For the election fund for the 2026 general election.
(73) SECRETARY OF STATE 560.0 560.0
For improvements to the statewide voter registration and election management system.
(74) SECRETARY OF STATE
The balance of the general fund appropriation contained in Subsection 70 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of
Laws 2025 for moving expenses shall not be expended for the original purpose but is appropriated for
website improvements and the period of time for expending the appropriation is extended through fiscal
year 2027.
(75) PERSONNEL BOARD 150.0 150.0
For the summer internship program.
(76) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 1,900.0 1,900.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 197

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
For grants to tribal and local governments for tourism-related infrastructure projects through the
destination forward grant program. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2028.
(77) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For the Las Cruces air show.
(78) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 18,000.0 18,000.0
For national and international marketing and advertising campaigns, including up to two million dollars
($2,000,000) for the marketing excellence bureau.
(79) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
For the New Mexico bowl.
(80) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For the Roswell air show.
(81) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
To promote athletic competitions for people with disabilities.
(82) TOURISM DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For the four hundredth anniversary wine celebration.
(83) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
To the technology and innovation division for account managers for targeted sectors. Any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year
2028.
(84) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
For the purchase of time on the cloud for quantum computing.
(85) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 198

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
DEPARTMENT 4,000.0 4,000.0
For creative industries grants. The other state funds appropriation is from the art in public places
fund.
(86) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 49,300.0 49,300.0
For the quantum benchmarking initiative to match funds from the federal defense advanced research
projects agency. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and
may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(87) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 11,600.0 11,600.0
For grants supporting small businesses, entrepreneurs, start-ups and research and development in the
science and technology target sectors.
(88) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
For distribution to New Mexico higher education institutions for endowed faculty positions and
postdoctoral researchers for the education ecosystem.
(89) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For the healthy food financing program.
(90) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 89 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for physical economic development
infrastructure, including five million dollars for innovation hubs and ten million dollars ($10,000,000)
for quantum space is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(91) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 199

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
DEPARTMENT 15,000.0 15,000.0
For innovation hubs, including seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for start-up costs and six hundred
thousand dollars ($600,000) for aerospace. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year
2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(92) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 215.0 215.0
For information technology hardware and software.
(93) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 3,500.0 3,500.0
For outdoor equity grants.
(94) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 38,000.0 38,000.0
For a single centralized open user facility for applied quantum information science research, including
capabilities that meet national security needs for full collaboration with national laboratories and
including workforce training space and equipment, contingent on the facility being able to house a
quantum computer and being capable of creating a hybrid classical-quantum computing workspace. Any
unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in
fiscal year 2028.
(95) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For the quantum New Mexico institute.
(96) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 110,000.0 110,000.0
For the research, development and deployment fund, contingent on performance outcomes, including
research spending, jobs created and business scaling, and including at least forty million dollars
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 200

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
($40,000,000) for quantum initiatives and at least forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for advanced
energy initiatives.
(97) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT
The balance of the general fund appropriation contained in Subsection 92 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of
Laws 2025 for site characterization and predevelopment assessment with eight million dollars
($8,000,000) for expenditure in fiscal year 2026, eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for expenditure in
fiscal year 2027 and eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for expenditure in fiscal year 2028 shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is reappropriated for site characterization and predevelopment
assessment for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2028.
(98) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
For a space commission working group, contingent on enactment of House Bill 96 or similar legislation of
the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature creating the space commission working group.
(99) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For the technology innovation prize program.
(100)ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For business recruitment and attraction efforts to promote New Mexico's economic development
opportunities.
(101)ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
For trails plus grants.
(102)ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT 350.0 350.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 201

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
For veteran outdoor recreational retreats.
(103)REGULATION AND LICENSING
DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
For social work compact start-up costs.
(104)PUBLIC REGULATION COMMISSION 1,500.0 1,500.0
To administer the community solar program.
(105)OFFICE OF SUPERINTENDENT
OF INSURANCE 625.0 625.0
For litigation expenses. The internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriation is from the
insurance operating fund.
(106)OFFICE OF SUPERINTENDENT OF INSURANCE
The period of time for expending the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 102 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the New Mexico fair access to
insurance requirements program for mitigation, property insurance needs, programs and initiatives
statewide is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(107)NEW MEXICO STATE FAIR 200.0 200.0
For the state fair.
(108)BOARD OF VETERINARY MEDICINE 90.0 90.0
For veterinary and shelter inspections.
(109)OFFICE OF MILITARY BASE PLANNING
AND SUPPORT 3,000.0 3,000.0
To the military base impact fund.
(110)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) appropriated from
the general fund in Subsection 113 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to upgrade websites to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 202

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(111)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 109 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for federal Native
American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act compliance is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(112)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
For a partnership with the northern Rio Grande for economic development at the Los Luceros historic
site.
(113)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For a low rider museum in Espanola. The other state funds appropriation is from the art in public places
fund.
(114)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For the twenty-fifth anniversary of the national Hispanic cultural center.
(115)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act compliance. Any unexpended balances
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(116)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 400.0 400.0
For an archaeological field school.
(117)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For the rural libraries endowment fund.
(118)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
To move fossils from the San Juan basin.
(119)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 250.0 250.0
To nominate el Camino Real de Tierra Adentro as a world heritage site.
(120)CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 400.0 400.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 203

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
For the New Mexico women's historical marker program.
(121)DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE 3,000.0 3,000.0
For aquatic endangered species and hatcheries.
(122)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For a wildfire mapping database and artificial-intelligence-enabled early detection camera network
system.
(123)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 25,000.0 25,000.0
For community energy project completion.
(124)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
For legal fees related to defending the state in Atencio v. state of New Mexico No. D-101-CV-2023-01038.
The internal services funds/interagency transfers appropriation is from the consumer settlement fund.
(125)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 122 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for forest management, restoration,
thinning and vegetation management is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(126)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
To the geothermal projects development fund to advance geothermal projects in New Mexico and expand
state-level investments in geothermal energy.
(127)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 204

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The period of time for expending the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 123 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to the geothermal projects development
fund to advance geothermal projects in New Mexico and to expand state-level investment in geothermal
projects is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(128)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 5,000.0 5,000.0
To the grid modernization grant fund including, for micro-grid development and deployment.
(129)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 101 of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in
Subsection 128 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to develop the Rio Grande trail commission
office is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(130)ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL
RESOURCES DEPARTMENT 600.0 600.0
To acquire electrical service for a sawmill in Sandoval county. The other state funds appropriation is
from the grid modernization grant fund.
(131)STATE LAND OFFICE 200.0 200.0
For land appraisal. The other state funds appropriation is from the state lands maintenance fund.
(132)STATE ENGINEER 2,000.0 2,000.0
To fund acequia projects statewide. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(133)STATE ENGINEER 9,000.0 9,000.0
To the interstate stream commission for river conveyance and improvement projects along the main stem of
the Rio Grande and its tributaries and for work in partnership with the middle Rio Grande conservancy
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 205

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
district to plan, implement and maintain bosque management projects in the middle Rio Grande valley. Any
unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in
fiscal year 2029.
(134)STATE ENGINEER 2,000.0 2,000.0
For activities that protect New Mexico's interest in the Colorado river basin. Any unexpended balances
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(135)STATE ENGINEER 2,500.0 2,500.0
To implement the Water Security Planning Act, implement the fifty-year water action plan and improve
online information and engagement tools.
(136)STATE ENGINEER 22,500.0 22,500.0
For depletion reductions, increasing water supply and implementing the settlement resolving interstate
litigation on the lower Rio Grande. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(137)STATE ENGINEER 15,000.0 15,000.0
To support and fund Indian water rights settlements, for expenditure through fiscal year 2029.
(138)STATE ENGINEER 13,000.0 13,000.0
To the strategic water reserve fund.
(139)STATE ENGINEER 1,000.0 1,000.0
For weather modification.
(140)STATE ENGINEER
The period of time for expending the five million dollars ($5,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 30 of Section 10 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 to plan, engineer, design, construct or
repair acequias or community ditches, for the purposes of restoration, repair, improvement of irrigation
efficiency or protection from floods, including up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for
administrative expenses, is extended through fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 206

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(141)STATE ENGINEER
The period of time for expending the one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated from the general fund
in Subsection 138 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for regional water planning is extended
through fiscal year 2027.
(142)STATE ENGINEER
The period of time for expending the five million dollars ($5,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 139 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to implement the Water Security Planning
Act, the fifty-year water action plan and modernization of agency online information and engagement
tools, is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(143)COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND 131.9 131.9
For the client assistance program in cooperation with the vocational rehabilitation division, contingent
on enactment of federal legislation transferring responsibility to states for the client assistance
program.
(144)INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 429.6 429.6
For public television and radio. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall
not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(145)INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty five million dollars ($25,000,000) appropriated from the
general fund to the Indian affairs department in Subsection 113 of Section 5 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023
as extended in Subsection 112 of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 145 of
Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for tribal projects shall not be expended for the original purpose
but is reappropriated to the higher education department. Two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($2,250,000) of the remaining balance of the appropriation shall be used for the establishment,
maintenance and operations of two tribal technical assistance centers in fiscal year 2027.
(146)INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 207

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
For tribal governments to plan, design, study and implement introduction and care of wildlife on tribal
lands, including one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the care and management of free-roaming and
domestic horses.
(147)INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT 100.0 100.0
For indigenous youth programming.
(148)EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND
CARE DEPARTMENT 400.0 400.0
For planning and implementation of the statewide convening to advance Native American early childhood
education and care.
(149)EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND
CARE DEPARTMENT 5,000.0 5,000.0
For software that is system and organizational control type 2 cybersecurity compliant to provide a
licensing, attendance, program oversight, quality review, recruitment and subpool support tool that
integrates with existing finder and licensing systems.
(150)AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES
DEPARTMENT 600.0 600.0
For emergencies, disaster preparedness, urgent supplemental programmatic needs and planning to serve
seniors and adults with disabilities. The other state funds appropriation is from the Kiki Saavedra
senior dignity fund.
(151)AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES
DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
To the Kiki Saavedra senior dignity fund, contingent on the department of finance and administration
creating a fund in the statewide human resources, accounting and management reporting system.
(152)AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 208

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To expand the New MexiCare program.
(153)AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES
DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For the New Mexico grown program for senior citizens. The other state funds appropriation is from the
Kiki Saavedra senior dignity fund.
(154)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 25,000.0 25,000.0
For affordability programs to prevent coverage loss resulting from federal cuts. The other state funds
appropriation is from the health care affordability fund.
(155)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 2,000.0 2,000.0
For costs associated with competency to stand trial examinations, testing and court-ordered testimony
provided by contracted forensic examiners.
(156)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 7,000.0 7,000.0
To implement development, delivery and support for a new training infrastructure for statewide
screening, brief intervention and referral to treatment as mandated by Chapter 156 of Laws 2025.
(157)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 40,000.0 40,000.0
For maintaining health coverage for lawfully present medicaid enrollees who will lose medicaid
eligibility on October 1, 2026. The other state funds appropriation is from the health care
affordability fund.
(158)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 38,100.0 38,100.0
To offset the expiration of enhanced federal premium tax credits enacted in the Inflation Reduction Act
of 2022 that removed the four hundred percent of the federal poverty level income limitation for
eligibility for advance premium tax credits for coverage purchased through the health insurance
exchange, contingent on the federal government not extending the enhanced federal premium tax credits.
If the enhanced federal premium tax credits are extended by the federal government at any time during
fiscal year 2027, any unexpended funds in this appropriation shall revert to the health care
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 209

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
affordability fund. The other state funds appropriation is from the health care affordability fund.
(159)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 200.0 200.0
For an innovative residential treatment services in Dona Ana county.
(160)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 5,400.0 5,400.0
For security enhancements of the electronic benefits transfer card.
(161)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 4,371.0 8,794.5 13,165.5
For posting and notice-related costs resulting from revised federal policy changes.
(162)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 8,855.2 8,855.2
For support system improvements, staff training and process enhancements to reduce payment errors,
strengthen compliance and mitigate future liability under federal quality control requirements.
(163)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 1,000.0 1,000.0
For obstetrician-gynecologist services and infrastructure to cover Cibola, McKinley, San Juan, Valencia
and Catron counties.
(164)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
The period of time for expending the one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 163 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to the health care
authority for innovative residential treatment services in Dona Ana county is extended through fiscal
year 2027.
(165)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
The period of time for expending the four million nine hundred seventy-three thousand four hundred
dollars ($4,973,400) appropriated from the general fund and the seventeen million one hundred sixty
thousand dollars ($17,160,000) in federal funds in Subsection 155 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws
2025 to continue the capacity building for the criminal justice medicaid waiver initiative is extended
through fiscal year 2027.
(166)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 210

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The balance of the eight million one hundred twenty-nine thousand four hundred dollars ($8,129,400)
appropriated from the general fund and twenty-eight million six hundred thirty-eight thousand six
hundred dollars ($28,638,600) appropriated in federal funds in Subsection 162 of Section 5 of Chapter
160 of Laws 2025 to continue startup costs to build capacity for housing providers for people
experiencing homelessness and to build capacity for medical services for people involved with the
criminal justice system shall not be expended for its original purpose but is reappropriated for costs
to build capacity for food, medical respite and housing providers for expenditure in fiscal year 2027.
(167)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY 2,500.0 2,500.0
For the supplemental nutrition assistance education program, in consultation with the higher education
department for distribution to higher education institutions.
(168)HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
The period of time for expending the four million fifteen thousand dollars ($4,015,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 171 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to study the merits,
feasibility, costs and likely enrollment in a proposed new medicaid waiver for people with serious
mental illness or substance dependency leading to regular confinement in county jails or intensive
overuse of hospital emergency rooms or other emergency or crisis services versus continuing with the
current service array for people with serious mental illness is extended through fiscal year 2027 and
may be used to develop waiver application and other necessary actions to seek approval of the proposal
from the federal government.
(169)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 250.0 250.0
For a pilot program to provide professional development toward licensure of bilingual behavioral
healthcare professionals and culturally and linguistically specific trauma-informed mental health, case
management, prevention and social work services in Bernalillo county.
(170)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 75.0 75.0
To continue the commercial driver's license training program in San Miguel, Mora, Colfax and Taos
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 211

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
counties.
(171)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the six million nine hundred six thousand two hundred dollars
($6,906,200) from the energy transition displaced worker assistance fund in Subsection 174 of Section 5
of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the purpose of assisting displaced workers in affected communities is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
(172)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS
DEPARTMENT 30,000.0 30,000.0
To fund housing, affordable housing, transitional housing, homelessness initiatives and the expansion of
housing services statewide.
(173)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS
DEPARTMENT 270.0 270.0
For an internship pilot project to match contributions from employers.
(174)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS
DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
For local news fellowships.
(175)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS
DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For workforce development efforts for adults, youth and dislocated workers.
(176)WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS 5,000.0 5,000.0
For rental assistance.
(177)DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
COUNCIL 250.0 250.0
For advocates and consultants to provide services to students with disabilities, assist the special
education ombud staff and provide outreach and training.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 212

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(178)DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
COUNCIL 200.0 200.0
To reduce the waiting list for legal and guardianship services.
(179)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 1,800.0 1,800.0
For mosquito surveillance, prevention and mitigation. The department of health may use up to one million
five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to provide grants to local governments and state educational
institutions enumerated in Article 12, Section 11 of the New Mexico constitution for mosquito
surveillance, prevention and mitigation projects. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(180)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 1,500.0 1,500.0
For an opioid addiction prevention program that addresses the root cause of the opioid crisis by
improving pain management protocols for surgical patients and providing personalized nurse navigation
and evidence-based clinical implementation support.
(181)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 2,500.0 2,500.0
To manage operation of the Comprehensive Addiction and Recovery Act program.
(182)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 2,200.0 2,200.0
For instruments and equipment for the toxicology bureau.
(183)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 2,000.0 2,000.0
For facilities repair and maintenance.
(184)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
The period of time for expending the one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated to the department of
health in Subsection 195 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for operational expenses for enacting
the Medical Psilocybin Act is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(185)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 4,000.0 4,000.0
For rural and tribal health councils.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 213

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(186)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 1,000.0 1,000.0
To expand women, infants and children and senior farmers' market nutrition program benefits.
(187)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 165.0 165.0
For a public service campaign on shaken baby syndrome.
(188)DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 3,000.0 3,000.0
To recruit, train and provide stipends to medical and behavioral health preceptors in medically
underserved areas. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and
may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(189)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 25,000.0 25,000.0
For circular economy and industrial decarbonization initiatives.
(190)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 5,750.0 5,750.0
To the wastewater facility construction loan fund.
(191)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) appropriated in Subsection 203
of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the investigation and remediation of neglected contaminated
sites is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(192)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 20,000.0 20,000.0
To the uranium mining reclamation revolving fund, including use for litigation related to uranium mining
cleanup.
(193)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 5,000.0 5,000.0
To the neglected and contaminated sites fund.
(194)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 130.0 130.0
To explore pollution reduction and cost-saving opportunities resulting from the diversion of organic
waste from the solid waste stream and to conduct a waste characterization study to assess the current
types and quantities of solid waste, organic waste and composting feed stock produced and disposed of in
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 214

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the state.
(195)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 4,000.0 4,000.0
To support drinking water needs statewide, including private well testing and treatment. Any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year
2028.
(196)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
To the water quality management fund for the river stewardship program.
(197)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 5,000.0 5,000.0
To the rural infrastructure revolving loan fund for low-interest loans to rural communities for water,
wastewater and solid waste projects.
(198)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 35,000.0 35,000.0
To the strategic water supply program fund.
(199)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For a state surface water permitting program.
(200)DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT
The period of time for expending the seven million dollars ($7,000,000) appropriated in Subsection 207
of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the development, implementation and administration of state
surface water and groundwater permitting programs is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(201)OFFICE OF NATURAL
RESOURCES TRUSTEE 70,000.0 70,000.0
For land or interest in land for the creation, expansion or restoration of state public land, including
up to twenty one million dollars ($21,000,000) for state matching dollars to political subdivisions of
the state that have been approved for federal assistance funding due to natural disasters. Any
unexpended balances remaining at end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal
year 2028.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 215

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(202)OFFICE OF NATURAL
RESOURCES TRUSTEE 15,000.0 15,000.0
For natural resources restoration for expenditure in fiscal year 2026 and 2027. The internal services
funds/interagency transfers appropriation is from the consumer settlement fund.
(203)VETERANS' SERVICES DEPARTMENT 450.0 450.0
For operational costs of the mobile veteran resource unit. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end
of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(204)VETERANS' SERVICES DEPARTMENT 75.0 75.0
For statewide medical transportation for veterans.
(205)VETERANS' SERVICES DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
For suicide prevention services and outreach to veterans and their families.
(206)VETERANS' SERVICES DEPARTMENT 250.0 250.0
For the operations of the state veterans cemetery in Taos.
(207)VETERANS' SERVICES DEPARTMENT 75.0 75.0
To support veterans and their families who are experiencing, or are at risk of, homelessness.
(208)OFFICE OF FAMILY REPRESENTATION
AND ADVOCACY 120.0 120.0
For expansion costs, including information technology equipment, office furniture and vehicle leases.
(209)CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 2,500.0 2,500.0
For the cost of co-neutral services required pursuant to the Kevin S., et al. v. Blalock, et al., No.
1:18-CV-00896 settlement agreement.
(210)CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 10,500.0 10,500.0
For multiservice homes.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 216

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(211)CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 20,000.0 20,000.0
For protective services personnel. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(212)CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For shelter placement for emergency stays for foster care.
(213)CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 2,500.0 2,500.0
To contract with child welfare experts to develop, implement and administer a short-term stabilization
pilot program in Dona Ana, Chaves, San Juan, McKinley, Bernalillo, Santa Fe and Eddy counties. Any
unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through
fiscal year 2029.
(214)DEPARTMENT OF
MILITARY AFFAIRS 1,500.0 1,500.0
To train the national guard for disaster response. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2028.
(215)DEPARTMENT OF
MILITARY AFFAIRS 1,500.0 1,500.0
For the governor's summer challenge programs.
(216)PAROLE BOARD 179.0 179.0
To convert paper files to electronic records.
(217)CORRECTIONS DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the eleven million three hundred thousand dollars ($11,300,000)
appropriated from the government results and opportunity program fund in Paragraph 25 of Subsection A of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 217

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Section 9 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for medication-assisted treatment is extended through fiscal year
2027.
(218)CORRECTIONS DEPARTMENT 300.0 300.0
For secure inmate transport vehicles.
(219)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 1,200.0 1,200.0
For law enforcement training and software to support the turquoise, AMBER, Brittany and silver alerts.
(220)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the five million seven hundred thousand dollars ($5,700,000)
appropriated from the general fund in Subsection 227 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for state
crime laboratories to outsource backlogged DNA cases is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(221)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) appropriated in Subsection
230 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for fingerprinting equipment is extended through fiscal
year 2027.
(222)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) appropriated from the
government results and opportunity program fund in Subparagraph (d) of Paragraph 25 of Subsection D of
Section 9 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 for programmatic operational costs and resources for the
implementation of statewide training concerning human trafficking and human smuggling is extended
through fiscal year 2027.
(223)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 500.0 500.0
For technology systems, including satellite communications, license plate readers, global positioning
system tracking devices, pursuit management tools, fleet management software and telematics.
(224)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 3,000.0 3,000.0
To purchase vehicles and in-car and body-worn camera systems and license plate readers.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 218

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(225)DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 75.0 75.0
For training on enforcement of human trafficking laws.
(226)DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
The period of time for expending the two hundred forty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars
($247,500,000) appropriated from the general fund in Subsection 6 of Section 9 of Chapter 54 of Laws
2022 as extended in Subsection 237 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for acquisition of rights-
of-way, planning, design, construction and to match federal and other state funds is extended through
fiscal year 2027.
(227)DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Any encumbered balances in the project design and construction program, the highway operations program
and the modal program of the department of transportation at the end of fiscal year 2026 from the other
state funds and federal funds appropriations shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2027.
(228)DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
The period of time for expending the two hundred thirty-two million dollars ($232,000,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 4 of Section 9 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 for acquisition of
rights-of-way, planning, design and construction, field supplies, roadway preservation, roadway
rehabilitation, preventive maintenance, roadway maintenance, reconstruction or new construction for
state-, tribal- and local-owned roads is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(229)DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
The period of time for expending the five million dollars ($5,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 5 of Section 9 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 for design and construction of wildlife
corridors to mitigate wildlife-vehicle collisions on state managed roads is extended through fiscal year
2027.
(230)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
To implement a comprehensive action plan pursuant to a final court order in Martinez v. state of New
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 219

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Mexico No. D-101-CV-2014-00793 and Yazzie v. state of New Mexico No. D-101-CV-2014-02224 for expenditure
in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The other state funds appropriation is from the public education reform
fund.
(231)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 400.0 400.0
To purchase, install, test or maintain automated external defibrillators.
(232)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For purposes pursuant to the Bilingual Multicultural Education Act.
(233)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For purposes pursuant to the Black Education Act.
(234)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 17,000.0 18,000.0 35,000.0
For evidence-based career technical education pilot programs, including work-based learning. The other
state funds appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
(235)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty-eight million five hundred thousand dollars ($28,500,000)
appropriated from the general fund in Subsection 246 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the
career technical education pilot project, including career technical student organizations, innovation
zones and work-based learning initiatives is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(236)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 20,000.0 20,000.0
For the recruitment and retention of educator fellows and grow your own teacher programs, including one
million dollars ($1,000,000) for teacher recruitment pilots and programs to improve the teacher
workforce pipeline. The public education department shall prioritize awards to school districts and
charter schools that provide local matching funds for participating educators.
(237)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
To increase kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade graduation rates for all New Mexico students by providing
a statewide custom-built graduation planning and pathway system that continuously evaluates student
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 220

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
progress against state-defined requirements and enables early identification of risks to graduation or
readiness while giving the state clear insight into pathway participation, workforce alignment and
student outcomes.
(238)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For purposes pursuant to the Hispanic Education Act.
(239)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 200.0 200.0
To expand the instructional materials resource library to provide comprehensive, standards-aligned
resources supporting heritage language and bilingual multicultural education programs statewide.
(240)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 250.0 250.0
To maintain an integrated digital system for school districts and charter schools to manage funding from
certain state and federal grant programs.
(241)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,700.0 3,700.0
For a learning management system that delivers learning resources to students, educators and
administrators outside of the classroom setting.
(242)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 14,600.0 14,600.0
For literacy coaches at schools in the lowest quartile. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(243)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For operations of the literary institute.
(244)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 1,750.0 1,750.0
For state museum exhibits supporting youth experiential activities and activities in astronomy, geology
and energy science the other state funds appropriations is from the art in public places fund.
(245)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For outdoor classrooms.
(246)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 20,000.0 20,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 221

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To conduct out-of-school time programs to sustain and expand comprehensive and affordable out-of-school
time programming for school-age youth statewide. Ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000)
shall be used for school districts, charter schools, the bureau of Indian education schools and tribally
controlled schools and ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) shall be used for
contracting with local and statewide nonprofit community organizations that provide out-of-school time
programming. Up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be used by the public education
department to evaluate and monitor outcomes from either allocation. The other state funds appropriation
is from the public education reform fund.
(247)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 29,000.0 29,000.0
For student reading and math intervention programs.
(248)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 5,600.0 5,600.0
For principal and superintendent preparation, coaching and residencies pursuant to the School Personnel
Act.
(249)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 2,300.0 2,300.0
For dormitory operational funding at the New Mexico school for the arts.
(250)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 200.5 200.5
For regional and statewide school safety summits.
(251)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 4,000.0 4,000.0
For the implementation of special education initiatives by the public education department.
(252)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) from the general fund in
Subsection 262 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for a statewide student information system and
connected educational data systems is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(253)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 6,000.0 6,000.0
For a statewide student information system and connected educational data systems.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 222

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(254)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For science, technology, engineering, arts and mathematics initiatives.
(255)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For a science, technology, engineering and mathematics network.
(256)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
For summer internship opportunities for working-age high school students.
(257)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For training in trauma-informed care to improve access to services and reduce adverse childhood
experiences in Dona Ana county.
(258)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For a wellness rooms pilot project.
(259)PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For legal fees related to defending the state in Martinez v. state of New Mexico No. D-101-CV-2014-00793
and Yazzie v. state of New Mexico No. D-101-CV-2014-02224. The internal services funds/interagency
transfers appropriation is from the consumer settlement fund.
(260)REGIONAL EDUCATION
COOPERATIVES 1,200.0 1,200.0
To regional education cooperative six in Portales to conduct a statewide study of student reading
performance focused on lexile scores.
(261)PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY 2,500.0 2,500.0
For contractual services, including project management, information technology system improvements and
administrative support for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The other state funds
appropriation is from the public school capital outlay fund.
(262)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,250.0 3,250.0
For programs, including two million dollars ($2,000,000) for adult education to continue the current
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 223

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
level of workers enrolled in the workforce economic support pilot and one million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($1,250,000) for high school equivalency exams.
(263)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0
For athletics projects and higher education institutions other than the university of New Mexico and New
Mexico state university.
(264)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 20,000.0 20,000.0
For distribution to the higher education institutions of New Mexico for building renewal and replacement
and facility demolition for expenditure in fiscal year 2027. A report of building renewal and
replacement transfers must be submitted to the higher education department before funding is released.
In the event of a transfer of building renewal and replacement funding to cover institutional salaries,
or any other ineligible purpose as defined in the New Mexico higher education department space policy,
funding shall not be released to the higher education institutions.
(265)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For distribution to the athletics departments of comprehensive colleges based on the proportional size
of state athletics appropriations to each college, provided that no more than one million dollars
($1,000,000) shall be distributed annually in fiscal years 2027, 2028 and 2029.
(266)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 3,000.0 3,000.0
For distribution to the higher education institutions of New Mexico for equipment renewal and
replacement. A report of equipment and renewal and replacement transfers must be submitted to the higher
education department before funding is released. In the event of a transfer of equipment renewal and
replacement funding to cover institutional salaries, funding shall not be released to the higher
education institution.
(267)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 25,000.0 25,000.0
For the health professional loan repayment program, contingent on enactment of House Bill 66 or similar
legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature to increase the maximum annual amount
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 224

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
of loan repayment for physicians.
(268)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
To support the implementation of Laws 2025, Chapter 53, in encouraging education, retention and
recruitment of large animal veterinarian services in underserved areas of New Mexico.
(269)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For the New Mexico longitudinal data system operations.
(270)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For a partnership with a New Mexico college of osteopathic medicine to improve a comprehensive outreach
program to increase interest in the healthcare field within the state of New Mexico.
(271)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 222 of Section 5 of Chapter 201 of Laws 2023 for endowments to support financial aid,
including scholarships and paid practicums, for New Mexico residents who are graduates of a New Mexico
high school currently enrolled in a masters' level social work program at a state institution of higher
education as enumerated in Article 12 Section 11 of the constitution of New Mexico and for clinical
supervision services for licensed social workers post-graduation is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(272)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
Any unexpended balance from the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) appropriated from the general fund in
Subsection 283 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to the technology enhancement fund remaining at
the end of fiscal year 2026 shall not revert to the general fund and shall be distributed in equal
amounts to the university of New Mexico, New Mexico state university and the New Mexico institute of
mining and technology to support research activities.
(273)HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 500.0 500.0
For tuition of Native American students attending bordering states with in-state tuition agreement.
(274)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 3,000.0 3,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 225

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To the health sciences center for an actuarial study on healthcare, including cost drivers.
(275)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 12,000.0 12,000.0
For improvements to athletics facilities.
(276)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 5,000.0 5,000.0
For the health sciences center for centralized high-performance computing upgrades, quantum computer
access and data center renovations to expand bioscience-related activities and develop artificial
intelligence and quantum computing approaches. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(277)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 5,000.0 5,000.0
For the health sciences center for unified activities with the school of engineering and the college of
arts and sciences in acoustomicrofluidic microneedle systems, compact optical, radio frequency and
biosensors; mutlimodal brain imaging scanners and functionally guided brain stimulators; and genomic and
transcriptomic next-generation sequencing equipment. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(278)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 500.0 500.0
For the center of Native American health.
(279)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 200.0 200.0
For the college of education for student teachers in underserved communities as defined by the court
order in Martinez v. state of New Mexico No. D-101-CV-2014-00793 and Yazzie v. state of New Mexico No.
D-101-CV-2014-02224.
(280)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 250.0 250.0
For the community engagement office.
(281)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 8,000.0 8,000.0
To purchase equipment for a flexible ion implanter, cryogenic optical spectroscopy and quantum spin
photon tools; to purchase a focused ion beam milling system with variable-energy and multispecies
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 226

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
capability; to purchase fiber semiconductor lasers and high-power microwave test stands; to construct
laboratory upgrades; and for a nitrogen liquefaction plant cost-controlled cryogens for mission critical
United States department of defense collaborations with the United States air force, Sandia national
laboratories and Los Alamos national laboratory that depend of uninterrupted cryogenics for directed
energy, quantum materials, biobanking and clinical operations. Any unexpended balances remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(282)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO
The period of time for expending the five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) appropriated from the
general fund in Subsection 299 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the psychedelic-assisted
therapy research program in the department of family medicine is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(283)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 1,937.0 1,937.0
For information technology systems necessary to integrate and format data sets regarding air quality,
ground water, methane gas and carbon emissions and sequestration.
(284)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 750.0 750.0
For the health sciences center learning environment office.
(285)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 5,000.0 5,000.0
To the university of New Mexico school of medicine to provide faculty supports and tuition supports to
medical students.
(286)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 150,000.0 150,000.0
For planning, design and construction of the school of medicine. The other state funds appropriation is
from the higher education major projects fund.
(287)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 750.0 750.0
For a comprehensive movement disorders clinic.
(288)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 2,500.0 2,500.0
For a Native American studies faculty endowment.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 227

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(289)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 1,000.0 1,000.0
To the university of New Mexico-Taos for the Taos observatory.
(290)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 500.0 500.0
For online Navajo language program development.
(291)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 150.0 150.0
For a psilocybin-assisted therapy research program.
(292)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 2,000.0 2,000.0
To purchase robots, three-dimensional printers and supporting equipment to renovate of a centralized
training facility. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and
may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(293)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 24,000.0 24,000.0
For rural residencies and residency rotations to administer a program that provides payments to
federally qualified health centers, rural health clinics, independent psychiatric facilities and
critical access hospitals to offset direct and indirect costs for medical residents associated with
graduate medical education not otherwise reimbursed.
(294)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 16,000.0 16,000.0
For the university of New Mexico stadium.
(295)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 450.0 450.0
For Native American suicide prevention.
(296)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 6,800.0 6,800.0
For a behavioral health technical assistance center to support the Behavioral Health Reform and
Investment Act. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and
may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(297)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 12,000.0 12,000.0
For the athletics department for expenditure through fiscal year 2029, provided that no more than four
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 228

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be expended annually in fiscal years 2027, 2028 and 2029.
(298)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 114.2 114.2
For the office of the medical investigator at the university of New Mexico for surgical lighting and
equipment for a health radio frequency identification body management system.
(299)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 100.0 100.0
To the bureau of business and economic research for a study of utility affordability.
(300)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO 450.0 450.0
For the Utton transboundary resources center. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(301)UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO
The period of time for expending the one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated from the general fund
Subsection 288 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the bioscience authority is extended through
fiscal year 2027.
(302)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 10,000.0 10,000.0
For grants to implement projects that improve farmers' and ranchers' ability to manage, save and
efficiently apply limited water resources for agricultural production.
(303)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 17,000.0 17,000.0
For improvements to athletics facilities, provided that no portion of this appropriation may be used to
purchase name, image and likeness rights.
(304)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 200.0 200.0
For a state child welfare blueprint.
(305)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 1,000.0 1,000.0
For chile marketing and promotion.
(306)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 1,000.0 1,000.0
For the department of agriculture for the double up food bucks program for community health and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 229

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
agriculture resilience.
(307)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 8,000.0 8,000.0
For costs related to a film studio.
(308)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 750.0 750.0
For a medicaid review system.
(309)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 3,000.0 3,000.0
To implement the existing livestock Mexican wolf compensation program, contract for direct and indirect
damages and conflict avoidance with the livestock loss authority established by Catron county, Sierra
county and Socorro county and to study effective human and wildlife cohabitation in cooperation with the
department of wildlife and other stakeholders as appropriate. Compensation for the depredation payments
shall be based on fair market value of the livestock as determined by New Mexico state university and
shall only be made by a qualified county, federal or tribal investigator. The county livestock loss
authority shall maintain the application from the livestock owner, the amount of the compensation
payment and the investigation report from qualified county, federal or tribal investigation. Any
unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended
through fiscal year 2029.
(310)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 430.0 430.0
To the New Mexico department of agriculture for the New Mexico grown approved supplier program.
(311)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 9,000.0 9,000.0
For the athletics department for expenditure through fiscal year 2029, provided that no more than three
million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be expended annually in fiscal years 2027, 2028 and 2029.
(312)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 2,000.0 2,000.0
To the New Mexico department of agriculture to administer the regional farm to food bank program. The
funds shall be expended for the purchase of locally produced food to be distributed through food banks
and nonprofit food programs serving underserved communities statewide in fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 230

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(313)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY
The period of time for expending the two million dollars ($2,000,000) appropriated from the general fund
in Subsection 306 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for an institute of artificial intelligence
and machine learning is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(314)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY
The period of time for expending the four million fifteen thousand dollars ($4,015,000) appropriated
from the general fund in Subsection 309 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to purchase equipment,
instrumentation, laboratory facility improvements and other supplies for water treatment is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
(315)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 16,000.0 16,000.0
For purchase and installation of equipment supporting the physical sciences laboratory.
(316)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 1,000.0 1,000.0
To the New Mexico department of agriculture for soil and water conservation training and education.
(317)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 5,100.0 5,100.0
To the New Mexico department of agriculture to eradicate the bovine reproductive disease trichomoniasis,
including for treatment and quarantine. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027
shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(318)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 1,500.0 1,500.0
For the New Mexico department of agriculture to support the implementation of Chapter 53 Laws 2025 in
encouraging retention and recruitment of large animal veterinarian services in underserved areas of New
Mexico.
(319)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY 3,000.0 3,000.0
To the New Mexico department of agriculture for waste material equipment and technology at meat
processing facilities.
(320)NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 231

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The period of time for expending the five million dollars ($5,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 315 of Section 5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for grants for projects that improve
ranchers' ability to manage, save and efficiently apply limited water resources for agricultural
production is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(321)EASTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY 1,000.0 1,000.0
For athletics. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may
be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(322)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 7,000.0 7,000.0
To establish a gateway for an energetic reliability and aging studies facility at the institute's
energetics materials research and testing center to deliver high-value, actionable data to the United
States department of defense by enabling controlled, repeatable examination of aged munitions and
components. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be
expended through fiscal year 2029.
(323)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 22,000.0 22,000.0
For programs, including eleven million five hundred thirty thousand dollars ($11,530,000) to the bureau
of geology and mineral resources for aquifer monitoring, characterization and integration of data, three
million six hundred thousand ($3,600,000) for a enterprise resource planning upgrade and implementation,
three million dollars ($3,000,000) for a brand refresh and marketing efforts, one million three hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($1,350,000) for the center for student success, two million five hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($2,520,000) for the autonomous drone center. Any unexpended balances remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended in fiscal year 2028.
(324)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 1,000.0 1,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 232

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To the bureau of geology and mineral resources for seismology equipment and to expand monitoring network
capabilities.
(325)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 500.0 500.0
For student support services.
(326)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 210.0 210.0
For a supercomputing challenge.
(327)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 1,000.0 1,000.0
For weather modification.
(328)NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF
MINING AND TECHNOLOGY 9,000.0 9,000.0
To enable a wireless technology hub at the institute's Playas research and training center to provide
instrumented, real-world test ranges and laboratories for emerging wireless technologies, shorten the
path from research to fielded capability for defense and commercial users and build a durable talent
pipeline and supplier base across New Mexico. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal
year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(329)NORTHERN NEW MEXICO COLLEGE 3,000.0 3,000.0
To plan, design, construct and renovate infrastructure to enhance health, public safety and resiliency
at the Espanola and El Rito campuses.
(330)NORTHERN NEW MEXICO COLLEGE
The period of time for expending the three million dollars ($3,000,000) appropriated from the general
fund in Subsection 234 of Section 5 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 323 of Section
5 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for security improvements, information system upgrades and other
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 233

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
infrastructure uses is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(331)SANTA FE COMMUNITY COLLEGE 250.0 250.0
For research for the first born home visiting program. Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of
fiscal year 2027 shall not revert and may be expended through fiscal year 2029.
(332)CENTRAL NEW MEXICO
COMMUNITY COLLEGE 6,000.0 6,000.0
For New Mexico community colleges to plan, develop, equip and provide advanced energy, quantum and
defense workforce, apprenticeship and technician training programs in partnership with laboratories,
agencies and industry.
(333)NEW MEXICO MILITARY INSTITUTE 60.0 60.0
For advanced ball-tracking technology.
(334)PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT
In fiscal year 2026, the secretary of public education may distribute up to five million dollars
($5,000,000) from emergency supplemental funds, the public education reform fund or the state
equalization guarantee distribution to a school district with MEM over eight thousand to ensure
continuity of instructional and support services for students if the school district experiences a
budget shortfall as a result of unfavorable legal settlements related to virtual education in fiscal
year 2026 and all legal remedies have been exhausted. The secretary of public education shall not
distribute any funds for this purpose unless the school district has expended all unrestricted funds,
suspended all capital projects and demonstrated the budget shortfall would negatively affect
instructional and support services for students.
TOTAL SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 1,466,166.2 315,600.0 20,825.0 8,794.5 1,811,385.7
Section 6. SUPPLEMENTAL AND DEFICIENCY APPROPRIATIONS.--Unless otherwise indicated, the following
amounts are appropriated from the general fund or other funds as indicated for expenditure in fiscal
year 2026 for the purposes specified. Disbursement of these amounts shall be subject to certification by
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 234

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
the agency to the department of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee that no
other funds are available in fiscal year 2026 or other fiscal year for the purpose specified and
approval by the department of finance and administration. Unless otherwise indicated, any unexpended
balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the appropriate fund.
(1) ELEVENTH JUDICIAL DISTRICT
ATTORNEY, DIVISION 1 100.0 100.0
For training, equipment, legal research tools, electronic evidence data storage, building security
enhancements and vehicles.
(2) STATE AUDITOR 220.0 220.0
For the operational and financial impacts incurred as a result of the delayed uniform guidance from the
federal government and the subsequent decision to bifurcate state and federal reporting.
(3) ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS OFFICE 61.0 61.0
For projected shortfall related to group health insurance premium changes and other personal services
and employee benefits category expenses.
(4) GENERAL SERVICES DEPARTMENT
Prior to the close of fiscal year 2026, remaining balances in the administrative services division fund
and the risk management operating fund of the general services department shall be transferred to the
public liability fund.
(5) SECRETARY OF STATE 15,000.0 15,000.0
To the election fund for the 2026 primary election.
(6) PUBLIC EMPLOYEE LABOR
RELATIONS BOARD 8.5 8.5
To cover a projected shortfall in the personal services and employee benefits category.
(7) REGULATION AND LICENSING
DEPARTMENT 7,452.5 7,452.5
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 235

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To correct and resolve prior-year general fund deficiencies.
(8) REGULATION AND LICENSING
DEPARTMENT 1,394.2 1,394.2
To correct and resolve prior-year deficiencies in the boards and commissions flow-through fund.
(9) REGULATION AND LICENSING
DEPARTMENT 1,062.6 1,062.6
For the mortgage regulatory fund.
(10) OFFICE OF SUPERINTENDENT
OF INSURANCE 650.0 650.0
To settle the Ohkay Owingeh cyber attack.
(11) STATE RACING COMMISSION 145.0 145.0
For the regulation of the horse-racing industry and protection of the equine athlete.
(12) SPACEPORT AUTHORITY 650.0 650.0
To address a projected temporary shortfall in commercial revenues.
(13) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 6,000.0 6,000.0
For projected at-risk and English learner program unit losses at school districts and charter schools.
Up to six million dollars ($6,000,000) of this appropriation may be used by the public education
department to supplement a school district’s or charter school’s program costs in fiscal year 2026 if
the school district’s or charter school’s at-risk index rate decreased from fiscal year 2025, calculated
by subtracting the school district’s or charter school’s fiscal year 2025 at-risk index from the sum of
the school district’s or charter school’s fiscal year 2026 at-risk index pursuant to Section 22-8-23.3
NMSA 1978 and the product of thirty-three hundredths and the three-year average English learner rate
pursuant to Section 22-8-23.15 NMSA 1978. The public education department shall distribute a prorated
share of this appropriation to each school district and charter school that had a lower at-risk index
rate in fiscal year 2026 based on aforementioned difference in at-risk indices multiplied by the school
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 236

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
district’s or charter school’s fiscal year 2026 MEM as defined in Section 22-8-23.3 NMSA 1978 and
multiplied by the final fiscal year 2026 unit value.
(14) HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 66.6 66.6
To cover prior-year deficits.
TOTAL SUPPLEMENTAL AND
DEFICIENCY APPROPRIATIONS 31,416.2 1,394.2 32,810.4
Section 7. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROPRIATIONS.--The following amounts are appropriated from the
computer systems enhancement fund, or other funds as indicated, for the purposes specified. Unless
otherwise indicated, the appropriation may be expended in fiscal years 2027 and 2028. Unless otherwise
indicated, any unexpended balances remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the computer
systems enhancement fund or other funds as indicated. For each executive branch agency project, the
state chief information officer shall certify compliance with the project certification process prior to
the allocation of forty-five million six hundred thousand dollars ($45,600,000) by the department of
finance and administration from the funds for the purposes specified. The judicial information systems
council shall certify compliance to the department of finance and administration for judicial branch
projects. For executive branch agencies, all hardware and software purchases funded through
appropriations made in Sections 4, 5, 6 and 7 of this act shall be procured using consolidated
purchasing led by the state chief information officer and state purchasing division to achieve economies
of scale and to provide the state with the best unit price.
(1) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEYS 500.0 500.0
To replace information technology hardware, contingent on compliance with cybersecurity standards set by
the cybersecurity office of the department of information technology.
(2) TAXATION AND REVENUE DEPARTMENT 2,841.0 2,841.0
To continue the replacement of the legacy tax return software.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 237

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(3) TAXATION AND REVENUE DEPARTMENT 4,086.6 4,086.6
To implement system changes to ensure compliance with required driver and vehicle interface mandates.
(4) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 10,000.0 10,000.0
For implementation and enhancements of capital, budget, property tax and administrative support systems.
(5) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION
The period of time for expending the four million dollars ($4,000,000) appropriated from the computer
systems enhancement fund in Subsection 10 of Section 7 of Chapter 271 of Laws 2019 as extended in
Subsection 4 of Section 7 of Chapter 137 of Laws 2021 as extended in Subsection 10 of Section 7 of
Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as extended in Subsection 6 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended
in Subsection 7 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 3 of Section 7 of
Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the implementation and enhancements of budgeting, financial and management
systems is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(6) DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
The period of time for expending the two million dollars ($2,000,000) from the computer systems
enhancement fund in Subsection 8 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 5 of
Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to develop and implement an integrated system for the enterprise
project management office documents and services is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(7) SECRETARY OF STATE 200.0 200.0
To continue implementation of an election management solution.
(8) SECRETARY OF STATE 750.0 750.0
To continue implementation of a web-based filing system.
(9) GAMING CONTROL BOARD
The period of time for expending the one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) appropriated
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 238

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
from the computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 11 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as
extended in Subsection 8 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 for the planning and initiation phase
to modernize licensing software is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(10) DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE 80.0 1,500.0 1,580.0
To continue modernization of online systems. The other state funds appropriation is from the game
protection fund.
(11) STATE LAND OFFICE
The period of time for expending the one million seven hundred thousand dollars ($1,700,000)
appropriated from the state lands maintenance fund in Subsection 9 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws
2024 to continue to improve the functionality, efficiency and data quality for the land information
management system is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(12) STATE LAND OFFICE
The period of time for expending the six million dollars ($6,000,000) appropriated from the state lands
maintenance fund in Subsection 10 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 to continue to improve the
user experience and data quality for the oil and gas royalty administration and processing system is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
(13) AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the two hundred eighty thousand three hundred dollars ($280,300)
appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund and the two million two hundred ninety-one
thousand six hundred dollars ($2,291,600) appropriated from federal funds in Subsection 21 of Section 7
of Chapter 83 of Laws 2020 as extended in Subsection 21 of Section 7 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as
extended in Subsection 15 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 15 of
Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 and as extended in Subsection 15 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of
Laws 2025 to consolidate and modernize information technology systems for integration with the health
care authority's medicaid management information system replacement project is extended through fiscal
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 239

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
year 2027.
(14) HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
The period of time for expending the four million eight hundred seventy-five thousand two hundred
dollars ($4,875,200) appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund and the nine million four
hundred sixty-three thousand seven hundred dollars ($9,463,700) appropriated from federal funds in
Subsection 22 of Section 7 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as extended in Subsection 20 of Section 7 of
Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 20 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws of 2025 to
continue the implementation of the child support enforcement replacement project is extended through
fiscal year 2027.
(15) HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
The period of time for expending the seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) appropriated from the computer
systems enhancement fund and the six hundred thirty thousand dollars ($630,000) appropriated from
federal funds in Subsection 16 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 to continue the facility
electronic licensing and information system exchange is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(16) WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 2,251.0 2,251.0
For a system to collect unemployment insurance through the treasury offset program.
(17) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
The period of time for expending the three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000)
appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 28 of Section 7 of Chapter 83 of
Laws 2020 as extended in Subsection 37 of Section 7 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as extended in Subsection
33 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 32 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of
Laws 2024 as extended in Subsection 26 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to purchase and
implement an enterprise electronic healthcare records system for public health offices is extended
through fiscal year 2027.
(18) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 240

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
The period of time for expending the ten million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($10,750,000)
appropriated to the department of health in Subsection 30 of Section 7 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as
extended in Subsection 34 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws of 2024 as extended in Subsection 25 of
Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws of 2025 to continue implementation of an enterprise electronic health
records system is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(19) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 2,300.0 2,300.0
For website modernization.
(20) DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT 1,000.0 1,000.0
For artificial intelligence-powered data systems, including document management and workflow automation.
(21) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND
FAMILIES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the seven million dollars ($7,000,000) appropriated from the computer
systems enhancement fund and the ten million nine hundred thousand dollars ($10,900,000) appropriated
from federal funds in Subsection 37 of Section 7 of Chapter 83 of Laws 2020 as extended in Subsection 44
of Section 7 of Chapter 54 of Laws 2022 as extended in Subsection 29 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws
2023 as extended in Subsection 43 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 and as extended in Subsection
32 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to continue the modernization of the comprehensive child
welfare information system is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(22) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND
FAMILIES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the three million five hundred twenty-three thousand seven hundred
dollars ($3,523,700) appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund and the seventeen million
ninety-five thousand nine hundred dollars ($17,095,900) appropriated from federal funds in Subsection 33
of Section 7 of Chapter 137 of Laws 2021 as extended in Subsection 40 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of
Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 44 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 and as extended in
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 241

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Subsection 33 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to continue the modernization of the
comprehensive child welfare information system is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(23) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND
FAMILIES DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the twenty-one million four hundred thirty-nine thousand four hundred
dollars ($21,439,400) appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund and the eleven million
forty-four thousand six hundred dollars ($11,044,600) appropriated from federal funds in Subsection 38
of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 34 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of
Laws 2025 to continue the modernization of the comprehensive child welfare information system is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
(24) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the eight hundred ten thousand dollars ($810,000) appropriated from the
computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 45 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended
in Subsection 36 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to implement an asset management system is
extended through fiscal year 2027.
(25) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) appropriated from the
computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 50 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of Laws 2024 to continue
the implementation of an asset management tracking system is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(26) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 2,000.0 2,000.0
For phase two of the intelligence-led policing project.
(27) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the one million eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000)
appropriated from the computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 43 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of
Laws 2023 as extended in Subsection 40 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to configure the Las
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 242

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Cruces data center as a backup site to enhance business continuity is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(28) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
The period of time for expending the sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) appropriated from the
computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 44 of Section 7 of Chapter 210 of Laws 2023 as extended
in Subsection 35 of Section 7 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025 to modernize the criminal justice information
system and other critical public safety data systems is extended through fiscal year 2027.
(29) HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 5,693.0 18,671.4 24,364.4
To complete the collaborative for the higher education shared services project. The other state funds
appropriation is from the higher education shared services colleges' operational fund balances.
(30) HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
The period of time for expending the four million five hundred and eighty-nine thousand dollars
($4,589,000) from the computer systems enhancement fund in Subsection 54 of Section 7 of Chapter 69 of
Laws 2024 to continue the longitudinal data system project is extended through fiscal year 2027.
TOTAL INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY APPROPRIATIONS 5,773.0 46,100.0 51,873.0
Section 8. NATURAL DISASTERS AND EXECUTIVE ORDERS APPROPRIATIONS.--
A. Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is transferred from the general fund to the appropriation
contingency fund in fiscal year 2027, contingent on enactment of House Bill 180 of the second session of
the fifty-seventh legislature clarifying the use of the appropriation contingency fund.
B. Up to fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) may be transferred in fiscal year 2027 pursuant to
this section and contingent on enactment of House Bill 180 or similar legislation. The transfer shall be
made from the appropriation contingency fund only if a federally reimbursable disaster or federally
reimbursable emergency has been declared in New Mexico. The executive order for disasters fund will
receive the transfer made pursuant to this section on satisfaction of the conditions of this section.
C. Up to one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) may be transferred in fiscal year 2027
pursuant to this section and contingent on enactment of House Bill 180 or similar legislation. The
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 243

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
transfer shall be made from the operating reserve only if a federally reimbursable disaster or federally
reimbursable emergency has been declared in New Mexico. The executive order for disasters fund will
receive the transfer made pursuant to this section on satisfaction of the conditions of this section.
Section 9. GOVERNMENT RESULTS AND OPPORTUNITY EXPENDABLE TRUST.--
A. The following amounts are appropriated from the government results and opportunity
program fund or other funds as indicated in fiscal year 2027 for the purposes specified. The department
of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee shall approve performance measures
for agencies, including those specified in this section, and any independent impact evaluation plans and
results of the evaluation, for the items in this section. Appropriations included in this subsection
include sufficient funds for evaluation. Any unexpended balances of the appropriations remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the government results and opportunity expendable trust fund or
the appropriate fund. Appropriations are contingent on enactment of House Bill 158 or similar
legislation updating accountability provisions.
(1) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE COURTS 1,265.4 1,265.4
For the expansion of assisted outpatient treatment programs, a competency diversion pilot and other
behavioral health programs, for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028.
(2) PUBLIC DEFENDER DEPARTMENT 2,200.0 2,200.0
To pilot hourly rates for contract attorneys.
(3) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For distributions to state agencies pursuant to a rate schedule adopted pursuant to Section 15-3B-18
NMSA 1978.
(4) EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
AND CARE DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 244

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
To continue implementation of the wage and career ladder framework.
(5) WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 600.0 600.0
To implement and evaluate youth pre-apprenticeship programs.
(6) WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 666.6 666.6
For the office of housing operations.
(7) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For startup and operational costs of evidence-based programs delivered in a community-based setting,
including youth mentoring services, for high risk youth within the juvenile justice facilities program.
(8) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0 4,000.0
For a dedicated SafeCare unit within the protective services program to provide in-home services to
families reported to the agency for suspected abuse or neglect.
(9) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 1,500.0 1,500.0
To perform road safety audits and site assessments on state and local roads.
(10) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 5,100.0 5,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial on high impact tutoring during the school day to improve
student reading proficiency and math proficiency. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be
used by the public education department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds
appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
(11) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 7,200.0 7,200.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of innovation zones to improve student attendance, graduation
and employability. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education
department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public
education reform fund.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 245

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(12) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 6,100.0 6,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of community schools to improve student attendance. Up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education department to evaluate and
monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
B. The following amounts are appropriated from the government results and opportunity
program fund or other funds as indicated in fiscal year 2028 for the purposes specified. The department
of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee shall approve performance measures
for agencies, including those specified in this section, and any independent impact evaluation plans and
results of the evaluation, for the items in this section. Appropriations included in this subsection
include sufficient funds for evaluation. Any unexpended balances of the appropriations remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the government results and opportunity expendable trust fund or
the appropriate fund. Appropriations are contingent on enactment of House Bill 158 or similar
legislation updating accountability provisions.
(1) PUBLIC DEFENDER DEPARTMENT 2,200.0 2,200.0
To pilot hourly rates for contract attorneys.
(2) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For distributions to state agencies pursuant to a rate schedule adopted pursuant to Section 15-3B-18
NMSA 1978.
(3) EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
AND CARE DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
To continue implementation of the wage and career ladder framework.
(4) WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 666.6 666.6
For the office of housing operations.
For a dedicated SafeCare unit within the protective services program to provide in-home services to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 246

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
families reported to the agency for suspected abuse or neglect.
(5) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For startup and operational costs of evidence-based programs delivered in a community-based setting,
including youth mentoring services, for high risk youth within the juvenile justice facilities program.
(6) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0 4,000.0
(7) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 1,500.0 1,500.0
To perform road safety audits and site assessments on state and local roads.
(8) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 5,100.0 5,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial on high impact tutoring during the school day to improve
student reading proficiency and math proficiency. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be
used by the public education department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds
appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
(9) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 7,200.0 7,200.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of innovation zones to improve student attendance, graduation
and employability. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education
department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public
education reform fund.
(10) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 6,100.0 6,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of community schools to improve student attendance. Up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education department to evaluate and
monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
C. The following amounts are appropriated from the government results and opportunity
program fund or other funds as indicated in fiscal year 2029 for the purposes specified. The department
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 247

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
of finance and administration and the legislative finance committee shall approve performance measures
for agencies, including those specified in this section, and any independent impact evaluation plans and
results of the evaluation, for the items in this section. Appropriations included in this subsection
include sufficient funds for evaluation. Any unexpended balances of the appropriations remaining at the
end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the government results and opportunity expendable trust fund or
the appropriate fund. Appropriations are contingent on enactment of House Bill 158 or similar
legislation updating accountability provisions.
(1) PUBLIC DEFENDER DEPARTMENT 2,200.0 2,200.0
To pilot hourly rates for contract attorneys.
(2) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
AND ADMINISTRATION 1,000.0 1,000.0
For distributions to state agencies pursuant to a rate schedule adopted pursuant to Section 15-3B-18
NMSA 1978.
(3) EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
AND CARE DEPARTMENT 10,000.0 10,000.0
To continue implementation of the wage and career ladder framework.
(4) WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT 666.7 666.7
For the office of housing operations.
(5) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 1,500.0 1,500.0
For startup and operational costs of evidence-based programs delivered in a community-based setting,
including youth mentoring services, for high risk youth within the juvenile justice facilities program.
(6) CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES
DEPARTMENT 2,000.0 2,000.0 4,000.0
For a dedicated SafeCare unit within the protective services program to provide in-home services to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 248

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
families reported to the agency for suspected abuse or neglect.
(7) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 1,500.0 1,500.0
To perform road safety audits and site assessments on state and local roads.
(8) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 5,100.0 5,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial on high impact tutoring during the school day to improve
student reading proficiency and math proficiency. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be
used by the public education department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds
appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
(9) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 7,200.0 7,200.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of innovation zones to improve student attendance, graduation
and employability. Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education
department to evaluate and monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public
education reform fund.
(10) PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT 6,100.0 6,100.0
To conduct a randomized controlled trial of community schools to improve student attendance. Up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be used by the public education department to evaluate and
monitor outcomes. The other state funds appropriation is from the public education reform fund.
D. The following amounts are appropriated from the government results and opportunity program fund
in fiscal year 2027 and fiscal year 2028 for the purposes specified. Any unexpended balances of the
appropriation remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the government results and
opportunity expendable trust fund. The legislative council service shall publish on the legislative
website a searchable list of the appropriations contained in this subsection as it passed the
legislature, the name of each legislator who allocated a portion of the appropriation and the amount of
the verified allocation. The list, including vetoes, shall be published thirty days after the
adjournment of the legislative session in which the General Appropriation Act of 2026 is approved by
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 249

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
both chambers of the legislature.
(1) to the legislative council service
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for redistricting work in collaboration with the
state ethics commission and to support recruitment and retention initiatives;
(2) to the court of appeals
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for security, technology and operational
projects provided that seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is to be spent in year one and
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
(3) to the administrative office of the courts
(a) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for a restorative justice pilot program
focused on post-charging interventions;
(b) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for improvements, repairs and security
infrastructure at court facilities statewide;
(c) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for staffing expansion of a program that
provides civil legal assistance to individuals with low income provided that seventy-five thousand
dollars ($75,000) is to be spent in year one and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
(4) to the second judicial district court
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support and fund a court services clinical
coordinator for the community gun violence intervention program;
(5) to the public defender department
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide multilingual pay for translation
services in Spanish and Navajo;
(6) to the department of finance and administration
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for outreach, conferences and collaboration with
Indigenous-focused and community-led organizations to research and address the forced and coerced
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 250

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
sterilization of Indigenous women and women of color in New Mexico to achieve the outcomes as
established by legislation;
(b) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for civil legal services extraordinary
litigation expenses related to defending immigrants at immediate risk;
(c) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for quality of life improvements or to safeguard
public health and support economic prosperity and growth through capacity building and maintenance at
the wellness center in Pojoaque pueblo;
(d) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
community safety for a school-based violence intervention program in Albuquerque;
(e) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for Asian-American family-centered counseling
and case management services along with survivor-led and -centered traditional methods of healing;
(f) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for civil legal services with half of the
appropriation to Bernalillo county's legal assistance eviction program for a two-year pilot to expand
legal assistance for tenants facing eviction in Bernalillo county;
(g) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund support for programmatic costs and
resources for the gateway young adult housing and treatment navigation center in Albuquerque;
(h) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for homelessness prevention that targets
measures to keep at-risk individuals in their homes;
(i) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for eviction prevention services and housing
stability in Bernalillo county;
(j) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for staffing positions related to service
delivery and compliance reporting in Mora county;
(k) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support program services and resources for
the bi-county fair in McKinley and Cibola counties;
(l) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for grant writing and technical assistance for
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 251

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
communities in the north central region;
(m) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund general operating expenses, community
support programs and maintenance on the Los Vigiles land grant-merced;
(n) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to the town of Bernalillo to provide local high
school students workplace experience and paid internships offering additional workforce development and
professional training through free community courses;
(o) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to the village of Jemez Springs for operational
costs, including utility costs, program support, promotion and staffing and for a welcome center to
serve as a regional tourism hub and economic engine;
(p) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to the village of Jemez Springs to support and
supplement village operating expenses;
(q) one million seven hundred forty thousand dollars ($1,740,000) for civil legal services;
(r) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a qualitative behavioral health metrics data
collection system;
(s) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to purchase and equip an ambulance for Taos county
for transportation;
(t) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to purchase and equip a snow plow dump truck for
Taos county;
(u) for the eastern plains council of governments
1) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for programmatic costs and resources to provide
technical services and community capacity building, including technical and financial assistance, for
expenditure to assist the city of Tucumcari in completing overdue financial audits;
2) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund programmatic costs and resources
for the city of Clovis to support law enforcement and emergency services;
3) six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for programmatic costs and resources to support
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 252

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
aging and public services in Guadalupe county;
4) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for the
Guadalupe sheriff's office;
5) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for local health councils within the
eastern plains council of governments;
6) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for programmatic operational costs and
resources for agricultural education youth programs in Curry, Quay, Union and Harding counties;
7) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
the city of Portales to support law enforcement and emergency services;
8) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
Roosevelt county to support law enforcement and emergency services;
(v) for the mid-region council of governments
1) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to an in-school program for middle and high
school teachers to teach holocaust, genocide and New Mexico's multiracial complex history along with
other critical issues;
2) four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) to support residential youth drug
addiction treatment programs for additional staff, staff training, gym equipment, computers and office
supplies in Bernalillo county, provided that two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) is to
be spent in year one and two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) in year two;
3) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for fire mitigation in northeast New
Mexico;
4) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to homeless veterans support staff,
materials and supplies to provide service-intensive case management to remove barriers that lead to
homelessness among United States military veterans;
5) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a two-year pilot to expand legal
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 253

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
assistance for tenants facing eviction, grounded in eviction prevention, court efficiency and shared
responsibility across public systems;
6) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide professional development toward
licensure of bilingual behavioral healthcare professionals and culturally and linguistically specific,
trauma-informed mental health case management and suicide prevention for immigrant and refugee families
provided that seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is to be spent in year one and seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
7) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for high-quality dental services for people
experiencing homelessness;
8) four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to support the advancement of a mixed-use
development concept that includes permanently affordable housing in the Sawmill area of Bernalillo
county;
9) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the Albuquerque community safety
department for programmatic costs and resources for a school-based violence intervention program;
10) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to provide support for community
resilience programs that provide housing and urban development certified counseling on economic
stability and upward mobility for at-risk individuals with children in Albuquerque's Highland cluster
Title I schools;
11) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for a program to help at-risk children to
grow and develop to their full potential in nurturing families within a supportive community;
12) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for the Bernalillo county resource
reentry center stabilization project;
13) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for pre-apprenticeships and internships
for Kennedy middle school in Bernalillo county;
14) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund business incubation, business
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 254

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
start-up and entrepreneurial services in the Atrisco community of Bernalillo county and surrounding
areas;
15) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund thirty paid pre-apprentice and
intern positions over two years throughout Bernalillo county for career development experience for high
school and college students;
16) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for a
community health clinic serving the homeless population exclusively in Bernalillo county to ensure
dental services through street outreach, site-based outreach, medical respite and clinic care;
17) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for data collection, updated research and broad
community outreach and engagement in the Barelas neighborhood in Albuquerque;
18) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to contract for small business economic
development along west Central avenue in Bernalillo county;
19) three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($330,000) to plan or fund comprehensive flamenco
educational services in Bernalillo county;
20) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to provide case management to assist residents
living in the international district to obtain temporary, transitional or permanent housing and plan and
implement green spaces in the international district in Albuquerque;
21) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
the Bernalillo county sheriff's department;
22) three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($330,000) for school-based programs that foster
one-to-one friendships between students with and without intellectual and developmental disabilities;
23) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
a science, technology, engineering and mathematics outreach program, including drones, robotics and
girls into tech programs in Bernalillo county;
24) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for services to low-income senior citizens
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 255

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
promoting aging-in-place through home and property improvement in Bernalillo county;
25) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for a
right-of-way wildfire risk reduction project at the Skyland addition in Bernalillo county;
26) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to contract for small business development
along Coors boulevard northwest in Bernalillo county;
27) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to convene and engage service providers to
develop new community-based solutions for affordable housing and green space in the international
district of Albuquerque;
28) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to conduct free public spay and neuter
clinics in Bernalillo county, with services to include vaccinations, microchip identification and
parasite treatment and prevention;
29) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support a summer and
out-of-school-time program that integrates core academic curriculum with enrichment activities,
multicultural education and community collaborations to strengthen the academic, social and emotional
well-being of Native American students in the To'Hajiilee school;
30) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support a highly effective summer and
out-of-school-time program serving kindergarten through twelfth-grade Title I students across the
greater Albuquerque metropolitan area. The integrated enrichment services shall include programming for
under-resourced students and their families featuring literacy, math and science instruction,
social-emotional learning, physical wellness, music, swimming, tutoring and life and career skills
through a public-private collaboration model;
31) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support a program that provides
tuition-free, summer-focused academic and enrichment programming, including literacy and math
instruction, social-emotional learning, physical wellness, music, swimming, tutoring and life and career
skills, along with year-round family engagement for students from underserved communities in
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 256

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Albuquerque;
32) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to contract for transitional housing for
underserved and at-risk populations and communities in the international district of Albuquerque;
33) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for trauma-informed gun violence
prevention and workforce readiness program for justice-involved and high-risk youth in Albuquerque's
south valley. The program combines conflict de-escalation with hands-on vocational arts training to
address root causes of violence, build employable skills, reduce recidivism and strengthen community
safety;
34) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for workforce and leadership development
for social workers, counselors and psychologists focused on training, mentoring and retaining mental
health providers in Bernalillo county;
35) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support and expand community workforce
development programs and educational opportunities, create classroom training programs and job placement
to support the city of Albuquerque and Bernalillo county communities provided that seventy-five thousand
dollars ($75,000) is to be spent in year one and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
36) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for youth-focused out-of-school
internships in the areas of science, technology, engineering and math and visual and performing arts and
media arts in Bernalillo county;
37) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for a youth wrestling program in
Bernalillo county at Volcano Vista;
38) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
implement a community-based violence intervention and prevention model that centers peer-led engagement,
kinship networking, restorative healing practices and coordinated family support to address gun violence
and intimate violence among disproportionately impacted communities;
39) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 257

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
directly provide primary care, medical, dental and behavioral health services and chronic disease
management to residents of Torrance county and southern Santa Fe county. Services at locations in the
Edgewood area will cover existing costs and maintain services. Services should include sliding fee
discounts for patients whose family income is below 200 percent of federal poverty guidelines;
40) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for students and young adults who are
experiencing significant barriers to success and to establish a pathway to quality training for securing
promising employment opportunities;
41) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to serve one hundred incarcerated or
previously incarcerated youth in New Mexico, utilizing evidence-based practices;
42) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for procuring and equipping bunker gear
fireground cancer prevention for the Rio Rancho fire department;
43) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) to design, construct, equip and staff a
photovoltaic lab and related educational facilities for students at RioTECH high school;
44) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
Sandoval county animal wellness programs, including spay and neuter programs;
45) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund the Sandoval county office of
emergency management Rio Grande basin rescue program;
46) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for New Mexico students and communities
to improve high school graduation and college attendance rates through a fully cost-covered residential
and educational program for underserved students throughout the state, with an emphasis on the student's
cultural background and including an annual paid internship supporting community development programs;
47) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a New Mexico-based organization for
services to individuals and families living with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis in New Mexico;
48) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide primary care medical, dental, behavioral health services and chronic disease management to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 258

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
residents of the south valley-Barelas and north valley neighborhoods to cover existing costs and
maintain services, including sliding fee discounts for patients whose family income is below 200 percent
of federal poverty guidelines;
49) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a statewide dance program to be
provided in public schools for low-income at-risk youth;
50) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to plan and execute comprehensive
statewide flamenco educational services to culminate in an international flamenco festival in Bernalillo
county;
51) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to purchase vehicles for the Torrance
county's sheriff department;
52) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
the central tri-county soil and water conservation district in Torrance and Santa Fe counties;
53) four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) for programmatic costs, resources,
equipment and vehicles for fire and police technology, traffic safety and agricultural youth leadership
programs in Valencia county;
54) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for recruitment and retention of
municipal police, fire and emergency medical department within the city of Rio Communities;
55) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for updated equipment for various
athletic facilities at Belen high school;
56) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for updated equipment, supplies and
uniforms for the various athletic teams and facilities in the Los Lunas school district;
(w) for the north central New Mexico economic development district
1) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
support operations at domestic violence shelters and programs in Santa Fe county, Valencia county,
Torrance county and the tri-county area in San Miguel county;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 259

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
2) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the expansion of economic mobility and
workforce stability programs for hospitality workers in northern New Mexico in partnership with La Fonda
foundation;
3) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide fresh fruits, fresh vegetables
and fresh meats for senior centers in Eldorado, Cerrillos and Edgewood in Santa Fe county, Pecos and San
Miguel del Vado in San Miguel county, Estancia and Mountainair in Torrance county and Rio Communities
and Meadow Lake in Valencia county;
4) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for expansion and small purchases
supporting public safety operations in Pecos in San Miguel county, Torrance, Estancia and Mountainair in
Torrance county and Rio Communities in Valencia county;
5) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operations and small purchases for
rural health clinics serving Ortiz Mountain and Edgewood in Santa Fe county, San Miguel del Vado and
Pecos valley in San Miguel county, Mountainair in Torrance county and Los Lunas in Valencia county;
6) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the installation and maintenance of
water filtration systems to ensure the provision of safe, clean drinking water in designated public
facilities to the Agua Fria community water systems association;
7) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for operational expenses in San Miguel and
Torrance counties for entities addressing food insecurity and homelessness;
8) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for homelessness prevention that
implements targeted measures to keep at-risk individuals in their homes, utilizing rental assistance and
services tailored to their needs with staff support;
9) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) to fund community-based projects in the
north central region;
10) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to study and develop a plan for the
implementation of the cambiar model of juvenile justice in the northeastern quadrant of New Mexico,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 260

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
including an economic analysis of implementation costs, workforce and service impacts, potential fiscal
effects and public outreach and stakeholder engagement with affected communities, service providers,
local governments and tribal entities;
11) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support operations for individual peer
support evidence-based practices, case management and food programs for unhoused people in Rio Arriba
county;
12) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide support for programs providing
healthy meals to at-risk and low-income children, youth and families in Rio Arriba county;
13) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund staffing and program operations
at the recreation center and public library in Espanola;
14) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide programmatic support to a Rio
Arriba county substance, treatment, outreach and prevention program;
15) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
programs to support individuals with developmental and intellectual disabilities in Rio Arriba county;
16) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support community programming and
library services in San Miguel county with program support and operational expenses, including salaries,
program expenses, equipment and related expenses;
17) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for the North Ranchos de Placitas water
and sanitation district to complete the planning, design and construction of an arsenic treatment system
for well two-A;
18) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to provide targeted civil legal services
and workforce stabilization support for hospitality and early childcare workers in Santa Fe county to
strengthen employee retention and support a stable, skilled hospitality and early childcare workforce;
19) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for a mobile outreach program for the
delivery of free learning in rural, tribal and areas of need in Santa Fe county for at-risk children
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 261

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
from birth to age four;
20) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for a program to support social-emotional
learning, academics, attendance and family engagement at middle and high schools in Santa Fe public
schools;
21) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a New Mexico entity for programs
within living history museums in Santa Fe county;
22) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for operating costs associated with
statewide programs that increase the number of affordable housing units while reducing the number of
vacant and abandoned homes;
23) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to purchase and equip an ambulance for
Taos county transportation;
24) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to provide targeted civil legal services
and workforce stabilization support for hospitality workers in Taos county to strengthen employee
retention and support a stable, skilled hospitality workforce;
(x) for the northwest New Mexico council of governments
1) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide programmatic resources and
services for the center of excellence in the school of energy at San Juan college;
2) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic resources and services for
student leadership programs at Navajo preparatory school;
3) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
Cibola county sheriff's department;
4) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic resources and services for
youth programming at domestic violence shelters in Gallup and McKinley county;
5) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
McKinley county sheriff's department;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 262

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
6) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic resources and services for
food banks and food distribution in McKinley county;
7) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support healthcare and hospital
services and resources in McKinley county;
8) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to provide programmatic resources and services
for the alternative response unit at San Juan regional medical center;
9) one million three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,350,000) for behavioral health
services in San Juan county;
10) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund behavioral health services in the
city of Farmington;
11) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide programmatic costs and
resources for behavioral health services in San Juan county;
12) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide programmatic resources and
services for agricultural youth education and leadership programs in San Juan county;
(y) for the south central council of governments
1) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for staffing and operational support for a
fifty-unit supportive housing complex supporting individuals transitioning out of homelessness;
2) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the city of Las Cruces for sexual
assault victims services;
3) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide whole family support services,
including housing for people in need;
4) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
workforce readiness and career-connected learning opportunities with high school students, with emphasis
on underrepresented youth;
5) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 263

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
provide technical and community service and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development in Catron county;
6) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for services to support integration of
special education students in culinary arts and food service programming in Las Cruces public schools;
7) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to deliver community-based domestic
violence prevention and early intervention services for children, youth and adults throughout Dona Ana
county;
8) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to provide a family support center in the
Las Cruces public schools;
9) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to Dona Ana county for a food assistance
program;
10) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support and provide meals for seniors
who are economically disadvantaged in Dona Ana county;
11) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
support spay and neuter procedures and related services for low-income individuals in Dona Ana county;
12) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a youth prevention and intervention
coordinator for the city of Las Cruces;
13) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for services and resources for
after-hours youth programming with the city of Las Cruces;
14) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
project-based and service learning programs for kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students in the city
of Las Cruces and Dona Ana county;
15) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and community service and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development, in Sierra, Socorro and Valencia
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 264

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
counties;
16) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and community services and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development, in Sierra, Socorro and Dona Ana
counties;
17) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources for
agricultural youth leadership programs in Sierra, Socorro, Catron, Dona Ana, Grant, Hidalgo and Luna
counties;
18) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
support spaying and neutering, food support, equipment and supplies in Sierra, Socorro, Catron, Dona
Ana, Grant, Hidalgo and Luna counties;
19) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for equipment, vehicles and programmatic
costs of law enforcement in Sierra, Socorro, Catron, Dona Ana, Grant, Hidalgo and Luna counties;
20) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs, resources,
equipment and vehicles for fire and police technology and traffic safety in Socorro county;
(z) for the southeastern New Mexico economic development district
1) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operational and programmatic costs and
resources for the eastern New Mexico university Roswell agricultural program;
2) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the city of Carlsbad fire department
programmatic and operational costs to provide emergency services and to enhance emergency response and
station security;
3) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic operational costs and
resources for southeastern New Mexico economic development district council of governments;
4) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for programmatic operational costs and
resources for the city of Hobbs;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 265

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
5) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund programmatic costs and resources
to support youth development, leadership and agricultural programs in Chaves county;
6) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs and
resources for education programs in Roswell high school, Dexter high school, Hagerman high school, Lake
Arthur high school and the New Mexico youth challenge academy;
7) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and community services and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development, in Dexter, Hagerman and Lake Arthur;
8) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund programmatic costs and resources
for the Roswell police and fire department;
9) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
support youth development programs providing science, technology, engineering and mathematics and
academic enrichment, wellness activities, life and career skills and out-of-school services for youth in
Chaves county;
10) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operational and programmatic costs,
equipment and resources in Eddy county;
11) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operational and programmatic costs and
resources for outpatient mental health counseling and guidance in Eddy county;
12) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic and operational costs and
resources for abused and neglected children and their families in the court system in Eddy and Lea
counties;
13) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
support educational programs providing leadership youth development, mentorship, personal safety
education, teen pregnancy prevention and empowerment activities in Eddy and Lea counties;
14) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 266

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
equipment and resources for senior meal sites in Eddy and Otero counties;
15) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs
and resources for the city of Hobbs Police Department;
16) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for education and prevention information
through holistic care by providing trauma-informed services and resources for survivors of sexual
assault, domestic violence, strangulation, child injury, stalking and human trafficking in Lea county;
17) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment, vehicles and resources to support community-based housing programs, veteran supportive
services and community services to organizations providing essential support, capacity building and
assistance to residents in Lea county;
18) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment and resources for senior centers in Eddy county and Tatum;
19) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and community services and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development, in the cities of Tatum, Texico,
Floyd, Dora and Fort Sumner;
20) one million six hundred twenty thousand dollars ($1,620,000) for programmatic and
operational costs and resources for agricultural education youth programs in the southeast region;
21) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment, vehicles and resources to support community and public safety programs for the city of
Lovington, the city of Hobbs and Lea county to include city veterinary services, senior nutrition and
supportive services, youth agricultural education and career and technical education programs;
22) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and community services and community capacity building, including grant writing, grant
management, strategic planning, training and economic development, in Eddy and Lea counties, Carlsbad,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 267

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
Otis, Loving, Jal, Malaga and Eunice;
23) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic operational costs,
equipment and resources for senior centers and meal sites in Lincoln county;
24) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment and resources to support community youth recreation programs, activities and recreational
facilities serving youth in Otero and Eddy counties;
25) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
provide technical and capacity building, including grant writing, grant management, strategic planning,
training and economic development, for the Mescalero Apache tribe in Otero county;
26) three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($330,000) for programmatic costs and resources to
fund a science, technology, engineering and mathematics career education program for youth, including
tutoring to specifically address learning gaps in math and science in Otero county;
27) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operational and programmatic costs,
equipment and resources in Roosevelt county;
28) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment and resources for a senior center in Portales;
29) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operational and programmatic costs and
resources to eliminate barriers preventing families from accessing vital services, including medical,
dental, behavioral healthcare, food security, housing security, transportation, parent supports, early
childhood, youth mentoring and other community services;
(aa) for the southwest New Mexico council of governments
1) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for an organization to provide land-based
outdoor learning leadership development and civic engagement for youth;
2) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to establish and operate an office in the
city of Las Cruces for sustainability to work on a comprehensive plan for a scalable, replicable
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 268

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
approach for organizing communities to address climate change and water security, improving climate
resilience and water use efficiency;
3) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for programmatic and operational costs
for education, youth activities, food security, economic development, recreation, tourism, domestic
violence, health services, health councils, disability, homelessness, childcare, housing, public safety,
sexual assault services, animal welfare, libraries, Silver City bike race, veteran and senior needs,
county fairgrounds and agriculture and workforce training in Grant, Hidalgo and Catron counties;
4) six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for programmatic and operational costs for
education, youth activities, food security, economic development, recreation, tourism, domestic
violence, health services, health councils, homelessness, childcare, housing, domestic violence, sexual
assault services, animal welfare, libraries, Silver City bike race, veterans and senior needs, county
fair grounds and agriculture and workforce training in Grant, Hidalgo and Luna counties;
5) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for programmatic and operational costs
for education, youth activities, food security, economic development, recreation, tourism, domestic
violence, health services, health councils, homelessness, childcare, housing, public safety, sexual
assault services, animal welfare, libraries, Silver City bike race, veteran and senior needs, county
fair grounds and agriculture and workforce training in Hidalgo and Luna counties;
(7) to the tourism department
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the sports authority division of the
department of tourism;
(b) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund the promotion of tourism in house
district sixty-seven;
(8) to the office of superintendent of insurance
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for behavioral health access and other programs
that expand access to care provided that seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is to be spent in year
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 269

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
one and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
(9) to the cultural affairs department
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for marketing and public relations for museums
of New Mexico;
(10) to the indian affairs department
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the pueblo of Jemez education department
language immersion and cultural education programs and activities;
(b) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic services and resources for
language and cultural programming in the Zuni public school district;
(c) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support clinics in Shiprock to deliver
dental and orthodontic services and braces;
(d) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to the Indian pueblo cultural center for language
and cultural preservation, including the protection of sacred sites to a multi-tribal government agency;
(e) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for youth and community leadership programs and
initiatives and community institutes;
(f) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support youth and community leadership
programs, initiatives and community institutes at the leadership institute at the Santa Fe Indian
school;
(g) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the Laguna department of education for
contract services for Keres linguistic experts to support revitalization efforts of the Keres language;
(11) to the health care authority
(a) six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for patient care and recruitment and retention of
physicians at the Cibola general hospital;
(12) to the department of health
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a mosquito eradication program;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 270

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(b) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the medical psilocybin treatment equity fund
to support medical psilocybin efforts;
(c) three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($330,000) for a statewide dance program to be provided
in public schools for low-income at-risk students;
(d) four hundred eighty thousand dollars ($480,000) for the medical psilocybin treatment equity
fund;
(e) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a statewide dance program to develop
self-agency for youth in public schools in New Mexico provided that seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000) is to be spent in year one and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
(13) to the veterans' services department
(a) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to fund suicide and mental health services for
veterans;
(14) to the crime victims reparation commission
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support sexual assault and domestic violence
services in the greater Cibola county area;
(b) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for statewide sexual assault services;
(c) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support sexual assault and domestic violence
services in the greater Valencia county area;
(15) to the public education department
(a) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for aviation career technical education in Las Cruces
school district;
(b) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for funding professional development
opportunities and certifications for the teaching staff with technical skills they can use to teach
technology-focused projects in Bernalillo county;
(c) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support and expand community workforce
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 271

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
development programs, educational opportunities and long-term community well-being at Robert F. Kennedy
charter school;
(d) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to sustain comprehensive community-based
services in Dona Ana county focused on preventing adverse childhood experiences and family trauma;
(e) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the family support center in Las Cruces school
district;
(f) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for program services and resources for arts and
cultural programming in the city of Gallup and McKinley county;
(g) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to provide programmatic costs and resources for
health and wellness services for the Central Consolidated school district in Shiprock;
(h) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to Rio Rancho public schools for math programs to
include laboratories;
(i) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support a Hispanic and multicultural music
and dance festival in fiscal year 2027 and fiscal year 2028 through the Hispanic Education Act;
(j) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for school-based inclusion programs that foster
one-to-one friendships between students with and without intellectual developmental disabilities;
(16) to the higher education department
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic resources and services for
teacher education programs at Dine college;
(b) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs to
support the university of New Mexico's contraception mentoring program, including provider training
assistance and resources to expand access to evidence-based contraceptive services statewide;
(c) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for programmatic and operational costs,
equipment and workforce training resources for the advanced technologies division of Dona Ana community
college;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 272

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(d) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for operating costs of KSFR radio station at
Santa Fe community college;
(e) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for a statewide initiative led by central New
Mexico community college to support older adults in workforce development and community engagement;
(17) to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for expansion of leadership, mentoring and
holistic student support activities for the American Indian student services ambassador program;
(b) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for university of New Mexico health sciences
office for diversity, equity and inclusion communities-to-careers program to grow New Mexico's diverse
healthcare workforce by providing hands-on, experiential health career and education programs for
elementary, secondary and postsecondary diverse students;
(c) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the el centro de la raza camperinos program
providing academic guidance, structured mentoring and scholarships;
(d) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the health sciences center office of
diversity, equity and inclusion for Spanish language health sciences curriculum development and
implementation to enhance the medical Spanish education program for students in the health sciences
center;
(e) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the development of students in the areas of
science, technology, engineering, arts and mathematics training;
(f) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to support the Chicana and Chicano studies
department at the university of New Mexico;
(g) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a program at the office of diversity, equity
and inclusion at the university of New Mexico health sciences center to provide students with academic
support, college readiness, leadership, professional development and career exploration, to establish an
alumni association to initiate diversified funding and to provide students with new coats for intern
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 273

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
program participation;
(h) three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) to the university of New Mexico health
sciences center for the cerebral cavernous angioma initiative;
(i) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support the indigenous design and planning
institute in continued expansion of the immersive environment through science, technology, engineering,
arts and mathematics programming;
(j) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) to support undergraduate and graduate students
assisting with community-engaged research in the Chicana and Chicano studies department;
(k) eight hundred ten thousand dollars ($810,000) for a pilot public policy leadership pipeline
program in the political science department to establish program framework, fund paid undergraduate
internships and graduate fellowships and support collaboration with additional university of New Mexico
departments to strengthen the education-to-career pathway for public service and policy careers;
(l) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the department of anesthesiology and
critical care medicine for continued development of the anesthesia assistant program;
(m) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for university of New Mexico
psychedelic-assisted therapy research program provided that seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is
to be spent in year one and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in year two;
(18) to the board of regents of New Mexico state university
(a) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for programmatic costs, equipment, tuition and
promotional resources for the windmill technician certification program;
(b) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for the college assistant migrant program;
(c) one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for collaboration with industry, government and
academic partners to develop and implement student fellowships and scholarships programs;
interdisciplinary space-related research infrastructure, education and public service programs; and
cooperative initiatives;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 274

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(d) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for programs to support colonias statewide;
(e) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for statewide agricultural beef marketing
campaign.
TOTAL GOVERNMENT RESULTS AND
OPPORTUNITY EXPENDABLE TRUST $55,200.0 $108,865.4 $6,000.0 $170,065.4
Section 10. SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION APPROPRIATIONS.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the department of transportation for the purposes specified. Unless otherwise
indicated, the appropriation may be expended in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years. Unexpended
balances of the appropriations remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the appropriate
fund.
(1) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 5,000.0 5,000.0
For heavy equipment. The other state funds appropriation is from the state road fund.
(2) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 12,500.0 12,500.0
For rural air service enhancement.
(3) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 150,000.0 150,000.0
For roadway construction and maintenance.
(4) DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 42,000.0 42,000.0
For the transportation project fund. Active projects experiencing shortfalls shall be prioritized for
completion.
TOTAL SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION
APPROPRIATIONS 204,500.0 5,000.0 209,500.0
Section 11. FUND TRANSFERS.--Unless otherwise indicated, the following amounts are transferred in
fiscal year 2027 from the general fund or other funds as indicated for the purposes specified.
(1) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH TRUST FUND 50,000.0 50,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 275

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(2) OPIOID CRISIS RECOVERY FUND 12,102.0 12,102.0
The other state funds transfer is from the opioid settlement restricted fund in fiscal year 2026.
(3) OPIOID CRISIS RECOVERY FUND 22,802.0 22,802.0
The other state funds transfer is from the opioid settlement restricted fund in fiscal year 2027.
(4) GOVERNMENT RESULTS AND
OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM FUND 50,000.0 50,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
(5) WATER PROJECT FUND 100,000.0 100,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027, contingent on enactment of House Bill 109 or similar
legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature suspending legislative authorization
of water trust board projects. Funding may be used to waive the match requirements for small rural
communities with a financial hardship.
(6) STATE TREASURER
On the effective date of the General Appropriation Act of 2026, the state treasurer shall transfer any
balances remaining in the public prekindergarten fund at the public education department, which was
repealed by Laws 2019, Chapter 48, Section 37, to the government results and opportunity program fund.
The state treasurer shall notify the legislative finance committee when the transfer has been completed.
(7) MORTGAGE REGULATORY FUND 4,950.0 4,950.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
(8) SECURITIES EDUCATION
TRAINING FUND 1,000.0 1,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
(9) WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
APPRENTICESHIP TRUST FUND 10,000.0 10,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 276

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(10) VIOLENCE INTERVENTION
PROGRAM FUND 2,500.0 2,500.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
(11) PUBLIC EDUCATION REFORM FUND 89,700.0 89,700.0
The other state funds transfer is from the government results and opportunity program fund in fiscal
year 2027.
(12) HIGHER EDUCATION MAJOR
PROJECTS FUND 185,000.0 185,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027, contingent on enactment of House Bill 8 or similar
legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh Legislature creating the higher education major
projects fund.
(13) HIGHER EDUCATION MAJOR
PROJECTS FUND 115,000.0 115,000.0
The state board of finance may issue and sell supplemental severance tax notes in an amount not
exceeding one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000) in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 when the
higher education department certifies the need for the issuance to plan, design, construct, furnish and
equip student housing and student life projects that may be funded from the higher education major
projects fund provided that the issuance of supplemental severance tax bonds pursuant to the Public
School Capital Outlay Act or the Public School Capital Improvements Act shall take precedence over notes
issued for the student housing and student life projects and provided that the issuance of supplemental
severance tax bonds for any other appropriations by the Legislature shall also take precedence over
notes issued for the student housing and student life projects. Any proceeds from the sale of notes for
student housing and student life projects shall be transferred to the higher education major projects
fund and are subject to appropriation by the Legislature. The Legislature shall appropriate any proceeds
from notes sold pursuant to this authorization within two years of the note sale. The total issuance of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 277

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
supplemental severance tax bonds in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 shall not exceed the debt service
limitations provided for in Subsection D of Section 7-27-14 NMSA 1978 and shall not impair any minimum
annual transfers to the severance tax permanent fund required by law, contingent on enactment of House
Bill 8 or similar legislation of the second session of the fifty-seventh Legislature creating the higher
education major projects fund.
(14) LOTTERY TUITION FUND 56,000.0 56,000.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
(15) COMPUTER SYSTEMS ENHANCEMENT
FUND 46,100.0 46,100.0
The general fund transfer is in fiscal year 2027.
TOTAL FUND TRANSFERS 505,550.0 239,604.0 745,154.0
Section 12. ADDITIONAL FISCAL YEAR 2026 BUDGET ADJUSTMENT AUTHORITY.--During fiscal year 2026,
subject to review and approval by the department of finance and administration, pursuant to Sections 6-
3-23 through 6-3-25 NMSA 1978, in addition to the budget adjustment authority in the General
Appropriation Act of 2025:
A. the first judicial district court may request budget increases up to one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) from internal service funds or interagency transfers for the child support hearing
office;
B. the third judicial district court may request budget increases up to sixty thousand
dollars ($60,000) from other state funds for supervised-exchange supervised visitation services in Dona
Ana county;
C. the twelfth judicial district court may request budget increases up to fifteen thousand
dollars ($15,000) from other state funds for operating expenses;
D. the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 2 may transfer up to five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) from general fund revenue to the eleventh judicial district attorney,
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 278

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
division 1 for operational expenses;
E. the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 1 may request budget increases from
interagency transfers from the eleventh judicial district attorney, division 2 up to five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) for operational expenses;
F. the state investment council may request budget increases up to twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000) from other state funds for investment-related management fees and to meet
emergencies or unexpected physical plant failures that might impact the health and safety of workers or
visitors to the agency;
G. the state ethics commission may request budget increases up to thirty thousand dollars
($30,000) from other state funds received from court-ordered judgments or sanctions and settlement
payments related to commission authorized civil actions for operating expenses;
H. the New Mexico medical board may request budget increases up to five hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($550,000) from other state funds for a telemedicine registry and foreign physician
licensure, contingent on passage of House Bill 127 or similar legislation in the second session of the
fifty-seventh legislature;
I. the New Mexico medical board may request budget increases up to one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) from other state funds for the administrative hearing and litigation process;
J. the cultural affairs department may request program transfers up to five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) between programs to address shortfalls in personal services and employee benefits;
K. the commission for the blind may request budget increases up to four million dollars
($4,000,000) from other state funds to contract with blind or visually impaired vendors to operate food
services at the federal law enforcement training center and Kirtland air force base;
L. the early childhood education and care department may request category transfers from the
other financing uses category to the other category up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the
family, infant, toddler program;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 279

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
M. the miners’ hospital of New Mexico may request budget increases in the other financing
uses category from other state funds from medicaid directed payments for medicaid assessments;
N. the miners’ hospital of New Mexico may request budget increases from other state funds for
operating expenses when the miners’ trust fund’s actual accumulated earnings exceed budgeted earnings;
O. the public health, epidemiology and response and facilities management programs of the
department of health may request budget increases from internal service funds/interagency transfers and
other state funds from payments for prevention services, conducting health surveys and analyzing data,
medicaid administrative claiming and operating expenses;
P. the medical cannabis program of the department of health may request budget increases from
other state funds for operating expenses;
Q. the laboratory services program of the department of health may request budget increases
from internal service funds/interagency transfers and other state funds for operating expenses;
R. the resource protection division of the department of environment may request budget
increases from other state funds and internal service funds/interagency transfers up to one million
dollars ($1,000,000) from the hazardous waste emergency fund for emergencies;
S. the office of the natural resource trustee may request budget increases from other state
funds from the natural resources trustee fund, including up to seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for
outdoor recreation and quality of life projects in San Juan county;
T. the juvenile justice facilities program of the children, youth and families department may
request budget increases up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the land grant permanent fund;
U. the department of transportation may request budget increases up to thirty-five million
dollars ($35,000,000) from other state funds to meet federal matching requirements for debt services and
related costs and intergovernmental agreements, lawsuits and construction- and maintenance-related
costs;
V. the public education department may request budget increases up to twenty thousand dollars
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 280

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
($20,000) from the school transportation training fund for public school transportation workshops and
training, including supplies and professional development for public education department staff; and
W. the student financial aid program of the higher education department may request budget
increases up to thirty-seven million dollars ($37,000,000) from other state funds for the lottery tuition
fund.
Section 13. CERTAIN FISCAL YEAR 2027 BUDGET ADJUSTMENTS AUTHORIZED --
A. As used in this section and Section 12 of the General Appropriation Act of 2026:
(1) “budget category” means an item or an aggregation of related items that represents
the object of an appropriation. Budget categories include personal services and employee benefits,
contractual services, other and other financing uses;
(2) “budget increase” means an approved increase in expenditures by an agency from a
specific source;
(3) “category transfer” means an approved transfer of funds from one budget category
to another budget category, provided that a category transfer does not include a transfer of funds
between divisions; and
(4) “program transfer” means an approved transfer of funds from one program of an
agency to another program of that agency.
B. Pursuant to Sections 6-3-23 through 6-3-25 NMSA 1978, those budget adjustments specified
in this section are authorized for fiscal year 2027.
C. In addition to the specific category transfers authorized in Subsection E of this section
and unless a conflicting category transfer is authorized in Subsection E of this section, all agencies,
including legislative agencies, may request category transfers among personal services and employee
benefits, contractual services and other.
D. Unless a conflicting budget increase is authorized in Subsection E of this section, a
program with internal service funds/interagency transfers appropriations that collects money in excess of
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 281

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
those appropriated may request budget increases in an amount not to exceed five percent of its internal
service funds/interagency transfers and a program with other state funds that collects money in excess of
those appropriated may request budget increases in an amount not to exceed five percent of its other
state funds contained in Section 4 of the General Appropriation Act of 2026. To track the five percent
transfer limitation, agencies shall report cumulative budget adjustment request totals on each budget
adjustment request submitted. The department of finance and administration shall certify agency reporting
of these cumulative totals.
E. In addition to the budget authority otherwise provided in the General Appropriation Act
of 2026, the following agencies may request specified budget adjustments:
(1) the New Mexico compilation commission may request budget increases up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from internal service funds/interagency transfers and other state
funds for emergency publishing expenses;
(2) the attorney general may request budget increases up to two million dollars
($2,000,000) from other state funds from the consumer settlement fund for unanticipated operating expense
arising from complex investigative and litigation matters;
(3) the state investment council may request budget increases up to twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000) from other state funds for investment-related management fees and to meet
emergencies or unexpected physical plant failures that might impact the health and safety of workers or
visitors to the agency;
(4) the administrative hearings office may request budget increases up to amounts
received from interagency transfers/internal service funds from conducting and adjudicating
administrative hearings for other state agencies;
(5) the benefits and risk programs and program support of the public school insurance
authority may request budget increases from internal service funds/interagency transfers, other state
funds and fund balances;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 282

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(6) the healthcare benefits administration program of the retiree health care authority
may request budget increases from other state funds for claims;
(7) the procurement services program of the general services department may request
budget increases up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from other state funds for operating
expenses;
(8) the state printing and graphics program of the general services department may
request budget increases up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from other state funds;
(9) the risk management program of the general services department may request budget
increases up to fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) from other state funds from the public liability
fund for unanticipated claims expenses;
(10) the educational retirement board may request budget increases from other state
funds for investment-related asset management fees, pension administration system program updates and to
meet emergencies or unexpected physical plant failures that might impact the health and safety of workers
or visitors to the agency;
(11) the department of information technology may request budget increases up to two
million dollars ($2,000,000) from other state funds from fund balances for telecommunication, information
processing and the statewide human resources, accounting and management reporting system, may request
budget increases up to ten percent of internal service funds/interagency transfers and other state funds
to support existing or new services and may request budget increases from other state funds and from fund
balances up to the amount of depreciation expense, as reported in the agency's independent audit of the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to acquire and replace capital equipment and associated software used
to provide enterprise services;
(12) the state personnel office may request budget increases up to one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) from internal service funds/interagency transfers for human resources shared services;
(13) the public employees retirement association may request budget increases from
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 283

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
other state funds to pay for investment-related asset management fees and to meet emergencies or
unexpected physical plant failures that might impact the health and safety of workers or visitors to an
agency;
(14) the state treasurer may request budget increases up to five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) from other state funds collected from participating governments in the local
government investment pool for operating expenses in connection with the local government investment
pool;
(15) the state ethics commission may request budget increases up to thirty thousand
dollars ($30,000) from other state funds received from court-ordered judgments or sanctions and
settlement payments related to commission authorized civil actions for operating expenses;
(16) the marketing and promotion program of the tourism department may request budget
increases up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) from other state funds from cooperative marketing grant
matches and other marketing opportunities;
(17) the patient’s compensation fund program of the office of superintendent of
insurance may request budget increases from patient’s compensation fund balance for patient compensation
settlements and court-ordered payments;
(18) the New Mexico medical board may request budget increases up to four hundred
eighty thousand dollars ($480,000) from other state funds for licensure services;
(19) the New Mexico medical board may request budget increases up to one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) from other state funds for the administrative hearing and litigation process;
(20) the racing commission may request budget increases from other state funds from the
equine testing fund for enhancement of the equine testing program;
(21) the racing commission may request budget increases from the jockey and exercise
rider insurance fund to comply with federal and state laws affecting horse racing and for the agency to
utilize for administration in the regulation of horse racing;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 284

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(22) the cultural affairs department may request budget increases up to seven hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) from other state funds from the cultural affairs department enterprise
fund;
(23) the boards and commissions program of the regulation licensing department may
request additional budget increases in excess of those allowed under Subsection D of this section up to
five percent from fees associated with various boards and commissions for operating expenses;
(24) the library services program of the cultural affairs department may request budget
increases from other state funds in the rural libraries program fund for rural library grants;
(25) the museum and historic sites program of the cultural affairs department may
request budget increases up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) from other state funds;
(26) the preservation program of the cultural affairs department may request budget
increases up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) from other state funds for archaeological services or
historic preservation services;
(27) the department of wildlife may request up to five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) from other state funds from the game protection fund for emergencies and may request budget
increases as a result of revenue received from other agencies for operating and capital expenses;
(28) the energy, minerals and natural resources department may request budget increases
from internal service funds/interagency transfers from the department of environment, department of
wildlife, homeland security and emergency management department and office of state engineer from federal
funds to allow programs to maximize the use of federal grants;
(29) the energy, minerals and natural resources department may request budget increases
up to six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) from internal service funds/interagency transfers, other
state funds and fund balance from the Carlsbad brine well remediation fund for the continued remediation
of the Carlsbad brine well and may request budget increases up to eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) from
the oil conservation division systems and hearings fund to support oil conservation commission hearings;
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 285

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
(30) the state parks program of the energy, minerals and natural resources department
may request budget increases up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from internal service
funds/interagency transfers from the department of transportation, New Mexico youth conservation corps,
tourism department, economic development department and department of wildlife from funds to support
park-related projects;
(31) the mining reclamation program of the energy, minerals and natural resources
department may request budget increases up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from other state
funds in the surface mining permit fee fund and Mining Act fund for projects related to surface and hard
rock mining oversight;
(32) the state land office may request budget increases from other state funds to
utilize bond recovery proceeds held in suspense to perform related remediation and reclamation work, may
request budget increases up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the state trust lands restoration
and remediation fund to address surface damage, remediation of hazardous waste sites and watershed
restoration on state trust land and may request up to three million dollars ($3,000,000) from other state
funds or federal funds received from other state agencies for fire-related prevention and response
activities;
(33) the interstate stream compact compliance and water development program of the
state engineer may request budget increases up to one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)
from the New Mexico unit fund to meet water supply demands in the southwest water planning region of New
Mexico, including costs associated with planning, evaluating and aiding development of potential shovel-
ready non-New Mexico unit projects and supporting the ongoing shovel-ready non-New Mexico unit projects
that have previously been approved and funded by the interstate stream commission pursuant to the 2004
Arizona Water Settlement Act;
(34) the interstate stream compact compliance and water development program of the
state engineer may request budget increases up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 286

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
irrigation works construction fund for operational and maintenance costs associated with the Pecos river
settlement agreement;
(35) the interstate stream compact compliance and water development program of the
state engineer may request budget increases up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the
irrigation works construction fund for Elephant Butte channel and other Rio Grande river maintenance and
restoration work;
(36) the interstate stream compact compliance and water development program of the
state engineer may request budget increases up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from the
Ute construction fund for operational and maintenance requirements at the Ute reservoir;
(37) the commission for the blind may request transfers between the other category and
the other financing uses category contingent on the inability of the vocational rehabilitation division
to match federal funds, may request budget increases up to one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) from other state funds for the employment of blind or visually impaired persons pursuant to
the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act, the federal Javits-Wagner-O'Day Act or the federal ability one
program, may request budget increases up to four million dollars ($4,000,000) from other state funds to
contract with blind or visually impaired vendors to operate food services at the federal law enforcement
training center and Kirtland air force base and may request budget increases up to four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000) from other state funds;
(38) the early childhood education and care department may request category transfers
from the other financing uses category to the other category up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) for
the family infant toddler program;
(39) the aging and long-term services department may request budget increases up to
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the conference on aging fund balance for the conference on
aging;
(40) the aging and long-term services department may request increases up to five
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 287

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the veteran services fund balance for direct services for
veterans;
(41) the state health benefits program of the health care authority may request budget
increases from other state funds in the amount of any additional revenue raised pursuant to a net
increase in the number of individuals receiving group health insurance from the program;
(42) the medical assistance division of the health care authority may request budget
increases from other state funds from the health care delivery and access fund for health care delivery
and access hospital assessments and may request budget increases from internal service funds/interagency
transfer revenue from the university of New Mexico intergovernmental transfer funds beyond the current
five percent authority;
(43) the health care authority may request program transfers between the medical
assistance program and the medicaid behavioral health program;
(44) the state health benefits program of the health care authority may request budget
increases from other state funds in the amount of any additional revenue raised pursuant to a premium
rate increase for group health benefits or group life insurance benefits;
(45) the vocational rehabilitation division may request program transfers between the
rehabilitation services program and the independent living services program;
(46) the rehabilitation services program and the independent living services program of
the vocational rehabilitation division may request transfers up to two hundred nine thousand six hundred
dollars ($209,600) between internal service funds/interagency transfers, the other category and other
financing uses category, contingent on the inability of the commission for the blind to use federal
program income;
(47) the developmental disabilities council may request program transfers up to two
hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) between programs for any budget shortfalls;
(48) the miners’ hospital of New Mexico may request budget increases when revenue from
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 288

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
medicaid directed payments and applicable expenses from medicaid assessments increases;
(49) the miners' hospital of New Mexico may request budget increases from other state
funds from patient revenue fees for operating expenses;
(50) the resource protection division of the department of environment may request
budget increases from other state funds and internal service funds/interagency transfers up to the
available balance from the hazardous waste emergency fund for emergencies;
(51) the office of family representation and advocacy may request budget increases up
to one million dollars ($1,000,000) from other state funds from Title IV-E of the federal Social Security
Act reimbursements transferred from the children, youth and families department;
(52) the department of military affairs may request budget increases not to exceed
seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) from other state funds, including proceeds from the sale of
land, revenues received from facility leases, land royalties, miscellaneous income, gifts and pass-
through revenue from the public education department to support the national guard facility operations,
the New Mexico youth and job challenge academies operations and the New Mexico national guard members
family assistance fund;
(53) the department of transportation may request program transfers between the project
design and construction program, the highway operations program, program support and the modal program
for costs related to engineering, construction, maintenance services and grant agreements, may request
program transfers into the personal services and employee benefits category for the prospective salary
increase and employer's share of applicable taxes and retirement benefits, may request budget increases
up to eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) from other state funds and fund balances to meet federal
matching requirements, for debt services and related costs, intergovernmental agreements, lawsuits and
construction- and maintenance-related costs;
(54) the public education department may distribute up to one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000) from the transportation emergency fund to develop efficiency benchmarks and
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 289

Other Intrnl Svc
General State Funds/Inter- Federal
Item Fund Funds Agency Trnsf Funds Total/Target
operational standards for large school districts, small school districts and charter schools to assess
the adequacy and efficiency of transportation systems;
(55) the public education department may request budget increases up to twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) from the school transportation training fund for public school transportation workshops
and training, including supplies and professional development for public education department staff; and
(56) the higher education department may request transfers from the other category to
the other financing category for flow-through transfers related to programs within the policy development
and institutional financial oversight, student financial aid and opportunity scholarship programs.
Section 14. TRANSFER AUTHORITY.--
A. In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 14 of Chapter 160 of Laws 2025, if
revenues and transfers to the general fund at the end of fiscal year 2026 are not sufficient to meet
appropriations due to revenue shortfalls below projections, the governor, with state board of finance
approval, may transfer to the appropriation account of the general fund the amount necessary to meet that
fiscal year's obligations from the tax stabilization reserve pursuant to Subsection E of Section 6-4-2.2
NMSA 1978, provided that the total transferred pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed one hundred
ten million dollars ($110,000,000).
Section 15. SEVERABILITY.-- If any part or application of this act is held invalid, the remainder
or its application to other situations or persons shall not be affected.================================
HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 290






HAFC/H 2 AND 3, a - Page 290